but if the European Union and the European Parliament want to appear credible and not to drive frustrated citizens, living in fear for their jobs, into the arms of glib populists, the beneficial effects of the introduction of the euro must be felt not only by industry but also, and especially, by the workers of social Europe.
I would also like to extend my thanks to the people of Helsinki who have welcomed us to their city with open arms for this special celebration.
you will be able to move your arms freely and also perform minor tasks.
traditional laser scanners mounted on arms or bulky CMMs and white light scanner technologies are referenced in relation to the structure supporting them.
measuring arms can also collect unreliable data when fully extended or if internal encoders are twisted at different angles.
the writer Romulo Lachatañere described it as a tireless dancer, soft and light as movement of a palm tree, beating the air with their arms full of majesty.
about 10 people in the epicenter of the encampment locked themselves together by their arms.
by standing aside as Thailand's opposition and traditional elite seek to undermine the country's democracy in the name of a permanent right to rule, Asia's democracies risk driving some elements of the Thaksin camp into the arms of China, which would happily accept the role of patron to so potent a political force.
it is very important that for the first year of the new term of this Parliament the two arms of the budgetary authority were able to reach global agreement last November.
Europe was divided, and Eastern Europe was driven into the arms of Stalinist totalitarianism.
however, the more the legitimate opposition, such as the Maldivian Democratic Party, and fundamental rights are suppressed, the more people will be driven into the arms of extremists.
even if one day Rychtář and Bartošová would split up, his wife will not welcome him with open arms.
the ad hoc conciliation, particularly on agricultural expenditure and the fisheries agreements made it possible to bring substantially closer together the approaches of the two arms of the budgetary authority with the assistance of the Commission.
"Mr. Akambi, a well-built man with strong shoulders and arms was full of praise for the" Cotton-made-in-Africa "initiative, called simply" Cemia "in French, and said this was the right way forward.
the world gasped in 2004 when baby Alyona was carried out of the Beslan siege cradled in the arms of a Russian policeman.
I would therefore simply appeal to all those involved to adopt a fresh political approach in Afghanistan and not to drive the Pashtuns into the arms of what is left of the Taliban by lumping Pashtuns and Taliban all in together.
(in those days, people shouted 'Long live the Americas!, "' The Americas forever!" and 'Down with bad government! ") In one of the five new Zapatista official residences in existence since 2003, in the Oventic caracol, the Zapatistas also call to mind the oppression of the Indígenas, the necessity of armed rebellion and the Zapatistas themselves enfolded in the arms of the Mexican nation.
11 For I know that such will sorrow for the calamity of the house of Israel; yea, they will sorrow for the destruction of this people; they will sorrow that this people had not repented that they might have been clasped in the arms of Jesus.
we need to fight, today, for civil liberties in Belarus, although we should do this while trying to avoid pushing Belarus into the arms of Russia, because this, too, is very important.
wood, blackish brown patina, encrusted in some areas, of compact stature with the arms carved close to the body, the round face marked by deepened glazed eyes with painted pupils, the head spread with a thick layer of clay-like mass with real hair, slightly dam., paint rubbed off, on small plate; presumably an "atsuku" figure.
the two arms of the budgetary authority have therefore gained a clear picture of the deficiencies and positive developments with regard to the existing multiannual programmes.
34 year old male with serious burn wounds on both arms.
it is perhaps fitting that it happened in the final year of that perspective, and I am sure that both arms of the budgetary authority would want to consider it as an exceptional event.
I felt like a prisoner, isolated although surrounded by people, looking out onto the world through bars, able to see no further than my own feet, with barely enough air to breath, unable to move my arms far enough to write the words that I am reading to you, unable even to make the woman's natural gesture of picking up a child in her arms
the Commission is ready to play its part and to reconcile positions in the new conciliation committee, while respecting the rights of the two arms of the Budgetary Authority, on an equal footing.
) allows the use of 12-inch arms on this turntable. add to this a "12.1" arm, an "EMT-ti" cartridge, a tubed "RöNt" power supply for the drive circuit and a solid-state supply for the bearing heater plus a custom base built by HRS specifically for the "Anniversary."
if one's arms and legs were tranquilized, so that he could not sense their configuration, their warmth, or even that they belonged to his body, would that person be less conscious?
many ultimately choose to immigrate to America permanently, and it is relatively easy for them to do so, thanks to a society that still welcomes outsiders with open arms (even if things have become more difficult since 2001).
our range of products covers turntables, arms, pick-up cartridges and a wide range of accessories.
the village recognizes social forms of care, ways of dealing with fear, but also the subjectivation of courage, as when the young men standing with their backs to the edge of the forest open their arms.
he's tall, strong, very capable, he has a great chest and long arms.
Carter, the incumbent president, was reduced to chasing his defeated challenger, Edward M. Kennedy, around the stage in pursuit of the traditional photo of former rivals with arms raised and hands clasped.
it's a tiny place where people live the way they always have and in June they wait for the thousands of visitors with open arms.
she will never again use her arms or legs; she is just three years old and her spinal cord was destroyed by Israeli shrapnel.
feel the adrenalin in your veins while you make your way through the side arms of the river and through different obstacles which only a river like Zrmanja can create, or enjoy the perfect sounds of the river on your rafting route.The moment you begin your rafting adventure, you will recognize that you have escaped at least for one moment from the civilization.
disappoints a little focus and imperialist arms of the film.
and they were admonished continually by the word of God; and they were led by the power of his a arm, through the wilderness until they came down into the land which is called the b land of Zarahemla.
it was amazing to get her back in our arms.
with the Metha Champissage was no longer a massage applied exclusively on the hair and scalp but also on the neck, face, shoulders and upper arms.
upwards we can see the coat of arms of the family and allegorical statues.
we strive to be a good alternative to other fertility clinics and it is important to us that your insemination becomes a caring and personal experience that you can think back on with joy as you sit there with your big belly or with the child you have dreamed of in your arms.
he further enhanced his body to house eight massive arachnid-like arms outfitted with super-strong steel claws made from an alloy called proto-steel.
she is more the "when she walks, she swings her arms.... Instead of her hips!" type.
38 Now six of them had fallen by the sling, but he a slew none save it were their leader with his sword; and he smote off as many of their arms as were lifted against him, and they were not a few.
when this kind of structure occurs, it should be considered a more serious fault, as it is regularly linked with faults of withers and backsand with shorter upper arm and / or shoulder joint.
scape Technologies award winning scape Bin-Picker bin-picking system enables robot arms to locate and pick individual parts from a parts randomly piled in a container such as a bin or a pallet.
Nick Rascona hugs two of his castmates, and then breaks down crying in their arms; the emotional toll of the performance finally getting to him.
by means of the typical arm swinging it is an effective full-body training that strengthens the arm, shoulder, chest and back muscles and improves posture.
they have their arms stretched out, the palm of their hands up, as if they were demanding gifts from men.
two-coloured Ines has zip pockets at the front, zipped air vents under the arms that can be opened, a detachable hood, several inside pockets, logo rip-tape and rip-tape fastener with reflecting logos on the sleeves.
one of the plates was tied to the upper arm, because of the strong pain.
a highlight is the overnight stay at the swimming comfort hotel "Flotel Warao" in the lonely river arm "Cano Madre vieja" among the Orinoco delta.
the face of the father, who is holding the child in his arms, reveals his fear for his son.
proceed with rounded edges, defining the contour of the arm, glue scale after installing the tensioner, installing the frets and scale markers, and finally lixações of all parts to receive the finish.
however, they do not protect the head, neck or arms.
the renamed Economic and Financial Committee should tilt the balance back to a proper equilibrium.
if the balance sways to one side we risk losing both, for instance if the economic sector were to move to areas where there are not even CO2 limits.
there should certainly be a balance between, on the one hand, the interests of the consumer and, on the other hand, the interests of the producer, and the Commission continues to believe that European exhaustion provides for that balance.
we know, in particular, how incredibly difficult it is to get the United States to achieve an, in our view, fair and considered balance between combating terrorism and defending human rights.
in striking a balance, I believe that the amendments proposed by this House generally offer acceptable solutions.
the Council will therefore have to strike a balance between the various options that have been mentioned this afternoon.
Salvatore Iacolino pointed at such key issues as the balance that has to be struck between the protection of the private sphere and the need for reliable facts and information.
I think that in the future it will be the task of the Finnish Parliament to get the balance right.
hence our Parliament and all the Groups have on balance, as I believe, fulfilled their duties and the Council can decide, if it is willing.
thus, the balance shifted in favour of restrictions which are so burdensome that they have the potential to drive parts of our chemical industry out of the EU.
we saw it as a balance between the normal lifetime of a genetically modified product, the monitoring system we have proposed, and the need for the administrative procedures for this directive to be clear, practical and founded on science, in accordance with the precautionary principle.
this required a draft final balance report from Dr. Ing.
Mr President, in its Green Paper, the European Commission rightly states that the balance of Lomé is moderate.
I hope that we can continue to make it even more political, and your comments have shown that we are here to discuss the political content and the overall balance.
I agreed with the report and the requirement to submit annual reports to the European Commission and the European Parliament, because currently there is very little data showing what ECAs finance or have financed in the past, and some national ECAs do not even report the overall balance of their annual operations regularly, which violates the principles of transparency.
liner (sometimes called sleeve) has a cooling hollow - jacket, or, in case of air cooling - cooling fins, which ensure intensive heat removing from internal running surface to maintain the necessary heat balance of cylinder and piston group.
to the political balance it belonged also that it succeeded in the past years to make the voice of the FIR in the political concert audible.
in writing. - I support this Resolution which brings forward specific recommendations for the European Commission to strengthen its support for health services in sub-Saharan Africa and to review the balance of the European Community funding with a view to prioritising health system support.
it is therefore with some optimism that Mr Paleokrassas, the Member of the Commission responsible for Environmental Policy, presents the balance for the latest bathing season.
it is therefore important that we provide for derogations in the case of components which contain no hazardous substances, such as light bulbs, that we always look at the whole ecological balance and then consider whether it is appropriate to collect these things separately and use them for recycling or whether such action is perhaps not justified on environmental grounds.
the anniversary served to make a balance at a ceremony held in the old factory complex Fabra i Coats where attended over 300 people.
at the same time, though, we also have to strike a critical balance.
full employment, equality and social and economic balance are aims for the EU of the future.
in addition to this, we need a land policy that provides guaranteed standards on land use that respect its balance, as well as safe building standards.
moving barefoot strengthens the footsole and enhances it's functionality and balance control.
in particular - and these remarks are intended especially for my French colleagues in all the parliamentary groups - this Lisbon Treaty does not change the dogmatic concept of competition without balances, without national interests, without frontiers and without any concern for democracy.
in the current situation facing the EU audiovisual sector, it is in the public interest to safeguard what has been described as the 'dual system' and ensure that there is a genuine balance between public service and private-sector broadcasters.
the 'checks-and-balances' aspect of the current interplay between the three institutions, which is a characteristic of our democracies, would diminish.
balance has also been reached between airlines' liability for compensation and the basic economic requirements of air transport, so that the payment of compensation does not have an undue knock-on effect on prices at a time when the economic situation is difficult or does not lead to an increase in prices for passengers.
this is why our group recommends that we adopt this report, without undermining its current balance.
the envisaged readjustment of the balance between the four types of resource and, in particular, the reduction of the VAT share in favour of the GNP-related share of each country is of particular interest, since it is far more equitable.
what benefit can there be for France, or for the United States or the United Kingdom, in bringing about the creation of a massive central European bloc under the control of a Germany which a traditional balance-of-power policy would make it easy to contain?
is it about regional balance? is it about inter-sector balance?
this implies an open and dynamic view of the public service and of its global economic balance, and not a static and residual view of a public service reduced to the bare vestiges.
what we needed, and indeed must continue, to take into account is gender balance and a balance in terms of geographical origin.
faced with this economic crisis, the level of responsibility taken by the ECB and the active cooperation needed to weather the storm depend on finding a balance between the various options, and on the effectiveness of the solutions found for the problems that I have just described.
the simplicity and elegance of micro and macro models make them useful in explaining the price mechanism and the balance or imbalance of key aggregate economic variables.
the European Refugee Fund fosters solidarity between Member States and promotes balance in the efforts they make in receiving asylum seekers, refugees and displaced persons.
I think that, to confront this situation, it is more sensible to play with the few elements of flexibility which exist in the stability pact because, according to his analysis, Mr Metten records that as being among the problems which will have an influence on budgetary balance.
being cask fermented, it has a complex structure and its unique bouquet allies power and richness, balance and generosity.
in your opinion, the council should ensure that the band immediately above the Ronda de Dalt should provide in its entirety, an area of equipment to conduct a smooth transition between the city and the green.
the team's gear consisted of white shorts and t-shirt, blue socks and a purple band on the coat of arms embroidered in colour.
Boris and his band of Brexiteers have more in common with Louis Napoleon Bonaparte, who overturned the French republic to create a new monarchy, than with Danton or Robespierre.
28 And behold, they both belong to your secret band, whose a author is Gadianton and the evil one who seeketh to destroy the souls of men.
12 Therefore, Jacob seeing that their enemies were more numerous than they, he being the king of the band, therefore he commanded his people that they should take their flight into the northernmost part of the land, and there build up unto themselves a a kingdom, until they were joined by dissenters, (for he flattered them that there would be many dissenters) and they become sufficiently strong to contend with the tribes of the people; and they did so.
for years, this gargantuan fortress was thought to be abandoned - until the recent discovery that marauding bands of fel orcs have made Hellfire Citadel their home.
according to Mr Güner Oztek there is only a band of terrorists which, by its criminal actions and its skilful propaganda, is leading international public opinion astray.
while lurking in the other are the bosons, a nasty band of anarchists who respect nothing - at all events, not this principle, which means that they can indeed be found in the same place at the same time.
11 Let my servant Newel K. Whitney be ashamed of the a Nicolaitane band and of all their b secret abominations, and of all his littleness of soul before me, saith the Lord, and come up to the land of Adam-Ondi-Ahman, and be a c bishop unto my people, saith the Lord, not in name but in deed, saith the Lord.
it is, however, destined to fail miserably if the Leninist approach that still exists in the socialist party, which has a tendency both to support the Fino government and to establish political agreements with the revolutionary committees and armed bands, is not discouraged.
2 And it was this a secret band of robbers who did carry on this work of destruction and wickedness.
in addition, collective use of spectrum and spectrum trading would be promoted, also encouraging convergence of authorisation conditions and procedures for bands tradable across Europe.
for wide band use, the draw indicates "left" and "right" channels.
Bulgaria has not followed EU rules saying the 169 MHz frequency band should be made available to applications of social value and electronic services such as asset tracking and paging systems.
I trust that the final signatures can be put on the deal in June to allow the first call for applications to go out before the summer, and I hope that, next time Member States and the Commission decide they need a pan-EU service in a particular frequency band, they will look to the MSS decision as a model of how to reach a speedy agreement by involving Parliament in the detail of the text.
the Council adopted a programme on electronic interoperability solutions for European public administrations, with a EUR 164.1 million budget for the 2010-15 period, and a directive making the 900 MHz frequency band, used for GSM, available for UMTS and other systems so as to provide a broader choice of services.
two thirds of those questioned demand that Deutsche Bank and other banks cease trading in agricultural commodities, as trading deepens the problems faced by the very poorest people around the world.
the amount actually taken up by banks in 2009 is around €1.1 trillion.
the shares of the bank fell by 12% on Friday, which is the record lowest level for 14 years.
"do not worry, you can also start times already and earn points, because there is a piggy bank, and if you later have a website, then hail it Visitors.
therefore, including the left bank of the Nervión and Ayala in Objective 1 would leave no island in the European aid map.
in 1818 (the 30th anniversary) government workers were given a holiday - a tradition that was soon followed by banks and other public offices.
they can carry on towards the far bank or turn back.
please make sure you include your bank account information when returning merchandise. insufficiently stamped or not at all stamped mailings cannot be accepted for organizational reasons.
he said that it is time for Europe to raise the bar, and not just to give people bad news.
the bar is available for all the operational systems and navigating.
in addition, there were possibly record-breaking sales of bars and coins as well as an increase in long positions on futures exchanges.
located near the entrance of the motor way, but also near the centre of the town, with many shops, restaurants, bars, cinemas, night clubs. few minutes far from the beautyful Castle park, the Dolce & Gabnana, Fratelli Rossetti, Bassetti / Zucchi outlets.
a bar room can accept up to 30 people and is appropriate for individual guests and smaller private parties.
the law firm comprises actually three attorneys, all registered with Luxembourg bar, one tax adviser and one legal assistant.
he seemed very angry and ferocious, bit at them, and seized in his teeth the barrel of one of their guns, which they put forward to keep him off, and shook it.
the director, Earl Phillip, "produced a pistol, put his right index finger on the trigger, and drove the barrel into Vincent's knee cap," Bordini said in the complaint.
the worldwide known "Peiner Träger" (Peine beam), a parallel wide-flange-beam, was developed here, patented and presented for the first time in 1914.
a must for all surfers and all those who love regattas, boards and waves is to be found at the "S...
the result is a light and strong high-performance surfboard that is 30% more durable than a standard fibreglass board while remaining similar with regard to weight and stiffness.
this number will deeply affect and decide the winning appeal, playing board consisting only of numbers but also from special fields such as different colors, a group of numbers, even, odd, you can also bet on two digits, four digits, etc.
make the most of your leisure time in our magnificent foyer, on the first floor of the Hotel, where you and your family can while the time away playing different board games available.
hare & Tortoise is the board game based on that script, like a race but with many strategies which may seem a childish game, but it has nothing of that, since it is based on our own decisions and not has nothing to do with luck or chance.
hare & Tortoise is the board game based on that script, like a race but with many strategies which may seem a childish game, but there is nothing there, as it is based on our own decisions and not has nothing to do with luck or chance.
you can imagine this process like a game of dumping ships (the numbers form the board with two coordinates).
Kronopol is one of the world largest manufacturers of wood-based boards and products.
high-density board is also used as a raw material for laminate flooring.
filling so-called Lexan, can be made of colored design or full board ("look like a glass").
for the library, the fabric was - for the first time in these quantities - pressed into four-centimetre-thick boards.
under the seat on a wooden board are motors that steer two dimmer.
our camera body is made of massive alumium boards, assembled with solid screws, thightly sealed and very service friendly. in addition, it is absolutely easy and clear in operation.
if they do not have enough venting channels in their core, and still lie on a hard board, they retain moisture: even mold could occur beneath the mattresses.
nevertheless in order to expand its business Rattanprestige ® has offered other exotic production of high quality - lumber-core furniture boards with wicker basis, which can be used for sliding door wardrobes, kitchen and living room suites fonts decoration.
fronts are produced on base of MDF board and veneered with PVC foil. our trumps are high quality products with the tasteful look.
for companies and agencies we will prepare special offers for accommodation, board, organising schooling rooms and an accompanying programme.
particularly, as a shadow rapporteur, I feel represented in the final document and satisfied that my contributions have been taken on board.
most of the hotels, which co-create the Eurorest Campaign, offer the free nights but there are also places where you get a substantially discounted price for the whole stay including board.
the coffee shop also offers a selection of food and drink á la carte, so you can choose between half and full board, whichever you prefer.
not included are all hotel costs participants pay the hotel directly, including room and board.
a day on board a motorship to go fishing and taste the fresh fish cooked on board and served in open sea.
the costs in connection with board and lodging, travel and visitors' tax can, however, be regarded as forming an integral part of the cure itself or as being inextricably linked to it.
there is no charge for either the teaching, or for room and board.
full board with buffet meals, thematic buffets, specialty restaurant, whole − food and light − food meals, coffee, tea, cake and ice cream, soft drinks, non − alcoholic and local alcoholic drinks (10am to midnight) minibar (soft drinks).
we offer an excellent restaurant with 5-course menus (choice of dishes) and theme buffets (within the half-board arrangement) as well as a varied breakfast buffet, a winter garden with hotel bar, a garden with a children's playground and an adventure barn.
I would have thought it more important to use the time available this afternoon to deal with other urgent topics, which normally go by the board because we never have time for them.
the villa has a parking area for guests, as well as laundry facilities with washing machine and ironing boards.
it is applied by the IP-boards from the company, Aculab (Prosody) as well as by Dialogic.
hand luggage of up to 10kg, as well as your sports equipment (one set of skis and poles, or a snowboard) can be taken with you on board.
it can also become a versatile measurement and automation workstation when configured with NI hardware such as industrial PCI-based DAQ boards or external USB-based DAQ modules.
following the drop in demand for circuit boards (- 40% in the business year 2008 / 2009 as compared to the previous year), ATS decided to transfer its entire PCB mass production from Leoben to Shanghai.
the Voodoo 5 6000 never made it to market, due to a severe bug resulting in data corruption on the AGP bus on certain boards, and was limited to AGP 2x. it was thus incompatible with the then-new Pentium 4 motherboards.
one of the next steps will be simultaneous maintenance of multiple routing matrices to reach even higher quality on mixed analog / digital boards.
the bundle includes an NI R Series reconfigurable I / O board along with the LabVIEW FPGA and LabVIEW Real-Time modules, which help target dedicated hardware to run real-time control applications.
the controllers also support expansion to either a PCI or PCI Express board through a field interchangeable connector.
if you have such a board and want it supported by X11, contact ATI and ask them to release the specifications for your system's GPU.
the individual boards communicate via a serial bus system and the control board 7015 centrally synchronises and supervises them.
software and boards are intended for educational purpose and home users.
the boot is easy to load, but the load height of 650 mm is a bit higher than it is in the Peugeot 2008, which is a comparable model.
one can avoid this problem entirely by using an identifier for the root filesystem that does not change from one boot to the next.
two-thirds of all students work during their studies or semester break.
enjoy a well-earned break and fish to your heart's content whilst the sun gets to work warming your body!.
regardless, city-hopping, a short break, business trip or family vacation - for all occasions Munich offers the perfect setting.
great weekend price St. Gallen 4 for 3 special offer in Gstaad Charming weekend on Lake Zurich Indulgence program at a special price Special offer at a design hotel Alpine gourmet in the Engadine Lifestyle, Luxury and Design VIP treatment with a view Relaxation in the mountains Weekday special in Davos Affordable world class destination Casino Weekend in Bern Visit the Engadine in style at a preferential price Sensational price offer in Luzern Family offer in Central Switzerland Culinary time Pamper yourself in the Valais A little bit of romance in Lucerne Lakes and Mountains Weekend Shopping-Special Romantic break in Weggis Special offer in the water paradise 5 days Valais-Special 4 days for free in Zermatt Family vacation in the mountains Wellness at the Kurhotel Special offer in Leysin Special offer; Winterthur Wellness break Luxury & Wellness Weekend A majestic offer for a majestic location Winter Special Jungfrau region 7 nights for the price of 5 Hot winter offer Stay 7, pay 6 nights Winter special in the Vaud Alps Art and Gourmet package Enjoy Gstaad Water park package 4 days Valais-Special Pay less, relax more!
I hope you all have a good break, but only after you have voted this afternoon!
the latest information for your skiing holiday or wellness break in the township of Obertauern has been put together for you here and we guarantee it will leave no desire unanswered.
el Palmar is an extensive beach, found in Vejer de la Frontera, with fine golden sand, and clear, turquoise Atlantic water. the climate and enviroment are both conducive to a fantastic break by the sea, on the Costa de la Luz in south Spain.
use the fly swatter to get rid of all the bugs!
another important initiative that deserves support is the World Health Organization's "vector control" guidelines, which offer strategies for controlling the mosquitos, flies, and bugs that transmit disease.
the faux bug moves quickly on 12 vibrating silicon legs, in random directions.
a couple of well-known opposition politicians, a chief minister and a federal cabinet minister of the previous pro-Musharraf government, were publicly thrashed, raising doubts about government control over law and order in the country.
this will determine how the financial sector and the cabinet will divide the losses amongst themselves, "Marek told the server iHNed.cz this week.
the cabinet should negotiate new payments for the mortgages it buys, with the aim of lowering the monthly payment costs for those in debt and enabling them to keep their houses.
a former West collaborator, JAY-Z, has also made do with or without a hyphen and capitals.
for the purposes of these general terms and conditions of sale, terms beginning with a capital letter are to be understood according to the meanings given below. 1.
the second set of boxes performs a similar function to the first except text entered in these boxes will allow two capital letters in a word if it is entered in this text box.
we write FULL SERVICE with capital letters and take care of everything to the smallest detail.
it includes discussion about whether Jordan looks like a toon ferret or not, whether or not to type in capitals, who is drinking too much coffee, where the best beer is brewed, who is brewing beer in their basement, and so on.
in case I do not do any of the above mentioned evilnesses, I will NMU policy, forbidding usernames starting with capital letters and having a dash in them, for they are annoying.
for those who dislike the capital "A," there is a classical letterform available.
the comments off-topic, promotional crudely, offensive, written in capital letters, type SMS or illegal will be deleted without mercy.
EIB supports development of urban infrastructure in Moldova's capital
the European Investment Bank (EIB) has granted a EUR 205 million loan for the construction and equipping of a new general hospital in Toledo, the capital of Spain's Castilla-La Mancha region.
in the absence of appropriate policies, there is a risk that regional disparities in economic development may be exacerbated, as more skilled and mobile workers migrate to the capital.
I hope that this new instrument will help us to have a better European debate in Europe and more European topics in national capitals.
the Bavarian capital is also a major focal point for companies specializing in new media, IT and software.
at the beginning of the nineties, in the course of the European unification process and the necessary European social dialog, the trade union federations active in the European capitals began to meet through mediation of the ETUC aiming to coordinate social, labour market and structure-political activities in the metropolises.
the conference, which takes place in the capital, Riga, will feature an exhibition on projects already carried out with EU investment.
the third Africa-EU Summit, to take place in Tripoli, the capital of Libya, will have 'Investment, economic growth and job creation' as its theme, with the aim of outlining long-term joint guidelines in these areas, while safeguarding the priorities set out in the EU 2020 strategy.
the human rights talks between the European Union and China, which have been mentioned several times today and will take place in the Slovenian capital, Ljubljana, on 15 May, will be another occasion to discuss the situation in Tibet and other pressing issues, such as the position of human rights proponents.
the aim of the project is to create consistent and operational water distribution and sewage systems, which are essential to the economic and social development of the capital.
the EU's Russia policy must take greater account of the neighbourhood policy objectives, which should not become secondary to relations between Europe's capitals and Moscow.
our capitals are quicker at investing in the economic and monetary aspects of the European Union than in social cohesion and the - shall we say - qualitative aspects.
the second wave included Pashtun construction workers who helped build the new commercial capital.
London's property market fared well during the downturn as foreign buyers piled into the capital.
from a business perspective, Sao Paolo is the financial capital of South America.
in particular, the EU declaration of September 2005 announcing that high-level delegations of the LTTE would no longer be received in EU capitals was a major signal that, while seeking a balanced approach to the conflict, the EU would not tolerate further violence from the LTTE.
does this provide security in Europe, in one of its major capitals, against the genuine risk of the spread of extremist Islamic doctrines?
if we complete these two projects, we will have reached all eight capitals of the new Member States, and Europe will then be able to grow together.
European Commission officials will visit national capitals during the coming week to discuss the needs and financial assistance to make swift progress on the ground with these operations, with full support of the UNHCR.
human rights exponents are not safe in their homes even in Bogota, the capital, as we have recently seen from the murder of two members of CINEP.
the African Union Commission and the European Commission will hold their annual College-to-College meeting in Africa's political capital, Addis Ababa on 7 April.
the EU needs a high-speed rail transport network, which will service all the European Union capitals and Europe's major cities.
the new capital grew very quickly and attracted crafts- and salesmen.
its infrastructure has improved drastically - there is even a new commuter train in the capital, Addis Ababa.
I, therefore, welcome your support towards setting up a press and information unit in the Commission's delegation in New Delhi, as is already the case in other major capitals.
the Council particularly welcomed the perspective of closer cooperation on the matter - including contingency planning and a better communication system, both at local level and in the capitals with a view to strengthening European solidarity in the perception of EU citizens. "
with respect to the preparation of the European Council in Göteborg, it is to be noted that the issue of the sustainable development is one of the priority themes of the "tour of capitals" of Prime Minister PERSSON and that it will have been dealt with also by the Environment, the Employment and Social Affairs and the General Affairs Councils given thus the widest possible consideration to the different aspects of this central theme of future EU policy.
the last component of the new framework would be developed under the auspices of the Organization for Security and Co-operation in Europe, which provides an existing network for communication among national capitals, and could be used to coordinate operations in real time.
the President indicated that the Presidency would take due account of contributions from Member States when transforming the outline of thinking on the Convention discussed that day into the draft Declaration which it would submit to Member States before the President of the European Council began his tour of the capitals.
the current decision establishing a Community action for the European Capitals of Culture establishes the order of entitlement for member states to designate a European Capital of Culture until 2019.
since 2005, the Bank has provided loans to seven Czech Regions and six cities beside the capital Prague amounting to some EUR 1.1 billion, including the current loan.
in this context, I believe that one of the development priorities in the field of trans-European transport should be to design a high-speed railway network linking all the capitals of the Member States.
each group or sub-group has a stake in the capital and their representatives will only risk going there if they are accompanied and protected by their own militia.
under an agreement signed today in Tallinn with energy company Eesti Energia, the EIB will provide a EUR 50 m loan for a waste-to-energy plant in Iru, in the proximity of the Estonian capital.
promotes monuments protection in the German capital by means of youth projects, events, fundraising and public relations.
Ambassador Di Roberto has made numerous missions to Cyprus and the principal capitals of the European Union on behalf of the Italian presidency, and has also kept in touch with the principal governments interested in resolving this crisis, including the United States government.
I cannot guarantee you that we will succeed with that because a Presidency has to listen to all the capitals and find candidates who can achieve a consensus among the 27 Member States, but I would very much welcome the candidacy of a woman; it would make Europe much more representative than today.
in these respects real progress has been made, allowing us, on the one hand, to make a coherent and credible stand in the Human Rights Council and, on the other hand, to enhance our cooperation with partners in other parts of the world through bilateral meetings as well as in multilateral forums and through a broad-based campaign to raise awareness in many of the world's capitals.
the dialogue between the EU and South Sudan will be further strengthened when the EU establishes a full Delegation in the capital of Juba.
the EU's ability to play a global role is being hampered by 'bean-counters' back in our national capital.
it is shocking that Juárez is the world capital of feminicide, but even more shocking is the macho culture that explains the inaction of the authorities in prosecuting those responsible for these crimes and in protecting defenders of human rights, including journalists.
during her visit to the regional capital of Lublin, she will meet the Marshal of Lubelskie Region, Krzysztof Grabczuk, and the Voivod Genowefa Tokarska to discuss how the region can best make use of the €1.16 billion in Cohesion Policy investment that Lubelskie will receive for 2007-2013.
I would therefore also like to say that we are glad to see that, despite all these difficulties and the fact that we are still eagerly awaiting the position of the Czech Republic, the Portuguese people will be very happy to see the name of its capital associated with a decisive step in the development of the European Union.
on economic policy too, your debate reflected the magnitude of what is at stake at tomorrow's European Council and I trust that the messages sent from here will be heard and listened to in all capitals of Europe.
this means that between one million and 1.5 million Sunnis have fled the capital.
in 2002 more than 2000 foreign visitors from 41 countries came to discover this charming and mysterious capital.
the Croatian capital showed its commitment to sustainable urban mobility through an extensive set of urban planning measures showcased during the 2011 European Mobility Week.
following the designation of the European capitals, a monitoring process will be put in place to provide cities with support and advice in finalising the preparation of the programme and in particular with a view to ensuring that European added value is effectively reflected.
on the one hand high ranking politicians from the Member States bask in praise in eastern capitals for their statements about future prospects.
in conjunction with compressors and a new 130-km-long-pipeline to be built, the new gas interconnector will deliver gas to the capital Chisinau.
we hope that these countries coordinate their efforts effectively prior to any decision-making in Europe's capital cities and that the delegations on the ground in Burundi entrusted with implementing development policies continue working together and that their staff numbers are increased.
a piece of advice likely to be examined carefully in European capitals.
our delegations in the capitals of the candidate countries will select cooperating partners there as part of a strategy designed to satisfy national and regional information requirements.
many spoke of being lured by the increased calm in the capital since the US troop surge and growth of local "concerned citizens groups," armed and working with the US military to defend their neighbourhoods.
I hope that the symbolism of the European capitals will not go the same way.
in autumn 2010 the European Commission awarded the Melina Mercouri Prize (worth 1.5 million euros) to the two 2011 Capitals in recognition of the quality of their preparations.
the government suspects that salaries continue to be deposited into bank accounts, even after a person dies or leaves the public service, reports the BBC's Wanyama Chebusiri from the capital, Nairobi.
firstly, the Treaties say that the EU is open to European countries; 95% of Turkey's territory, of which the capital is Ankara, is located in Asia.
we could speak of cultural management or about giving a new impetus to the one-time idea of Melina Mercouri for a European Capital of Culture.
nonetheless the balance of trade is still negative, although the economy in the capital, Tallinn, is largely based on tourists from Finland.
rapporteur. - Mr President, in opening this discussion I would like us to imagine ourselves as one of those people we represent, perhaps off on holiday to another European country or a young person off to study somewhere else, or somebody off to a business meeting in another European capital, or even to work on a building site.
long-distance services to the capital will end at the Prague Hlavní nádraží station.
1) The idea of restoring an entire Hittite structure here in the capital of Hattusa is by no means a new idea; it has long been a dream.
in many of the national capitals, there are strong lobbies calling for new bans on advertising, in particular the advertising of alcohol.
given space constraints in the capital, it is expected that an existing station would be expanded to accommodate the high-speed network.
of course, we need to ensure that Israel can preserve its democratic system and its rights in its own capital, and the European Union can be involved in the peace process, and it should be, but in a diplomatic role and not as a doctor or judge.
I have my reservations in particular of situations where there is a large gap between the development level and the prosperity of a regional capital and the rest of the area.
this is the schedule set by the Campidoglio for the "Commission for the Future of the Capital," which has this morning taken up residence at its new premises behind the Caracalla Hot Springs.
more than 14,000 people are displaced in temporary shelters in the capital alone, and this number is expected to increase in the future.
in elaborating the Headline and collective capabilities goals by drawing on Member States contributions, the IMB, including representatives from capitals, will also call meetings with DSACEUR and NATO experts in order to draw on NATO's military expertise on the requirements of the Headline and collective capabilities goals.
on a mild day in late August a German police helicopter buzzed low over the US consulate in Frankfurt, the financial capital of Germany.
foreigners invested a total of $118,7m in the Russian capital's construction sector, where the largest amount of work is being carried out....
there is also a music school in the capital where you can learn to play different musical instruments.
- special cultural events with a European and / or international dimension (in particular the European Capital of culture and the European Cultural Month).
the new metro line will significantly improve the urban transport network in Budapest with positive consequences for the quality of life in the Hungarian capital from an environmental point of view.
these trusts are fighting it out with billions of dollars - 13 million, more than in Russia - for the Kazakh energy reserves, which are considerable. nor does it bother the building groups, including Bouygues, which have made considerable amounts of money thanks to the construction of the new capital, Astana.
we need the international community back there at the level at which it was working, and should let ordinary Haitians be depoliticised from this nonsense going on in the capital.
despite her architectural beauty and social significance, the Capital is surprisingly neglected as a setting in videogames.
we want to improve the efficiency of the information offices in the various capitals of the fifteen Member States, so that is the direction we are moving in.
were counted in the German Capital in June - this corresponds to a growth of 18,9 per cent.
too often in recent years we have seen in Rome, in Paris, in London and even in Berlin attempts to unpick the Community method, to pull Europe apart at the seams - national capitals that risk enhancing global anarchy in the name of preserving national sovereignty.
that will make the idea of European capitals of culture even more attractive in the years to come.
the political situation following the first round of presidential elections in Madagascar has exacerbated the breakdown in social cohesion and now looks set to plunge the entire country into total isolation, just like the capital.
a way must be found through negotiations to resolve the status of Jerusalem as the future capital of two States.
the fact that the quake hit the capital, and demolished every center of social activity, destroyed the systems upon which daily urban life depends.
the Romanian capital has long been an insider's tip for travellers looking for new cultural experiences.
in 2007, in the lead-up to the first EU-Africa summit, we complained bitterly about the EU's hypocrisy in imposing a travel ban and asset freeze on Mugabe and his ilk with one hand, while inviting him to a summit in a European capital - Lisbon - with the other.
they would share Jerusalem as a capital, and find a mutually acceptable solution to the enormously sensitive issue of the return of Palestinian refugees.
in year 2003 Fonbet has moved to new large office at the north part of the russian capital.
it should also be remembered that Mrs Adamu first stayed for some time undisturbed with a friend in Lagos, and then also left unhindered for the Togolese capital Lomé where, without encountering problems of any kind, she boarded a plane for Europe.
the Danube runs through seven European capitals and nearby many urban agglomerations, that is why the safety of the transport of dangerous goods along Danube is extremely important.
Rome, Alemanno gives the go ahead to the Commission for the Future of the Capital
that, then, is why the project is decentralised, and if you know of any organisations or groups that would like to be involved in this campaign, the right answer to give them is that they should contact the office of the European Commission in the relevant capital.
Mr President, I think that the recent European Union position led by the Swedish Presidency on the Middle East that would recognise East Jerusalem as the capital of a future independent Palestinian state may harm European efforts to play a significant part in mediating between Israel and the Palestinians.
pressure to integrate Hamas into Palestinian politics is also likely in some European capitals, particularly Paris and London, where some expressed opposition to isolating Hamas even before the war.
in 1946 it was designated the capital of the new Land of North Rhine-Westphalia.
what is more, the red carpet is laid out for some of those dictators in certain European capitals.
the event will gather representatives of European, international and national sport organisations, including the International Olympic Committee, national Olympic committees, the International Paralympic Committee, UEFA, senior advisors of national governments, and the European Institute for Gender Equality, which is based in the Lithuanian capital.
Queenstown is also known as the "adventure capital of the world" and that's not without reason.
preparing for the meeting in the early morning, the EU team heard that there had been an explosion in Grozny, Chechnya's capital, killing several people.
the unrest in Tibet led to widespread protests in Europe and to the disruption of the Olympic Torch relay in several European capitals.
homes in the capital have been the subject of red-hot demand and surging prices, with widespread fears of a credit bubble prompting the Bank of England to impose limits on mortgage borrowing in June.
we are therefore calling for economic and political measures to be taken immediately, including the immediate suspension of the association and cooperation agreement with Israel, in order to force the Israeli Government to stop the slaughter of the Palestinian people, to withdraw the Israeli occupying forces from Palestinian soil, to demolish the wall of shame and to create an independent Palestinian state with its capital in eastern Jerusalem.
unfortunately the Council of Ministers for Culture could not reach agreement on the funding of the new cultural programmes, although it agreed in a flash on the designation of capitals of culture, in disregard of the European Parliament's rights.
in 2008, the Schleeh carpentry company from Baiersbronn built the hospital station in Socogim, a poor district on the edge of the Capital, in the record time of less than one week - free of charge.
the Cinquentenaire arch is a symbol for the capital of Belgium, but what would its equivalent be for the capital of Europe?
the main need is to improve the selection method of cultural capitals.
the Athens Metro extension will reinforce the public transport system, providing a faster, more reliable and environmentally friendly mode of transport contributing significantly to a cleaner environment for the Greek capital.
throughout this revision process, consensus solutions have been reached which, in the case of the outermost regions of the European Union, may paradoxically have strange consequences - as Mr Mastorakis has mentioned - because there is a risk that certain seaports situated in island capitals, at least in the case of the Canaries, will be included in a category other than that of tourist port because of the use of out-of-date freight figures or through considering domestic passenger traffic.
20 countries and three continents convinced themselves of the quality, variety and exclusiveness of the capital in the fields of conferences, events and incentives.
when in 2005 we in a sense revived the Lisbon Strategy, everybody assumed Lisbon was merely the capital of a Member State, Portugal.
that would be a logical solution, but many old Member States have already waited a long time to enjoy the prestige and to have the possibility of having a Capital of Culture.
the discussion stage must now give way to the commitment stage, here, in the capitals and in the regions.
there has not been much active crisis-prevention diplomacy from Brussels or from Europe's national capitals.
launching the consultation at the European Summit of Regions and Cities in the Czech capital, President Van den Brande said that the size and scale of the consultation would help give greater impact to the CoR's suggestions on the future direction of the Lisbon strategy.
furthermore the development of another office in the capital Kiew is planned for the beginning of the year.
was the first business to open its door to the public in Teguise around 1970 and witnessed the gradual development that took place in the former capital of the island.
the Commission has a support office in Tanzania's capital, Dar Es Salaam, and in Burundi's capital, Bujumbura.
however, this is somewhat idealistic given the country's socio-economic circumstances, with most of the population living below the poverty line and almost all lawyers based in the capital..
new YORK - Ten years ago this week, Russian tanks halted a few hours "march short of Tbilisi, the capital of Georgia.
Madam Commissioner, many thanks for your reply. allow me to inform you that capital cities, insofar as they are cultural, financial and political decision-making centres, have the highest concentration of services in the country in question, but that this concentration also makes them a centre of attraction for local immigration and immigration from third countries, resulting in a most appreciable increase in the marginal population, the unemployed, and the consequent depopulation and impoverishment of the surrounding region.
- Mr President-in-Office of the Council, the European Magistrale affects us all greatly, as it runs right through Strasbourg, the capital of Europe.
almost a million people have been internally displaced, half of them in the capital Bangui alone.
flying as we do every week to one of the EU's capitals, we should be particularly concerned about making aviation a more environmentally friendly mode of transport.
Landesbank Berlin AG is the universal bank headquartered in the German capital.
the best-known examples of such grand new cities are planned capitals, typically built near countries "geographic center.
I ask Mr Schmit whether there is a principle of equality by which, a five-star hotel room in one of the new Member States costs the equivalent of EUR 40, as was our experience two weeks "ago in Krakow, Poland, whilst it costs the equivalent of EUR 500 or EUR 700 for a hotel of the same standard in Rome, Paris or any other European capital.
Bush not only chose to visit Brussels, the capital of the European Union, on his February trip to Europe, but stated that what "we seek to achieve in the world requires that America and Europe remain close partners."
this enables convenient public transport connections to all parts of the German capital.
not only in the political sense, but also in regard to its thriving culture and society, Berlin belongsto the leading capitals in the European Union - and is for this reason alone worth the trip.
a populous, sprawling state surrounding the capital, opinions about the new leader are divided in his old stomping ground.
not only in the political sense, but also in regard to its thriving culture and society, Berlin belongs to the leading capitals in the European Union - and is for this reason alone worth the trip.
participation of Catalonia in Spain's modernization project would probably be guaranteed if Barcelona were to become, effectively, the second capital of Spain.
this assessment should take account of all aspects of the preparation and implementation of country strategies, both on the ground and in the capitals, and look at points relating to coordination and complementarity between the Community, the Member States and the other donors.
Landsberger Allee S-Bahn station and trams are just a few steps away, providing easy access throughout the capital.
printed newspapers offer the added advantage of reliability, in a country where Internet access cannot be guaranteed all the time, owing to still-patchy electricity supplies, which cause frequent blackouts even in the capital.
having been the capital of Italy for a short period after the unification of Italy (1865 - 1871) and a long time under the control of the Medici family (1434-1494, 1512-1527 e 1530-1737), Florence was to mideval Europe an important cultural, commercial and financial centre.
three ShelterBox response team members are in Chengdu, the capital of Sichuan, to help distribute the aid.
Sofia, the capital, also has many attractive opportunities. commercial and office space offers the highest returns.
the French capital and its surroundings were also issues on which he worked intensively Arget Eugene (1857-1927) for over three decades, as can also check who traverse the sample.
concentrated on one site and close to the major European capitals, REALMECA's activities benefit from an ideal central location.
there is a buoyant small business enterprise in coach travel between rural areas in my constituency and the capital, Dublin.
"the migrants started to sell chicken and vegetables in the traditional market cheaper than the local Papuans," explains Abeth You, a 24-year-old Paniai native who moved to the provincial capital Jayapura for work.
the PP has increased its number of votes in the four capitals and could be a decisive force in Barcelona, Lérida and Tarragona.
my European pal, who wants an outward-looking Britain inside the EU tent - "Don't leave us alone with France," says Berlin - suggests that more short-sighted ministers and officials in some capitals have got to the point where they don't care whether we stay or leave.
this kind of Huntington approach is clearly intended to send a different message, namely that we are all destined to be part of a 'West "− in emphatic inverted commas − the capital of which would have to be Washington, with the Europeans simply having to follow the warlike ventures of the United States.
had he failed to win in the capital and the country's principal cities, he would have had to recognize the failure of his authoritarian political model, which has also had no success in reducing poverty.
an event marking 100 days to euro was organised simultaneously in 8 regional capitals and attended by some 35,000 people.
together with the state capital of Stuttgart and the Daimler AG, a reconstruction of the arena was developed, which would meet the expectations of all, and passed by the district council.
be faithful to the new king, like your fatherland and preserve my memory "All the soldiers, who had followed it for twenty years of capital in capital, cried while thinking of last glories and wondered with anguish what France was going to become.
the grant will enable the International Committee of the Red Cross, the International Federation of the Red Cross and non-governmental organisations from the United Kingdom, France, Belgium and Germany to carry out emergency projects, mainly in the capital.
instead of commanding much of northern Sri Lanka, they are now confined to a shrinking pocket, and are reduced to mindless military stunts such as the recent bombing by light aircraft of the tax administration building in the capital, Colombo.
of the €10 million allocation for Tripoli and the neighbourhood, €4 million has just been earmarked to support the activities of the International Committee of the Red Cross in the Libyan capital and other cities where the conflict continues to rage.
nothing comes of them once people get back to their national capitals.
this is still the case, particularly as regards regional capitals, or in other words local metropolitan centres.
hundreds of prison workers from across Bulgaria have held a national protest in front the Justice Ministry in the capital Sofia.
thirty thousand people, according to police, a hundred thousand, according to organisers, paraded in the cold afternoon in the Danish capital, which is receiving delegates from 193 countries until the 18th of December, who will be seeking to conclude an agreement to come into effect by the 1st of January, 2013.
it was on the Council's common position on the European capital of culture for the years 2005 to 2019.
how is it possible, in 2016 in Berlin, the capital of the new Germany, that Israel was eliminated and eradicated?
members of the European Parliament present should know that in Estonia, one centre-left party has recklessly followed the current Italian model by concentrating all public and private resources under the party's command and spreading unilateral messages all over the capital city of Tallinn.
real estate prices in Sofia, the capital, are rising steadily, as is demand.
indeed, far from criticizing continuing Israeli settlement of the West Bank, Obama has pledged his support - more than some members of the Israeli Cabinet have done - to Jerusalem as an undivided capital of Israel.
the central location and convenient public transport mean that all of the sights of the Catalan capital are within easy reach.
it is no coincidence that this result has been acknowledged by all the countries of the European Union, which have decided to have the Treaty signed in the Italian capital - the City of Rome - which represents not only a benchmark in Italian history but also an important benchmark in the history of Europe and the history of the European Union.
the Warsaw project is part of a longer term strategic development plan of the City of Warsaw and it plays a key role in the sustainable development of the capital of Poland.
in a way, Silvermoon also serves as a look into the psyche of the blood elves as a whole, and as we'll see, not everything is quite right in the newly rebuilt capital.
is the Commission aware of the special nature of the problems affecting the European regions within which their country's national capital is located?
a case in point is the recasting of Article 13 awarding a European Capital of Culture to Portugal in 2012.
the mealy-mouthed talk by the European Union is out of keeping with the righteous global call for a viable and independent Palestinian state on the 1967 territories with its capital in East Jerusalem.
Barcelona is on its way to become one of the top shopping capitals in Europe.
the Commissioner has explained to us that there has been quite intense work, with high-level meetings with interior ministers, visits to capitals, encouragement to run information campaigns - and there is a specific commitment by Bosnia and Herzegovina and Albania to inform their citizens.
this is a project to develop and promote the electric car in the Catalan capital.
in many European capitals, traffic is congested and pollution seriously affects their inhabitants.
Jerusalem is a final status issue and we have made it clear that, if genuine peace is to be achieved, Jerusalem's status as the future capital of two states must be settled through negotiations.
eleven of our fellow Members, myself included, have sent a letter to the President of the Council, the High Representative, the President of the Commission and the President of Parliament, asking them to work together to invite Mr Payá to come here and for the Council to draft a recommendation to this effect to all Member States for their ambassadors in Havana to do the same and invite Mr Payá to come to Europe, to visit our capitals, our ministers, our prime ministers and the President of the Commission and, in the international limelight, tell us the tragedy of what is happening in Cuba.
the Council adopted a decision on the practical and procedural arrangements relating to the nomination by the Council of the two members of the selection panel and the monitoring and advisory panel for the 'European Capital of Culture' Community action for the period 2013-2015 (8992 / 12).
after the press briefing, the Chief Editors, all of whom know the realities of everyday politics in their six European capitals, told me the briefing had surprised them.
neither the form nor the content of this meeting were worthy of the capital of Catalonia.
the capital of chios, where the majority of Chians live, work, entertain themselves.
Yemeni media report that there is traffic chaos in the capital.
even though some of the previous speakers have already mentioned the problems that occurred in specific cases, I should like to emphasise that, so far, the history of the European capitals of culture has by and large been a successful one.
pm and chancellor rock up to summits or bilateral sessions in foreign capitals, take a photo of themselves in front of a famous local monument, with or without local grandee, then come home and say they are winning allies for reform.
the eleven European tourists and their eight Egyptian escorts held captive for ten days in the desert have been returned on Monday afternoon unharmed to the Egyptian capital.
heavy rains at the beginning of April caused large-scale flooding which killed at least 23 people and left 9 000 displaced in the capital, Honiara, and other areas of Guadalcanal.
attendance at an official pro-government rally in the capital, Addis Ababa, was dwarfed by our rally the following day, when millions of demonstrators peacefully demanded change and showed their support for us.
getting to Monaco, a fairy-tale kingdom only 2 hours away by plane from most of the European capitals.
the capital Bridgetown is a great place for duty-free shopping.
the first round of negotiations on an Association Agreement with Georgia, Azerbaijan and Armenia will take place in the capitals of the three South Caucasus countries in the coming week.
Zelenograd, one of ten districts in the capital Moscow, was a highly guarded location for secret arms research during the Soviet Union.
in this respect, it is significant that the next meeting of the Steering Committee for the multilateral phase of the peace process is due to be held in Lisbon, the capital of the current Community Presidency.
at a seminar in Brussels, Mayor of Stockholm Sten Nordin and representatives from the Swedish capital showed how cities across Europe can improve the quality of life for citizens while also looking after the environment.
for habitants of Kiev and Guests of the Capital in the shape of gift- discount up to 25% of amount for living from 29 May till 01 June!...
one of the aspects of this effort would be the establishment of cultural attachés in major capitals around the globe.
young people and other opponents demonstrated Sunday evening on the main square of the Belarusian capital to reject in advance the outcome of legislation.
it is indispensable for us to inflame there those hopes and impulses with which we could at any moment fall upon the capital, and we shall represent to the capitals that these expressions are the independent hopes and impulses of the provinces.
it is of the utmost importance for a permanent International Criminal Court now to be set up specifically in The Hague, the judicial capital of the world.
finally Philippe Auguste develops industry and the trade, organizes the University, increases, strengthens and embellishes Paris, which becomes the true capital of France.
European Security Fencing (ESF), is situated in Málaga, capital of the Costa Del Sol, from where it exports its products to the entire World.
Catlunya has much more to offer than only the colourful capital of Barcelona.
as it is known the quay of Dnepr in capital of Ukraine is covered by any small restaurants and even hotels.
in defiance of overwhelming global opposition, not to mention past United Nations General Assembly and Security Council resolutions, Trump announced that the US will officially recognize Jerusalem as the capital of Israel.
in recent years the exiled Atal'ai have discovered that Hakkar's physical form can only be summoned within the ancient capital of the Gurubashi empire, Zul'Gurub.
catchment areas are zones covering both a town, whether small, medium-sized or large, and all the surrounding rural areas up to 5, 10, 15, 20, or even, to take the French capital, Paris, as an example, up to 200 kilometres outside it, where a number of people travel every day between their homes and their workplaces.
the oral question to the Commission on Sarajevo as a European Capital of Culture in 2014 by Mrs Pack, on behalf of the Committee on Culture and Education - B7-0215 / 2011).
in Montenegro, the Sozina Tunnel will improve a key link between the capital Podgorica and the Adriatic coast, including the Port of Bar.
in the fall of 1998, we traveled separately on business trips to Freetown, the capital of Sierra Leone.
following mass demonstrations, President Bakiyev was forced to flee the capital and his place was taken by a provisional government led by the opposition leader Roza Otunbayeva, who issued a decree on power succession and an order of compliance with the Kyrgyz Constitution.
the airberlin german juniors again offered a whole week of high-class international junior tennis and should have gained a strong foothold in our capital by now.
though strike certainly will mention tourists, especially it should not to bring visitors of capital, special discomfort, as departure from hotels is carried out to 11 o'clock in the afternoon, and it is possible to attempt where-is necessary.
Arafat set forth a blueprint including an independent Palestinian state in the West Bank and Gaza, with East Jerusalem as its capital, and a fair and just solution to the refugee problem.
there have been televised disputes, intrigue, brawls, suspended matches, and all because some people have found it inconceivable that a team other than the one from the capital could be the winner.
it includes girls in India demonstrating against police inaction over sexual assaults; Pakistani schoolchildren marching through Lahore after the latest Taliban attack on schools; young people on the streets of Cameroon's capital, Yaoundé, supporting refugees; and Yemeni students demonstrating against a war that has destroyed hundreds of schools and left two million children with no education.
"I started practising martial arts such as kung-fu and kickboxing 12 years ago in Algeria," explained Zemmal who has lived in the capital since 2008 in order to train with professionals.
the dominance stems from the Potala hill Marpon or Red and is the must-see for all travelers arriving in Lhasa, capital of Tibet.
a comprehensive water and sanitation Master plan of the capital region will be established and key rehabilitation works in wastewater and drainage networks will be carried out.
from Seattle on the west coast to the capital, Washington, and the vibrancy of New York on the east coast, there are more than 120 hostels - ranging from rural retreats to high-rise buildings - in 34 states and the District of Columbia.
the waves here are a lot more consistent than in nearby Tarifa (the windsurfing capital of Europe).
after receiving a tribute together with the other persons who died in the accident, the family of Bacio Cortes returned to the capital of Coahuila on the board of an aircraft of the Mexican Air Force, the closest people attended the ceremony at the Campo Marte.
the Israeli government has been feeling invincible in the United States - buoyed by the Trump administration's decisions to recognize Jerusalem as Israel's capital and move its embassy there, as well as its open hostility to the 2015 Iran nuclear deal.
unfortunately, the same cannot be said for the countryside, where guerrilla warfare is raging, making it impossible for the NGOs to work outside the capital.
"nor healthy young women are sent away because they help with work and bear children," says the nun, who takes care for more than a hundred women banished from their community in a special care home in the capital of Burkina Faso, West Africa.
Antalya - The recent coup attempt in Libya, led by General Khalifa Hiftar, has finally pierced the illusion that the country's dysfunctional central government, whose power is limited to the capital, Tripoli, can rule effectively.
(PT) Mrs Ashton, how do you feel when governments like the French and Portuguese turn back demonstrations when there are visits by Chinese dignitaries to their capitals so that they are not seen by the dignitaries when they visit these countries?
over the coming years the activities of the Freiberger Holding will be involved in developing one of the most spectacular sites in the German capital.
geophysicists have noticed an increase in activity at the volcano that sits 45 miles (72 kilometers) southeast of the capital since a 7.1-magnitude earthquake rocked central Mexico in September 2017.
whether you would like to go for skiing, sightseeing or the cultural delights of Innsbruck; the capital of the Alps leaves nothing to be desired.
the policies currently being implemented are aimed not only at cleaning up the regional capital but, above all, at organising an integrated waste system involving separate collection, a reduction in the waste produced, the construction of modern facilities and the restoration of former landfill sites.
or perhaps Ethiopia's capital, Addis Ababa, which is powered entirely by renewable energy?
according to the report, Houthi tribes have been besieging the Yemeni capital for almost two weeks.
the Mediterranean is not managed by 44 senior officials in Brussels, capital of the Mediterranean. why not also have an Erasmus grant so that Plato and Aristotle can come and study Community law in the Bruges College?
however, the people are strengthening their solidarity and their fight at the side of the Palestinian people for an independent, territorially united Palestinian state within the 1967 borders, with its capital in East Jerusalem.
at the moment, as you know, the peace talks have stalled. but without betraying any secrets, I can tell you that very strenuous efforts are being made in many parts of the world, in many capitals, to get these talks moving again.
even though it was hit hard by the 1755 Lisbon earthquake it knew how to get itself back up and offer a wide range of cultural activities. in 1998 it was names Europe 's Capital.
from the capital, Puerto del Rosario, and it has restaurants, services and its neighbour is the Caleta de Fuste recreational port.
the main objective of the Program is to supply treated bulk water to the capital Maseru and other urban centres by September 2013.
many wealthy areas of the country - particularly in the capital - have become "ghost towns" because of the high number of foreign buyers who spend most of their time out of the country.
I suggest that the Commissioners should take greater account of the mobility factor, given that the capital of culture also offers an opportunity to display the culture of others.
San Sebastian, also known as Donostia, or the Bella Easo, is the capital of Gipuzkoa, in the...
the capital, Port-au-Prince, still lies buried under tonnes of rubble and the local people have only shovels and wheelbarrows to remove it with.
make an unforgettable journey by car with your own private driver and private guide between the city of wine, Mendoza, and the capital of indigenous Argentina, Salta. during this roadtrip you will get in touch with the overwhelming nature of the Northwest of Argentina, you might think you landed on the moon in the Moonvalley (Valle de la Luna), you are nearly touching the giant of America, the Aconcagua mountain, you'll get to know everything about the Quilmes Indians, you will visit a high class bodega in Cafayate, and much, much more!
of course, it is my own country, my own capital city of London, which will be most adversely affected by these new restrictions, but the EU as a whole has an interest in preventing this haemorrhage of wealth, of jobs and of enterprise from Europe to younger and more virile economies.
an attempted coup in May, and the resulting violence in the capital, Bangui, led to some 300 deaths.
his position changed only after the Islamic State threatened to overrun Iraq's Kurdish regional capital, Erbil - home to US military, intelligence, diplomatic, and business facilities. add to that the beheadings of two American journalists, and suddenly Obama's team was using Bush's war rhetoric, declaring that the US is at war with the Islamic State "in the same way that we are at war with Al Qaeda and its affiliates all around the globe."
the Indian Prime Minister is going to a bilateral meeting in the French capital today, where he intends to come to an agreement on the peaceful use of nuclear power.
his Shia neighbours in Amariyah telephoned to tell him that a local US-backed militia force had helped to drive al-Qaeda out from their bastion in the west of the capital, and urged him to return.
I also noted a marked improvement in the situation in the capital and the surrounding area, as evidenced by the speed with which hundreds of thousands of displaced persons and refugees, who had been forced to flee under the Taliban regime, had returned to their former homes.
explore Portugal's capital with the help of the attentive reception staff.
at least thirty thousand people, according to police, and a hundred thousand, according to the organisers, marched in the cold in the Danish capital outside the United Nations climate conference, which is tasked with reaching an agreement by Friday that will enter into effect on the 1st of January, 2013.
as you already know, ladies and gentlemen, not only am I pleased to be back here in Brussels for the second time as Vice President, as you probably know, some American politicians and American journalists refer to Washington DC as the capital of the free world.
the comparison of past / present is most impressive taking the example of the state capital.
that is why, Mr President-in-Office of the Council and Minister for Foreign Affairs, I would like to ask you to persuade your Minister for the Interior and the police in Belgium to think again. not only in the interests of the safety of the MEPs of the 15 Member States, but also in the interests of their colleagues, their visitors, the safety of the city, which is the capital of Europe, and in the interest of the values for which we all stand.
more links to the capital will be available, for example, to the people in the Ostrava region, as the railways are adding one Pendolino to that line.
take the case of Maria Victoria Fallon, a lawyer in Medellin, capital of Colombia's most violent state.
due to many constraints, not least time pressure, most of these cuts are taking place with very little coordination between capitals.
it was brought up in Cafe at genoeses, having acquired both the European and Asian culture, has begun building of a palace and capital in Bakhchisarai.
Francisco Catunda, the chargé d'affaires of the Brazilian Embassy in the Honduran capital, told TV Globo that "Mel" knows that he must leave the embassy, where he has been a refugee since 21st September, before that date.
from the banking metropolis to the nation's capital, from trade fair to theatre - it just keeps going with stage technology for event technicians in Berlin.
this took place in Beirut in an era bookended by 1952, when the revolution in Egypt knocked Cairo off its high cultural perch, and 1982, when the Israeli invasion staunched the free flow of ideas that had made the Lebanese capital, in Boullata's words, "the metropolis of Arab modernity" for three consecutive decades.
to mark this milestone, Androulla Vassiliou, European Commissioner for Education, Culture, Multilingualism and Youth, will join 300 researchers representing various scientific disciplines and nationalities at a conference in the Polish capital.
Queenstown has led the world in high adrenaline adventures since A.J.Hackett first brought Bungy Jumping to the Capital of the Southern Lakes District.
the Romans made it their capital in the 2nd century BC.
if the ADFL were to proceed with an attack on the capital, this could lead to further serious bloodshed, with heavy casualties among the civilian population.
element capital of this harmonious synthesis occurs in the mystique can not lie to what one might think or say, but experience, and that enables the subject for an inner transformation that after d aniquilarse himself, lets you host the actually it has been given.
this uneven demographic distribution, which is distorted by the large concentration of the population in the capital, Zaragoza, has led to it being excluded from the Objective 1 regions.
unfortunately, on 31 March, Santa Cruz de Tenerife, one of the capitals of the Canary Islands, which is an outermost region of the European Union and an Objective 1 region, some of whose works are being carried out under the Urban initiative - as has just been pointed out - suffered a natural disaster on a huge scale.
both surreal and bustling, the capital of Belgium and of Europe has plenty to offer, whatever you are looking for!
since mid-February, fighting has intensified both in the capital and in the west of the country, with alarming reports indicating the increasing use of heavy artillery against civilians.
his tour of the European capital cities confirmed to him what we already know.
over the last six years, insulation work on two such blocks of flats started in the capital of Romania.
the fighting in the capital in August between the presidential guard and Mr Bemba's militias demonstrates that the main political actors are still prepared to resort to armed violence.
this case -the first-ever terrorist attack in a Western capital using a radioactive weapon - will be remembered as a hallmark of Putin's ruthless and corrupt reign.
at the end of next week, the Heads of State and Government will be back in the Danish capital to take the final decisions.
this resolution addresses Bosnia and Herzegovina's application for its capital, Sarajevo, to be considered European Capital of Culture in 2014.
according to the United Nations, Afghanistan saw at least 1,662 civilian deaths in the first half of 2017, with about 20% of those in the capital.
you have never made any secret of your European convictions, you have declared them with great aplomb, as you yourself have said, in the regions, and in MEPs' constituencies as well as their capital cities.
the challenger had caused quite a stir in the Swiss capital before the fight.
after only being shown six times in the capital, however, it was staged in the provinces, where the magnificent reception that it got is still more than matched by today's audiences.
is it a harbinger of genuine bipartisan cooperation ahead or an illusory moment before a quick return to partisan combat in the capital?
the Dutch capital is a Mecca for open and liberal lifestyles attracting dazzling personalities from all corners of the world.
for example, the UAE, with Egyptian assistance, secretly carried out airstrikes in August to stop Qatari-aided Islamist militias from gaining control of the Libyan capital, Tripoli.
Bulgaria provided information on the reconstruction of "Triumph Theatre" in the capital of Haiti, Port-au-Prince.
Viterbo is also the capital of Tuscia, a crossroad between Upper Lazio, Tuscan Maremma and Umbria, with a beautiful hilly landscape full of scattered medieval towns, olive groves and vineyards.
for Kim Jong-un, even a meeting with Japanese officials in Ulan Bator, Mongolia's capital, to discuss the return of Japanese women who went to North Korea with their Korean husbands thinking that they were journeying to a socialist paradise, served as a platform to secure food aid from Japan.
it is part of narbonnic Gaul with Narbonne as the capital.
still, appetite for homes in the capital has been a boon to Berkeley, pushing up cash due on forward sales to more than £2.2bn.
due to its excellent location, access to Warsaw's tourist attractions and commercial centre make this apartment ideal for short visits to the Polish capital is a matter of consummate ease.
boasting two World Heritage Sites, Budapest is the only capital in the world where nearly one hundred thermal springs and twelve spas can be found, and where Roman ruins, Turkish baths still in use, the heritage of the Gothic and Baroque styles and amazingly rich Art Nouveau architectural masterpieces attract tourists.
I have been asking this question in the capital of my own country over recent weeks and months and it has taken you months, in fact until yesterday evening, to introduce a ban on the damaging practice of short selling.
the picture accompanying the article showed a Christian family sheltering in a church in the capital Baghdad.
according to the UN, 69% of those displaced since February 2006 come from Baghdad, which demonstrates the extent of the "sectarianization" of the capital.
it even adds good proposals, such as the proposal to declare Jerusalem part of the 'cultural and religious heritage of mankind, "the dual capital of Israel and of the future Palestinian state, with an international statute respecting all the religions (paragraph 53).
landing at Gaborone, the country's capital, you'll find it quite modern in architecture and public transportation compared with most African nations - in stark contrast, its rural citizens excel at basket weaving.
Pula is considered the capital of Istrian tourism, full of history, tradition and natural beauty.
combining sassy 60's styling with today's executive design standards, this luxury Madrid loft apartment will make a glamorous choice for your citystay in Spain's capital.
although history is prevalent everywhere you go, much of the capital is surprisingly modern, sleek, and chic.
one of the main benefits of this grant is to initially integrate the central Peru and enhance trade between this region, the capital and other regions.
indulge in superior, 4-star luxury at the wonderful NH Atlanta and stay right in the heart of this Belgian and European capital.
we are well disposed to its being possible from 2009 to choose two cultural capitals at a time.
banditry is rife in Baghdad and on all major transport routes leading to the capital.
however, anyone who believes that the courtroom drama in the provincial capital of Jinan will determine the trial's outcome (the verdict and sentence will be announced in September) is seriously mistaken.
"I came out to vote because of my children, our place is in Europe," said Gjose Tanevski, 62, a voter in the capital, Skopje.
Oxfam (UK), meanwhile, is focusing on water supplies in the capital.
if there is to be genuine peace, there has to be a solution to the status of Jerusalem as the future capital of two states, with the state of Israel and an independent, democratic, contiguous and viable state of Palestine living side by side in peace and security.
in the conflict between the shiite Houthi rebels and the Yemen government, the Houthis have called for civil disobedience in the capital, Sanaa.
Mr President, although the Ministerial Declaration on e-inclusion, which served as a basis for the document under discussion today, was adopted in 2006 in Latvia's capital, Riga, Latvia has not joined the programme.
in the charming "capital" of Val Pusteria, BBruneck, we come in time for afternoon coffee and then go back through Eisacktal.
renowned for its aeronautic, space, electronics and biotechnological industries, Toulouse is also the capital of the Midi-Pyrénées region and is an important agricultural centre.
the capital of the canton of Vaud is also a lively university and convention town.
after a faction change, a character's hearthstone is automatically set to the inn inside the capital city of their new race, which is also where they re-enter the game world as a member of the opposite faction.
since then, employees from the Willy-Brandt house have been observing the events in the SPD-governed state capitals with growing horror.
however, in late December 2004, the national election tribunal, sitting in Abuja, the capital, ruled that while the election had been free and fair in most parts of the country, the number of votes was larger than the population in Ogun, the President's home state.
the holiday knows that every year assembles more than six million visitors in the capital of Bavaria.
Hungary's capital city has also thrown its hat into the ring to provide a home for the European Institute of Innovation and Technology.
the troika was able to visit certain Middle Eastern capitals; in fact if I am not mistaken it is in Beirut or Damascus or Amman or Tel Aviv at this very moment.
I repeat, by the end of February, after I have been round all the capitals and shortlisted all the Commissioners, I will bring you their names here.
in the case of deliveries to locations abroad we can at our discretion also take legal proceedings against the Client in the capital of the country in which his registered office is located.
the proclamation of an independent Palestinian state with Jerusalem as its capital is the sine qua non to any real effort to bring about peace and restore a climate of security for Palestinians and Israelis.
by contrast, similar surveys in other Arab capitals find a decided tilt toward a Muslim identity. in Amman, Jordan, the most recent figure is 12% who put their national identity ahead of their Muslim identity.
in his capacity as President-in-Office of the Council, the Chancellor will tour all the capitals between 15 and 19 March; he will discuss the results achieved so far with the Heads of State and Government and will try, as a result of the tour, to bring home with him the makings of a compromise.
a future that, specifies the Mayor of Rome "will not limit itself to the current municipal borders but will look further afield" not only with the view of a future metropolitan city and its legal status as Capital but "also with consideration to the role that Rome could and must perform as Capital of Europe and the Mediterranean."
this together forms a unique image of the capital of Holland.
fearful about the future of her country, she swapped her corporate attire for a T-shirt emblazoned with "we demand security" in Portuguese as she joined the crowds in the capital's Independence Square on Thursday.
and this past October, talks were held in Astana, the capital, on the Syrian crisis, with representatives of the Syrian government and some armed opposition groups in attendance - despite Kazakhstan's distance from the tragic developments in that country.
therefore, in a relatively short space of time, we have been able to implement two peace-keeping operations in an area close to our hearts and close geographically to our capitals and to Brussels.
eleven years after the fall of the Berlin Wall, Nicosia is now Europe 's only divided capital.
finally, we applied our techniques for a study on the possible locations of service areas in Kinshasa, capital of the Democratic Republic of Congo.
the incidents in the Danish capital occurred shortly after the departure of the main procession, when a group of 300 protesters, clothed entirely in black, broke shop windows with paving and hammers, observed a reporter from the AFP.
what about Curitiba, the capital of Brazil's Paraná state, with its pedestrian-centered planning?
fly to Managua (the capital of Nicaragua) and from there make your way by bus (every half hour from Mercado Huembes or the La UCA station) or taxi (around $35 from the airport depending on your bargaining skills). as an alternative, you can take an air con shuttle for $15 from the airport to Granada.
the country's undernourished masses are not being invited to the capital, Pyongyang, for the extravagant parades that will be held at enormous cost.
the African Institute for Mathematical Sciences (AIMS), in Rwanda's capital, Kigali, is one of these agents of change.
the fact that the town of Oettingen, which has an interesting history of hundreds of years of denominational separation, used to be the capital of a Swabian microstate as well as the twofold residence of the Princes of Oettingen still characterizes today's townscape.
settled over 250 years ago, New Brunswick's capital is truly one of North America's most beautiful cities.
the sportsmen - men and women, young and old, Hungarians and foreigners - could admire the beauties of the Hungarian capital for 2.5 hours and proved that a route of 21.097,5 meter is a distance that can be conquered.
with the doge edict promulgated by Doge Tiepolo in 1291, Murano island was declared a real industrial area and soon it became the world capital of glassware production.
Guinea is sometimes called Guinea-Conakry (Conakry being its capital) to differentiate it from the neighboring Guinea-Bissau (whose capital is Bissau).
some colleagues and students in the capital of Santa Catarina, in the last class of 2009 held on Saturday.
Beijing is the capital of one of the world 's most hardline dictatorships.
set in one of Europe's greatest cities, the hostel in Athens provides easy access to the ancient world as well as the modern bustle of the capital - and provides a gateway for exploring this sunny and intriguing country.
furthermore for the year 2004 he has been reelected for vice spokesman of the Wirtschaftsjunioren Mainz (Rheinhessen). in this position he will coordinate all tasks of Corporate Identity and Corporate Design for the "hidden capital of Germany's Junior Chamber."
just less then 1 hour north of the capital, Lisbon.
it has built a giant football stadium in the capital, Tiraspol, which seems to be some kind of symbol of Transdniestrian virility.
President-in-Office of the Council. - (PT) As you know, during its term of office the Portuguese Presidency is to organise a summit with Russia to be held in Mafra, a town not far from our capital, Lisbon.
the jury will meet in Paris on 15 and 16 September 2008 to decide on the capital for France.
Cyprus is the last country in Europe whose capital is divided by a death strip with barbed wire and minefields.
very early in morning we drive from Ciudad Bolivar to Tucupita, the capital of state Delta Amacuro.
well, first of all, a great many flights from the capitals to Strasbourg have been scrapped.
on Tuesday 14 October, the Mayor of Nicosia, Michalakis Zalbékas, will explain his bicommunal project for the capital.
despite this achievement, important disparities remain, notably between the oil-rich capital agglomeration and the rest of the country, and more generally, between its urban centres and the rural areas.
this day is free to explore the island's colorful, laid-back capital Hilo.
she was among the voters who came to the polling station in an attractive white school building with several palm trees at the front in the capital, Soukhoumi.
the capital of all resorts, Rimini offers a long tradition of hospitality and experience.
before the outbreak of World War I in August 1914, the pound sterling served as the currency of choice for international transactions, just as the dollar does today, and the world's borrowers visited the City of London to raise capital.
the consumers appear as marionettes of capital, counted, analysed, captured in the striated space of the culture industry.
this includes the ongoing boom of a vague "criticality" as cultural capital within broad sections of pop culture and the art field, such as pop stars ingratiating themselves with radical political movements or rampant culture-critical rhetorics of loss and downfall.
this has been one of the greatest misallocations of capital in history - economically feasible only because of artificial monopoly prices.
this is an issue of particular importance for the Alpine region, from which I come, and especially so in the case of the Munich-Verona cross-Alps line. we hope that as a result of Parliament's latest vote, the Commission will regard itself as being obliged to further speed up the relevant preparatory work and to push ahead with greater concentration and effort than has been the case up to now, so as to solve this urgent problem for the Alpine region.
make sure you're typing your member name and password correctly, and that the Caps Lock key is not pressed (passwords are case-sensitive).
whether to use mixed case (0), upper case (1) or lower case (2) hash indexes.
this is an embarrassing example of how a project aimed at giving shape to a European Union foreign policy can ultimately stumble over a few cases of tomatoes.
using this software, the exact position of the cases on the pallet can be calculated quickly and saves the time-consuming teach-procedure.
cases of balls can be returned for full refund or exchange if the product is in brand-new condition and cans have not been opened or damaged.
if you do not agree to these terms and conditions, promptly return the case containing the Software and the accompanying items (including written materials) for a refund.
you should carefully read these terms and conditions BEFORE opening the case that contains the Software or installing and using the Software.
end of line packing starts, where the product is produced - and ends up in a case, tray or on a pallet.
"better utilization of the storage space than using packing cases made of paper or wood.
JSG is an international packaging group with operations in Western Europe and Latin America, active in the manufacturing and sale of corrugated case materials, sheets, and boxes and the recovery of recycled wastepaper.
applications for this technique include tool kits, carrying cases, reusable packaging for sensitive instruments, beverage coolers, food containers, and more.
traces of BPA can be released from plastic containers into the food they carry -infant formula in the case of baby bottles- if these containers are heated at high temperatures.
the bag packer loads the bag products in the required formats in to trays, cases or boxes.
however, according to the case-law of the European Court of Justice, the fact that all parties to the contracts are public law bodies does not, as such, affect the applicability of the public procurement Directives.
for 2004 the Court concludes that the consolidated financial statements faithfully reflect revenue and expenditure for the year and the financial position at the year end, except in the case of the sundry debtors.
these indicators reveal a much worse situation in the case of the new Member States.
given the many cases of abuse during the long-haul transport of animals for slaughter, this transport should be abolished.
the fines in this case are based on the 2006 Guidelines on Fines (see
the assistance effort has however been more complicated in the case of Bulgaria and Romania.
in this case too, we know that vaccines are necessary, but nothing, or far too little, is being done about it.
this is especially the case for Red seabream in the areas West of Portugal and around the Azores.
in case the energy production exceeds the consumption (e.g. weekend application), excess solar power will be stored in the battery.
according to the Court, in view of all the specific circumstances of the case, 5
after all, we were dealing with a different case with different provisions attached in that judgment by the Court, but we certainly believe that we acted in accordance with the spirit of the Court 's judgment, and no more could be expected of us.
where justified by the circumstances of the case, the Commission can act more speedily by giving very short deadlines to Member States in the pre-litigation phase and asking the court to grant interim measures.
the rapporteur, Mr Maaten, has, with good reason, proposed reinforcing that legal basis with a reference to another article, Article 133 on external trade, and furthermore has proposed a series of amendments to some of the articles with the aim of preventing this directive being challenged on the basis of the case-law established by the judgment of the Court of Justice.
it is for the national court to assess, on a case-by-case basis, whether the facts of the dispute before it point to an adverse effect, or a risk thereof, on the function of indicating origin.
the Commission adopted on 30 April a legally binding case definition on the basis of the EU communicable disease legislation, and this decision was published in the Official Journal on 1 May.
it should be made possible for cases to be referred to the Commission on the basis of objective criteria and at the request of the merging parties.
- - - Germany - - No Law of 7 June 1909 against unfair competition Long-standing case-law has considered this Law to be the basis for a general ban on all direct comparisons.
applicability of the law may vary from case to case, depending on such factors as activity, geographical location, or other facts of a legal nature.
only in very special and exceptional cases is it possible for a Member State to institute reduced ceilings, which in any case will be communicated to the Commission and, in consequence, will be carefully monitored by the Commission as to the actual justification concerning the imbalances of the domestic electricity markets.
the proposal covers the EU's trade responses in cases of illegal trade measures in other countries, and it will allow effective action to safeguard the interests of EU companies and workers.
on 31 December 2001, the real backlog of cases - namely the number of inquiries open for more than one year - was 22, compared to 35 at 31 December 2000.
the EU does well to continue to underline the human rights issue, even in cases of social abuse.
it is high time we addressed appalling cases such as the Dutroux case in Belgium, where the inadequate legal framework means that it is still impossible to prove the constituent elements of the crime and hold the trial which has been pending for the last four years, which is why the Union initiative to stamp out this vile crime and create a common reference framework to strengthen judicial and police cooperation between the Member States and bring these criminal syndicates to justice is all the more important.
the same is the case for the stocks in international waters and for highly migratory species such as tuna, where the European Commission negotiates fishing opportunities in regional fisheries management organisations (RFMOs).
in the Commission communication on a level playing field for direct investment worldwide, we made the case for starting negotiations in the OECD and launching discussions in the WTO.
I am glad that today, if somewhat belatedly - for the mills of the executive always grind rather slowly, even in the case of clear-cut issues - and with the unanimous approval of all the Member States of the European Union, the Council and the Commission, we have a regulation that lives up to our expectations.
where a Member State decides to have recourse to transit through the territory of another Member State, which should be in all cases with an escort by staff of the implementing Member State, the transit operations cannot be implemented without prior consent from the Member State where the transit would take place.
this raises a number of issues for the functioning of the market and may in some cases lead to less competition and higher prices, especially for SMEs.
the corporate bodies of BASF SE will continue to be - as is presently the case in the AG - the general meeting of shareholders as well as the board of executive directors and the supervisory board (so-called two-tier management system).
this is probably why a broad majority of this Parliament, which in most cases has little consideration for the position of people relegated to the margin of society, has voted in favour during the discussion in the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Home Affairs.
it says that the Commission, on a case-by-case basis, when the situation is appropriate, following entry into force of the Treaty, shall propose the review of instruments currently falling within the third pillar in order to change them into instruments over which Parliament has full co-decision powers and to which the procedures which Parliament in my view rightly wishes for apply.
many will appear via video conference call, rather than in person, to plead their case for legal status to an immigration judge.
following the conclusion of the prosecution case, General Moro, Chief of Staff of the Colombian Army, went on television to call for the men's conviction, and this before the defence had even summed up.
as we have received a large number of claims for compensation and have to examine, in each case, if the documents are complete before sending our confirmation of receipt, in order to immediately ask for the missing documents if necessary, you may have to wait a few weeks before you receive our confirmation.
in the present cases, owing to the substantial change in circumstances linked to the effects of the economic and financial crisis on the agricultural sector, the assessment by the Commission of those aid schemes cannot therefore be considered as prejudicing the assessment which would have been carried out of an aid scheme, containing similar measures, but which would have fallen to be implemented in economic circumstances radically different from those which the Commission took into account in its assessment.
for that reason, the Union judicature must, having regard to the specific features of the case before it and to the technical nature of the Commission's assessments, carry out a comprehensive review of the national measures.
we will not be held liable or responsible for any damages or trouble caused in such cases.
we do not want a situation in my country where public opinion - as is already beginning to be the case - is unsure whether the two decoders are legal and is even beginning to think that Simulcrypt is illegal, fraudulent or something of that ilk.
in no case can a state ruled by law be built with laws that permit racial, religious or political discrimination.
following a number of cases of privatisation of assets which had received financial support from the European Regional Development Fund, Bruce Millan, Commissioner for Regional Policies, has asked officials to carry out a comprehensive inquiry.
it is difficult to disagree, and of course I accept all legal restrictions as regards MEPs, but it is difficult for me to agree with a situation where, on being sentenced to a fine in a case brought by the public prosecution service for a deliberate crime, or for being charged with such a crime, a person automatically loses their mandate to the European Parliament.
in the case of other stocks in this category sole in western Channel, hake and Norway lobster off the Iberian Peninsula and Irish Sea whiting the Commission proposes significant reductions in TACs which will reduce fishing mortality by 50% or more.
this addition must not, in any case, modify the concept of civil responsibility that in all our legal systems is of an objective nature, in other words, independent of any form of subjectivity.
if the Commission has no instruments to influence levels of excise taxes in Member States, and if favouring certain industries is not allowed under the competition rules, surely where a region suffers special disadvantages because of peripherality and remoteness, it would only be a case of equalising matters, not of giving any special preference if there was some differential in excise taxes permitted in those special and particular circumstances?
for diagnostic purposes an ultrasound or, in certain cases, a computerized tomography (CT) scan of the abdomen may be required.
in the case of autonomous stocks on which ICES Advisory Committee on Fishery Management (ACFM) has provided advice based on analytical assessments which has then been reviewed by STEFC, the Commission bases its TAC proposals on the advice of these Committees.
the dotted lines indicate that a transformation is applied, in this case a digital conflation of the two different sceneries to a single one.
with regard to article 4 which relates to the conditions for the burden of proof, we believe that the Council's decision to reject the last sentence which refers to residual doubt on the grounds that it only relates to criminal proceedings is unfounded in the sense that with this sentence the directive is leaving it to judges to decide on prima facie cases but where doubt persists, it determines that the burden of proof should be borne by the employer since he has all the information at his disposal.
all the teams must play all of their games, as their average score may prove important in a case of equal results.
(9) Additional requirements may have to be established in the case of vehicles equipped with combined braking systems.
commercial cases are particularly seriously affected, as the bottleneck obstructs the application of the law on bankruptcy.
he mentioned the case of the Sangatte camp in the Nord-Pas-de-Calais region, which had been closed in December 2002 by a decision of the French minister of the interior, Nicolas Sarkozy, but which continued to receive a huge influx of refugees.
it therefore leaves the way open for the post-colonial diplomacy of its Member States, who have in the past sometimes shown their tendency to fuel crises and, in all cases, their inability to resolve them.
in my opinion, journalists are very much in a position to determine from specific cases in practice whether prior knowledge applies.
cooperation between Member States' Central Authorities can be improved, especially when it comes to collecting and exchanging information on the situation of a child in abduction cases.
moreover some of the proposals passed today concerning the definitions of intentional infringement and commercial scale threaten to remove the discretion of trained and qualified national judges to take the circumstances of each individual case into account.
as far as the proposed Stability Pact is concerned, the Council examined a number of key issues such as the definition in which cases the excess of a government deficit over the reference value shall be considered exceptional and temporary, the annual amount of the deposits to be made in case of failure to take effective action to remedy the excessive deficit and whether such a deposit should also be required when an excessive deficit results only from non-compliance with the Treaty criterion relating to the government debt ratio.
if we have given notice of any of the above, you must not attempt to re-register for or use the Service or re-post or re-use the relevant content as the case may be.
two other articles of impeachment failed - a second count of perjury in the Jones case (by a 205-229 vote), and one accusing Clinton of abuse of power (by a 148-285 vote). he was acquitted by the Senate.
the Bar Association has final and binding authority on issues of professional confidentiality and it falls to that body to decide whether or not to authorise - in exceptional cases - the disclosure of information at the request of the courts.
it also contains measures intended to enable the Member States to cope with emergency situations in case of a sudden mass influx of refugees or displaced persons, building on experience gained through the joint action of 1999, which contained similar measures, but which was specifically targeted at the situation in Kosovo.
on the other hand, under certain conditions, in particular in the case of licensing to a joint venture and in case of non-reciprocal licensing, the exclusivity may not only lead to a loss of inter-brand competition but also to efficiencies.
in the case of non-respect of cross-compliance requirements, direct payments would be reduced while maintaining proportionality with respect to the risk or damage concerned.
otherwise, in the case of slight negligence, TWK shall only be liable if a significant contractual obligation has been violated.
throughout this revision process, consensus solutions have been reached which, in the case of the outermost regions of the European Union, may paradoxically have strange consequences - as Mr Mastorakis has mentioned - because there is a risk that certain seaports situated in island capitals, at least in the case of the Canaries, will be included in a category other than that of tourist port because of the use of out-of-date freight figures or through considering domestic passenger traffic.
this being the case, what the resolution is aiming to achieve is, first and foremost, to show solidarity with the communities affected and with the human victims of the consequences of this hurricane.
it is, however, the case that we have today a situation in which one contracting party is in fact the privileged party.
did the Council consider the particular case of Northern Rock which is currently experiencing financial difficulties as a direct result of instability in the US?
within the reserved area they will able to receive information related to the status of their case.
that being the case, one can appreciate why the truly disastrous Schengen agreement, applied since 1985, needs to be repealed, as it enables any illegal immigrants arriving in Spain, Italy or elsewhere, their status newly regularised, to enter France and benefit from all the social benefits provided there.
apart from the fact that this would eliminate customs duties on products of concern to Portugal, such as textiles and clothes, we are also concerned about the specific case of the Davos Agreement on wines and spirits.
in case of pictured works of fine arts, performing and visual arts, or films that still fall within the protection period prescribed by copyright law), the according licence, as well as other publication authorisations (e.g. from author, collections, museums, copyright collecting societies, etc.
we must also start to collectively think about children 's living conditions in the various European countries particularly in urban areas, and initiate a form of collaboration as well as financial resources in order to help families in difficulty, particularly in the case of single-parent families or of vulnerable parents.
less often necessary for new installations since the tubing must be cut for attaching the T-branch connectors, in any case. suitable for use in existing systems for purposes of expansion or repair.
the Italian Government, in order to avoid the illegal take-over of pets, advises that the first reference to contact in case you should find a pet is the headquarters of the urban Vigili who will contact the local institutions, which are in charge of catching the pet.
launched in 2004 to replace the E111 form, this device is intended to allow citizens, in all cases, to assert their rights to health insurance in a simple and effective way.
clearly, these are three very different cases and the solutions needed to regulate these situations will therefore also be very different.
if your travel plans are affected by unforeseen schedule changes and delays of aircraft, a dive travel agency who knows the ropes of the destination can in many cases salvage what otherwise would be spoiled vacation.
- the establishment of reference values when necessary for the purposes of control in cases where there is no residue limit.
that is already provided for today and it has been the case in a few situations - for example a major event such as a terrorist threat.
this is not about whether or not we like Mr Saakashvili; it is a case of an obligation to support the elected representative of the Georgian people, who have become the victim of an imperialistic act and on whom an attempt at strangulation is being made.
this includes for example the right to interpretation and translation, the right to information and access to case materials or the right of access to a lawyer in case of detention.
the cross-examination -- during a hearing on a defense motion to have Manning's case dismissed on grounds that his confinement has been harsh and has amounted to enough punishment -- came a day after Manning testified that he had considered suicide while in custody.
it is equally the case that with the increasing sophistication and interdependence of our societies, economic measures, the free flow of information and so on have become ever more important in conflict and its prevention.
the system is capable in the cases of private and company cars as well as taxis to individually separate and record the passenger and idle kilometres.
if the emissions were to decrease sharply, then you could perhaps talk about stabilizing the programme, but not in this case.
they are therefore subject to case-by-case regulatory action on the basis of the requirements of the legislation.
if the worst were to happen, and for these or other reasons the agreement were not to be ratified, this would not simply be a case of Europe running in place; it would be a significant and a dangerous step backwards.
the mission of the company is to provide support to other companies and private persons that have lost important data as a result of a hardware failure or a software problem. in most of these cases the data can still be reached and recovered by means of specialised equipment and software.
if more information will be needed in order to assess your case, you will receive an individually tailored letter containing the list of medical documents necessary to submit for consideration of our experts.
this being the case, I think it is too early for us to make more far-reaching changes than the ones proposed at this stage.
in these cases, lifts are too small and taking it up the stairs could mean harm to both the staff and the furniture.
equally diverse are the types of rapport between various movements in Europe and the structures of the state, in cases where the opportunities for relations, incursions, cooperation and financial resources depend upon local institutional geographies.
the total remuneration received by the Board of Executive Directors and the Supervisory Board is in each case already broken down into fixed and variable components, with details provided of option rights for the Board of Executive Directors.
if we don't offer this length take the next smaller one. (in case you need quantities, min.
a group of candidates solve various case studies and model situations that reflect real problems - they make decisions and work in a team in conditions which are as close as possible to those that they would meet in the job position.
if we take a purely market-based approach, then we are clearly in danger of giving priority - or excessive rights in any case - to market players which we know are able to distort the market on account of their size; in other words, we know that small operators cannot always compete with them.
insurance companies decide on the insurance fee and the amount to be paid in case of damages depending on the health condition of the applying customer, and if they consider it too risky, they do not provide insurance.
passages of essential documents which are not relevant for the suspected or accused person to have knowledge of the case against him do not have to be translated.
this is not just because they do not identify risks in good time, as in the case of the US real estate market, but also because they can make a bad situation worse after a crisis occurs.
I regard access to resources and waters in the outermost regions as a special case, which must therefore be dealt with accordingly.
we feel it would be excessive in any case to presume to make the implementation of this agreement conditional upon an undertaking to do something about the situation at the Guantánamo base.
the maximum levels must guarantee the safety of all citizens and we are all well aware of the fact that there are life-threatening cases like these in every country.
there has never been one second of doubt that it is agriculture, but especially fisheries, or the Icesave case, where the situation is the most difficult.
in any case Michelin is facing a competitive challenge which absolutely requires it to raise productivity and that means lay-offs.
this aid must be used to support the reintegration into the labour market of the people who have been made redundant, who, in 25% of cases, do not have a basic level of education or did not finish school, and, in 40% of cases, only have a basic level of education.
in difference countries different rules of getting fiancee's visa exist, so we recommend you to contact us in every special case of you contact with your country consulate in her city to clear all questions.
in those cases I advise to booking com to show the price in the home currency and indicate the price in Euro as approximate price for information.
this case arose out of a contract awarded by the Home Office for the provision of a radio communications system and related equipment.
the specific approach will depend on the circumstances of each individual case but projects such as the Brenner tunnel or parts of the Train Grand Vitesse (TGV) Sud could be candidates for the PPP approach.
this is the case despite the cooperation agreements, which contain many clauses, but never make it very clear that the situation of women should be taken into account amongst the objectives, and that the promotion of women and their access to better levels of personal well-being and to the labour market must also be amongst those objectives, so that they can pursue their own professions.
once again, it is a real case which was brought before the European Court of Justice.
the Commission defines annually the common EU priorities of persons to be resettled and this definition must be sufficiently flexible to respond to emergency cases.
there is the danger of a sensational case of unemployment, 2, 500-3, 000 more unemployed in a city of around 30, 000 people.
nearly 2 years since Oury Jalloh's death and more than one and half years after accusation by the State Prosecutor the Court accepted to take on the case at the 2nd january 2007 against one of the policemen.
Mr President, war is an evil, but in some cases it can be the lesser of two evils.
the case concerned the joint marketing regime for Norwegian gas.
violations of international law should not, in any case, be negotiable, as the chairman of our Committee on External Economic Relations, Mrs Castellina, has just pointed out.
in a consultation appointment we offer you assistance in conflict situations and information regarding your rights in the case of discrimination.
it also overlooks the extremely worrying case of the impoverishment of Europe's middle classes.
it is clearly important that we keep stating and restating that case.
the Guidelines are based on the relevant case law of the Court of First Instance and the Court of Justice and on the Commission's own decision-making practice in defining the relevant market and applying the concept of single and collective dominance, in particular with regard to electronic communications markets.
in inlcudes a section on gender-neutral job evaluation and classification systems, a summary of equal pay case law of the European Court of Justice, examples of national case-law on equal pay and examples of national best practices.
as regards the legal arrangements, the Committee on Legal Affairs and the Internal Market proposes that first instance jurisdiction should be at national level, such that appeals can be made to national courts with experience in patent cases as first instance courts for Community patent litigation, while second instance decisions would be the responsibility of the European Chamber for intellectual property.
"the solution to this problem is in the hands of Great Britain, Sweden and the European legal authorities, because Assange's lawyer, Baltazar Garzon, is handling a series of cases in different European courts" he said.
fortunately, the Commission's proposal to the WTO is putting the case for the multifunctional agricultural model.
I would like the Commission to address this using the specific example of case AD549, with the keyword being the European Saint-Gobain group.
the case of neighbouring Guinea-Bissau, where a blood-bath has just taken place ahead of general elections, should serve as a warning.
I would also be grateful if you could tell me whether you will use your presidency to ensure that existing EU legislation is transposed into Italian law, as in the case of environmental impact assessment, for instance.
the work on progressive environmental legislation will almost certainly be improved if we give Member States better guarantees than is currently the case that they may forge ahead with environmental reforms.
the EFSA model, as it is also the case for the other EU scientific agencies (,), is dependent on its capacity to pool expertise from Member States.
the Commission's proposal for a Council regulation on the protection of the industrial plan is a good example of a case where business impact assessment reveals the frequently conflicting interests of various business activities.
unfortunately the Community has not yet managed, in the framework of the International Baltic Sea Fishery Commission, to convince all the other contracting parties of the need to reduce catch quotas drastically, particularly in the case of wild salmon.
however in some situations this may cause problems, e.g. in case of a change of the resolution.
the Danish case highlights the pivotal role of governance reform if Europe is ever to meet its Lisbon goals.
I voted in favour of the report on integrated maritime policy (IMP) - progress made and new challenges, because I believe that the EU needs concrete measures to mobilise the economy of the sea, providing incentives and promoting the economic potential of maritime clusters, in particular in Member States and regions with large Exclusive Economic Zones, such as the case of Portugal and the Azores.
regarding the Lomé Convention, for which we give a separate auditor's certificate, this year we come to the conclusion that all the categories which I have indicated in the case of the general budget are in order, so that altogether, apart from a few exceptions, we can say that our auditor's certificate for the Lomé Convention is positive.
the rule that the European Parliament always codecides when the Council takes decisions by majority is a case in point.
but in that case, unfortunately, there are many examples: special treatment given to associations with declared federalist aims or to the many NGOs whose roles, philosophies and operations are highly questionable, the funding of European political parties, via the sums swallowed up in the Prince programme, in an attempt to convince the citizens of Member States of the validity of the euro at a time when the European currency is experiencing a loss of confidence widely shared by Europeans, from our Danish friends right up to the managers of the European Central Bank.
the Agency needs to act in other countries as well, most importantly those which are covered by the European Union neighbourhood policy or by partnership agreements, as is the case with Russia.
"line, and install the package with the highest version number, giving priority to the first mentioned lines (that way, in case of multiple mirror locations, you'd typically first name a local harddisk, then CD-ROMs, and then HTTP / FTP mirrors).
Thyssen Krupp is the only case of a multinational that has grown thanks to the work of hundreds of Italian workers and huge funds placed at its disposal, either by the Italian State or the European Union, and then has decided to close, in this case in Terni, in Umbria, with the risk of leaving 900 workers and their families destitute and also wasting a huge resource of professional skills.
in the case of social security, for example, where we already have so many different systems anyway that have not even been harmonised within the EU, it raises the question of how we can really create a common set of rights for third country nationals in all cases even if we want to.
"the Dutch case shows that budgetary consolidation undertaken with resolve can lead to quick and sustainable results," said Joaquín Almunia, European Commissioner for Economic and Monetary Affairs.
I sincerely hope, therefore, that you all agree that the case of Italy should be included in this report.
for instance, the case of regularly buying big doses of cholesterol-reducing drugs practically refers to the fact that the customer has untreatably high blood fat level, as a result of which this person would immediately be put to a higher risk category.
no warranty is granted in case of defects resulting from inappropriate handling or overstraining, if legal provisions, or operation or installation instructions issued by ubitronix have not been followed, if the delivered object has been produced according to specifications issued by the customer and the defect is related to these specifications or drafts; in case of incorrect installation or commissioning by the customer or by third parties, in case of natural wear and tear, in case of transport damages, improper storage, in case of interfering operation conditions (e.g. insufficient power supply), chemical, electrochemical or electrical influences, non-performance of necessary services or insufficient maintenance.
a number of case studies are presented, with examples of good practice showing how inland waterway development and management can go hand-in-hand with nature protection.
this was prompted by an answer given by the Commissioner in her hearing, when she pointed out that one particular strain of salmonella was being researched by 40 different institutes - a clear case of a lack of joined-up thinking, and a waste of money.
in pondering this question, the case of Mexico-neither an economic tiger like China or Singapore nor a Sluggard like many African and Carribean countries-may be especially instructive.
yet grass-roots actions are of key importance, as in the case of Poland, where it was possible to overcome opposition thanks to a women's social movement known as the Congress of Women.
in some cases, retailers in Germany just provide sales space which is then solely managed by the supplier - a situation that nobody would have thought of several years ago.
you can also adjust the input level here, for the case your input signal is too weak (or too heavy).
a new feature of the Annual Report which I wish to highlight, with an eye to supporting and encouraging good administration, concerns what I call 'star cases' of good practice by institutions, revealed through my inquiries.
the upcoming referendum on Britain's EU membership is a case in point.
this is a good example of a case where national legislation is not enough to ensure that we are rid of crime, but where action at Union level is needed.
I also feel that meetings amongst different religious leaders and joining together to pray from a common platform are extremely powerful, as was the case in 1986 during the gathering at Assisi in Italy.
a classic case of this is the report that we are debating today.
the same goes for the way in which society fleshes out its ethical conscience and is confronted by new problems resulting from scientific progress such as the cases of genetic manipulation or computerisation, which are alarming more than cynical.
the most recent case - and here I am correcting some of my colleagues - is Senegal, where pressure to renew the agreement has come not just from Community interests, but also from the Senegalese sector itself because its processing depends on Community catches in its waters and some industries risked paralysis if the agreement was not renewed immediately. as you know, some were already complaining before the agreement was renewed.
in this case, if different or even contradictory decisions were taken by different regional authorities, that could have damaging effects by causing the relocation of fishing boats or reducing the level of monitoring.
take as a case in point the Directive on Alternative Investment Fund Managers, which will reduce the amount of money available to entrepreneurs in Europe, which will drive creators of wealth out of the European Union, and which will reduce investment in developing countries.
on the Manu Biosphere Tour you have more time for walking on the trails and the tour has one day (day 5) to choose which animals you would like to observe (again), which is useful especially in case of bad weather conditions.
the aerospace sector represents a case in point, where Europe can build a strong industrial platform based on world-class technological applications, products and processes, by pooling resources at EU level to achieve a competitive critical mass.
other errors are linked to deficiencies in the controls carried out by the Member States (in the case, for example, of olive oil and cotton).
it's important to understand when you buy a currency you are paying the offer price of 1.32 and when you sell a currency you don't pay (in this case also 1.32) until you close your trade by buying.
King's official website, however, states that this was incorrect, and that King was walking facing traffic. in any case, Smith was turned and leaning to the rear of his vehicle trying to restrain his dog, and was not watching the road when he struck King.
of course we must adopt Mr Fabra Valles's report which, as he says himself, is a textbook case. but it seems to me that we need to do more than talk - we need to demand action and penalties.
so in the case of driverless cars, raw data can be used to analyse where the most accidents take place and how future accidents could be avoided.
Mr Needle said one in four people had partaken of complementary medicine and seen the benefits of disciplines such as shiatsu or - as in the case of my own mother where conventional medicine failed - received great relief from acupuncture.
in case your browser only supports a Java 1.1-Virtual Machine, the certificate is ignored and the application will continue to run with limited functionality.
while a fall in the birth rate has known effects on a nation's economic growth, tax revenues, healthcare costs and immigration policies, in Singapore's case there are also some unexpected consequences.
all possibilities of modern technology and telecommunication should be utilised to improve operative cooperation, e.g. in the case of the Early Warning System on irregular migratory flows;
as far as I am concerned, it proves to all neighbouring countries that education does not only have to spread hatred, as is often the case these days, but that it can also serve as a cradle for a peaceful, multi-ethnic society.
not a few of his Jewish students and friends traveled from America back to Austria after the war solely to visit their highly-regarded teacher and friend Joseph Marx, as was the case with Herbert Zipper. that Marx was revered by the great majority of his students and was honored up until his death with countless letters and visits from all parts of the world is already known, but from whence his enormous esteem for his Jewish students comes, is uncertain.
the case of my own firm, Christofferson, Robb & Company (CRC), illustrates how private capital markets can finance renewable energy when the subsidy is right.
not giving an invoice frees the agency of any responsibility, as in case of cancellation, robbery, insurance, accident, etc.
for professional use in microscopy, we recommend high-quality full-frame digital SLR cameras, particularly in the case of special processes (e.g. fluorescence microscopy).
this country is now so extreme and medieval that paper bags are banned in case they contain pulped versions of the Koran and women are veiled, segregated from men and unable to work at all.
thirdly, I am rather surprised that there is no mention in the report of where those funds go, because, in the case of Greece, and Madam President is aware of this, they go on stupid things, on doing up music halls which do not contribute to growth or to employment, and which cannot be regarded as productive investments.
this is a clear case of the British government using the war on terrorism to distract attention from awkward and contentious decisions.
in the case of pre-prepared meals such as soups and sauces, it is usually not immediately obvious if it contains meat stock or animal fat. in order to read a list of ingredients correctly quite a bit of practice is needed.
some DVD Players support both formats, in which case you should select the Mixed format.
"money presented the case as a successful case of transition, but it was not," said Drescher.
that is the case with the Socorridos Hydroelectric Power Station, in the Autonomous Region of Madeira, recognised under the RegioStars initiative.
in campaigning against torture, we are campaigning for that America that is as opposed to torture as we are, which I believe to be the majority, represented in any case by those like Senator McCain.
when we are faced with a group of different societies and heterogeneous economies, as is the case today in the Europe of Eleven, or the Europe of Fifteen, and will be even more so tomorrow in the broader continental Europe, the imposition of a single currency, artificially forced on us, is a source of tensions and conflicts, while the fluctuation of exchange rates between different currencies is a source of peace.
simply pack your cases, set off and not have to organise anything yourself?
you may need to remove your laptop from its travel case so that both can be x-rayed separately.
security-type attaché cases containing dangerous goods - pyrotechnic devices, etc.
this custom designed EyeTV case is designed to protect your iPhone or iPod touch as well as your Elgato TV tuner stick.
in the Furla shop opposite the business where she sells among other things bags, cases, shoes and garments from different manufacturers, everything now revolves around Furla women's handbags; purses can be obtained starting at €75.
from instrument cases and music stands, to computer cables and educational CDs.
pump up your tyres, oil your chain, pack your cases and.... leave straight away!
the supplied holder case can be attached to a belt or hung from the neck or shoulder with a neck strap.
double shell constructed plastic case with dark-grey foam inlay with compartments for one device of the Micro- or Visual-series and up to four measuring adapters.
distributors resp. world distributors, and in individual cases producers in collaboration with a distribution agency, are eligible to apply.
her strategy: rather than piling all the plaintiffs into this case - putting all her eggs in one basket, so to speak - she will file multiple cases, if need be, to keep the pressure on.
for that reason, I wish to inform my colleagues that I shall not be pursuing the case any further.
but this is just one of many things that need doing: almost 50 years after the construction of the space observation radar TIRA, the case, known as the radar dome, is to be completely rebuilt.
after that, the last quarter of the new case will be put in place.
these can be detected and used to determine the composition of the case.
with this plan, stocks will have been replenished within ten years so that Europeans can look at them in a display case, and we shall all be eating imported fish.
here you can find the Tavern with the bizarre name "Dragontooth Tavern," the tooth itself is shown in a glass case inside the tavern.
when the facsimile and case are displayed vertically, the inscription will show through the base.
each one of the massive cast elements of these lamps is manually moulded in sand. after casting, the mould is used up and has to be replaced.
this is so far the only cast from the planed, numbered edition of 10 copies.
Mr President, we are touching on many different areas here this afternoon, and that is what is so wonderfully exciting about sitting here in the Council Presidency chair.
even though the number of women in the European Parliament continues to increase, inequality continues to exist when it comes to the really important positions in the political bodies, such as committee chairs, etc. I therefore urge each and every committee to put gender mainstreaming into practice in its own work, since this is one way of enabling women to take part fully in the decision-making processes of the EU.
it proposes radical changes to the structure of the EU, notably by upgrading the High Representative as Vice-President of the Commission and a chair of the Council, with a tripartite service of diplomats beneath him.
this report makes it abundantly clear that more than one third of our budget disappears into the ridiculous travelling circus between the three chairs of the European Parliament.
Mr President, as a pan-European, I have had the good fortune to have been able to work towards this day since the 1970s and to assist Otto von Habsburg in ensuring that an empty chair was placed here in 1979 in protest against the exclusion of the peoples of Central and Eastern Europe from the European Communities and as a signal for the process of reunification, the final stage of which we are initiating today.
and I have to say that where we do not have problems with the Council, which is currently practising the empty chair policy, or the Commission, we put shackles on ourselves, we put spokes in the wheels, to the point that this recommendation has had to go to the Committee on the Rules and the Conference of Presidents before coming here today.
the European Commission has ordered Italy to recover aid amounting to €2.75 million from New Interline, an Italian producer of chairs, located in the region of Basilicata.
that comment aside, I would immediately like to raise again the matter of the chair to invoke the Viola report, which envisages "the appropriations necessary for a parliamentary calendar comprising 11 ordinary sessions and 6 additional sessions'.
the Seville Summit has done nothing to solve the financial problems which stand in the way of EU enlargement, and failed to reach agreement on 14 EU agencies for which a chair is yet to be found, but has once against spoken out against immigration without offering a solution.
Mr Elles, I consider it a dangerous initiative at this stage to do as one amendment proposes and put Turkey's chair outside the door and talk only in terms of a special relationship.
lateral raises are where you sit down on a weight bench or a chair would work.
however, could I take this opportunity to ensure that, with the good offices of the Commission, and utilising the partnership agreements we have with Nigeria, there will be a greater understanding, not only of the respect for human rights, but also of our total abhorrence of the death penalty in any form, whether it be by electric chair or by stoning or by any other method.
I wish her every success in the performance of her mandate and invite her to take the chair.
indeed, just as Lahoud's chair at the talks is vacant, so - in the eyes of the world and under the country's 150-year old constitution - is Lebanon's presidency.
this way you hang up or take down your hammock chair at a moment's notice.
in 1972, the Stokke group, which includes the Norwegian company Stokke A / S and the Netherlands company Stokke Nederland BV, put the Tripp Trapp high chair on the market.
the BarCamp is a non-conference collaboration, where anyone can "get in the chair, suggest a topic and talk to others in order to encourage free thinking, curiosity, disclosure and dissemination of issues related to the Web A unconference (unconference) then a meeting whose theme for discussion is decided by the participants rather than predetermined in advance by the organizers, an open meeting whose contents are proposed by the participants themselves.
strapped to a potty-chair in her home in Temple City, Los Angeles, California, Genie wasn't taught to speak, and was denied normal human interaction.
in front of parliament in Skopje, Vladimir Kavardarkov, 54, was preparing a small stage and pulling up chairs in front of tents set up by those who will boycott the referendum.
responsible IT Company Enlogit in the Ústí region then thinks about the health of its employees, and for each laptop purchased they bought ergonomic chairs and keyboards, support their work from home and use catering services provided by a local sheltered workshop for their corporate events.
his first big chair was "Grasshopper," which initially was a failure 1931st It would later become a high price.
a man falls off his chair, perhaps overcome with aquavit.
this game is so wildly addictive that you won't be able to leave your chair.
the Round Table permanent delegations will be made up of EESC members and CDES members; each delegation will be led by the president of the institution concerned, who will also co-chair the Round Table meetings.
Professor Fred Mulder, chair of the EADTU task force on open education and UNESCO chair in Open Educational Resources, is leading the initiative.
in 1909 he returned to Britain to take up a chair at Leeds, continuing his work on the nature of X-rays.
on this pages you receive information on the different study courses on which the chair inside of the teaching program is involved.
hello and welcome to the course guidance at the chair of Business Informatics and Systems Engineering.
as one who saw in the New Year in France, I am particularly grateful for Spain's role in lending Chirac and Jospin a little small change.
the Commission also recommends to the Member States that the national law should foresee a compulsory dual display of prices after the official adoption of the conversion rate; a separate compulsory display of the possible charges for a payment in euro during the period between the setting of the conversion rate and the official date of the euro introduction; and the compulsory use of the euro as change in transactions in sales outlets from the first day of the changeover
since December, banks have been delivering euro cash to retailers and other businesses, so that they can also give change in euro as from 1 January.
if the checkout assistant has national currency easily accessible and visible to customers, some customers paying in national currency might ask for their change in national currency, which would be highly counterproductive overall.
but the fact is known as not to be evil Google in order to enter with a certain vulgar Mouxiang has quietly done a lot of changes, such as right Gtalk little small change.
with the withdrawals over bank counters and change given in shops, over 60 million people are now in possession of euro notes and over 200 million possess euro coins.
furthermore, from the second week of January 2002, retail businesses should only give change in euros rather than in the national currency.
crane Payment Solutions' CurrenzaTM series, offers the world's only 60 note recycler, allowing operators to accept higher denominations and increase their profit by being able to recycle bills it receives and in turn dispense them as change.
the two-month period in which the DM and the euro will circulate in parallel, when a bill can be paid with DM and euros together but when change is to be given in euros, requires preparation.
when receiving a payment in litas, the change will be given in euro.
but that is small change to some of the Russian rich.
if universal conformity to a rules-based international order still seems like a distant prospect, an important reason is that countries that should be leading the charge still so often behave like rogue states.
providing guidance for the authorities in charge of market surveillance for machinery, consumer protection, customs and road safety;
the employees of Exoterm-it, the Development and Research Department are in charge of quality management of existing products and of development of new products.
the children's parents, collaborators and friends were invited, while educators and children were in charge of the celebration.
charges for shipping, freight, insurance and related tax charges will be the responsibility of the buyer.
- Level of awareness = know where my actions come from and take charge.
ladies and gentlemen, if I were in charge of this institution, I would ensure that it acted sensibly, that it operated at the lowest possible cost, and especially that it did not abuse and artificially extend its powers and its bureaucracy.
but, when he is sworn in on May 7, he will retake formal charge of a country whose politics - even Putin's own political future - has turned unpredictable.
the President stressed that everyone was aware of Germany's obligation to maintain delicate balances in foreign affairs. however, he defended Merkel against charges of pursuing a new policy with reference to China.
Qatar and Saudi Arabia are also sending arms to Syrian opposition groups, but the Arab League and the Gulf Cooperation Council are paralyzed. without a great power that is willing both to share the lead and to push from behind, regional organizations cannot take charge in their own neighborhood.
our staff will take charge of packing them up and putting them into the boxes, in order, and then transferring them, and no but you can access them.
we find undertakings that resort to illegal workers, especially from non-EU countries, or factories such as ThyssenKrupp, with their old-style industrial arrogance; those who should be defending the interests of the workers often consent to, if not connive in such situations, instead of being vigilant and quick to point out failings in the safety system to those in charge; finally, the works inspectorate and other bodies in charge of control and monitoring often fail to show much initiative.
the fact that soldiers from my own country are working together with others in taking charge of Afghanistan means that I am very aware of the implications when I say that the situation could indeed arise in which these conditions make things far more dangerous for individual soldiers on the ground in Afghanistan than does anything currently being planned in Iraq.
you're still in charge with us, as much as you can be or wish to be.
in his capacity as Commander in Chief of the VRS, General Mladic had authority over the entire operations of the VRS and therefore assumed full responsibility for them, given that he was in charge of planning and directing the overall operations of the VRS, as well as controlling the activities of all of its officers and subordinate units.
"it's disturbing how much pressure it took to get this commonsense step from the guy in charge of protecting the air we breathe," said Lori Ann Burd of the Center for Biological Diversity.
9 And Nephi, who was the father of Nephi, who had the charge of the records, a did not return to the land of Zarahemla, and could nowhere be found in all the land.
it seemed that everyone, when they were in charge of caring for AIBO, observed him in their own way.
[[Jonathan Archer]] had convinced [[Gralik]], the Xindi in charge of the processing center to sabotage the kemocite, which caused further delays in completing the weapon.
that also means, however, that the actual charge must be brought before national courts by national public prosecutors.
as the European Parliament knows, the Commission has received specific charges relating to the application of the national provisions transposing the directives which you referred to into Greek law.
that is why I now return to Annex K. I have said to the Council of Ministers that the Commission would not press charges or start infringement proceedings against those Member States that would continue to apply Annex K as if it were still in force - which it will not be.
the case is one of several corruption charges pending against her.
the foundation for such a law enforcement competence must first be laid at the European level, in other words, a Treaty amendment is needed to do it, and an effective instrument needs to be created, one that can actually deal with cross-frontier crime in all the Member States efficiently, not only carrying out investigations, but also bringing charges that result in prosecution and, finally, punishment.
with respect to the charge of accepting foreign European Union funds without authorisation, the Commission insists that direct grants to civil society are perfectly proper and are covered by the EU-Egypt Framework Convention on Financial and Technical Cooperation.
rights brought home one day; detention for a month without charge the next.
however, this does not appear to be an end to the matter, and charges may yet be pressed in another court.
subsequently the Peruvian Attorney-General requested his extradition from Chile in order to face a total of 12 charges, including using a death squad to kill 25 people in two separate incidents.
there have been charges relating to the application of national legislation, there has been an exchange of correspondence which started in the summer, in August to be precise, between the Greek government and the European Commission, staff from my directorate have visited Greece and examined the institutional framework and its application and we have requested additional information further to a letter sent by the Greek government on 9 November.
when they were initially held without charge last year, the EU made its concern clear at the highest levels, with respect not only to the imprisonment without charge, but also to the intensive and prejudicial press campaign against the accused.
the international community must take decisive action to secure the freedom of all humanitarian organisation activists and to have the charges against them dropped.
information on rights and information about the charges (summer 2010);
I wish to emphasise the importance of direct consultations between the authorities in European Union countries in order to do away with parallel proceedings and avoid situations where the relevant institutions in a particular state have to subjectively determine sentences for charges brought against citizens, in most cases, due to a lack of information.
in other words, he would "kill them" where they were found, not only on the battlefield, but also in other sovereign countries, such as Pakistan, without charge or trial.
we have to draw up charges against Milosevic, and so great pressure must be put on Mrs Arbour to persuade her finally to explain what she intends to do at the first opportunity; there has to be a huge information campaign, and Yugoslavia must be brought into Europe, something that we have been calling for for more than 20 years, Mr Fischer, bearing in mind that in 1981 Marco Pannella called in this House for the then Yugoslavia to be integrated into the European Union.
nearly two years after a college student died during a fraternity hazing ritual in Pennsylvania's Pocono Mountains, murder charges have been filed against five people.
no decision has been made about whether Stewart will face charges.
this is a very serious charge, Minister, and comes from one of the banking world's own leading members.
it is the main task of the grand jury to review the available evidence in cases of possible felonies and to decide whether charges should be brought.
however, this does not necessarily mean that the grand jury is ultimately being engaged in order to decide whether to bring charges.
in the letter, Mr Snowden said he believed the support of the international community could persuade the US government to abandon criminal charges against him.
in the determination of his civil rights and obligations or of any criminal charge against him, everyone is entitled to a fair and public hearing within a reasonable time by an independent and impartial tribunal established by law.
incidentally, Mr Danilishin has never been a member of any political party, so the charge brought against him is entirely economic in nature.
the specific charges have not been made public, though under Cuban law, a Cuban citizen or a foreign visitor can be arrested for nearly anything under the claim of "dangerousness."
Turkey thus argues that the charge of genocide is designed to besmirch Turkey's honor and impede its progress towards EU accession.
much space was devoted in the recommendation precisely to the defence of fundamental rights, with particular attention given to victim protection, prison conditions, prisoners' rights and procedural guarantees, including the right to be told one's rights and to the assistance of an officially appointed lawyer, the right to evidence, the right to be informed of the nature of and the reasons for the charges and to gain access to the relevant documents in an understandable language, the right, then, to an interpreter.
it is an absurd charge, but absurd charges can curry public support if presented in a slick, well-funded format.
seemingly invincible for many years, the former dictator's final collapse began in London in October 1998, when Spanish lawyers, Judge Baltasar Garzón of Spain, and Scotland Yard brought charges against him.
moreover, the United States has been squandering much of its capacity to promote human rights internationally. in responding to the terrorist attacks on its own soil on September 11, 2001, the US has resorted to such measures as prolonged indefinite detention without charges, trials before military commissions lacking due process safeguards, and cruel, inhuman, and degrading treatment of detainees, including torture.
despite this, on three occasions I was accused of breaching the law - while the television station was fined for broadcasting reports I had drafted for the European Parliament - on the ridiculous charge that I had created imbalance in my own programme.
the right of the accused to be informed of the charge in his or her own language is undoubtedly a fundamental element in the right to a defence, without which no trial can be a fair one.
on December 16, Orhan Pamuk, one of Turkey's most famous writers, will enter an Istanbul court to face a charge of "insulting the national identity" after he advocated open discussion of the Turkish genocide of 1.5 million Armenians in 1915 and 1916.
we respect the independence of the judiciary in Greece and the cooperation we have thus far been given from the Greek authorities, but when these people have already been in prison for three weeks without charge and now have a further two weeks before charges are brought, I hope you will agree that there is an urgent humanitarian need for an appeal on their behalf and also a need to remind the Greek authorities of their absolute duty under the Convention on Human Rights to bring charges before defendants.
Michael Vick, a star quarterback in the US National Football League, served time in prison for running a vicious dog-fighting operation, and arrests of players on charges ranging from illegal possession of drugs and weapons to domestic battery have been a regular occurrence.
imagine, colleagues, that last autumn Romania's Interior Minister had proposed detention of suspects for three months without charge or that the Bulgarian Prime Minister had used the secret services to spy on his colleagues.
the charges filed by the US justice department include espionage and theft of government property.
this serious charge gives Castro the chance to impose excessively severe punishments under Law 88.
while Justice Department officials declined to explain the reasoning behind the decision in the Ensign case, Mr. Brand and other ethics lawyers said the department appeared wary of taking on political prosecutions after a number of high-profile setbacks for its public integrity section, including the decision last year to drop the prosecution against former Senator Ted Stevens amid charges of prosecutorial misconduct.
we are worried that the police in Bangladesh are hunting for her after a court in Dhaka issued a new warrant for her arrest and for the seizure of her possessions, renewing the charge of blasphemy made in 1994, and we are alarmed that a new reward of FRF 33 000 has been offered.
one of Chávez's discredited predecessors was impeached on flimsy charges of malfeasance; Ecuador's Congress declared a disastrous chief executive "mentally incompetent"; in Peru, an autocratic president, after months of domestic and international pressure, was forced into exile.
another potent symbol can be found in the charges leveled by economist Joseph Stiglitz at his former employers, the World Bank, and even more importantly, at the IMF - the major transnational organ of the neoclassical doctrine.
having practiced long-term detentions without charge, trial, or access to family or counsel; having sexually humiliated and tortured prisoners, some of them to death; and having failed to hold accountable any of the high-level officials responsible for the policies that led to those crimes, the US is now seen as a hypocrite when it calls on other governments not to engage in such abuses.
one of Chávez 's discredited predecessors was impeached on flimsy charges of malfeasance; Ecuador' s Congress declared a disastrous chief executive "mentally incompetent"; in Peru, an autocratic president, after months of domestic and international pressure, was forced into exile.
moreover, no charges were brought against the firm and the case was handled on the basis that the other parties involved in the operation instigated the fraud.
while President Barack Obama has released a few prisoners, notably the Chinese Uighurs, and sent another for a real trial in New York City, he is now, chillingly, signalling that he is about to begin "preventive detention," which would empower him to hold forever an unspecified number of prisoners without charges or trials.
Paul Coggins, Mr. Ensign's lead lawyer, said in an interview that he received a phone call from a Justice Department prosecutor on Monday and a follow-up the next day, telling him that the department was not seeking charges against his client.
Mr President, I speak on behalf of one of my constituents, John Packwood, a British citizen who has recently been extradited from Spain to Morocco to face charges of drug smuggling in spite of a complete lack of evidence.
George Webster, 28, faced the charges during a hearing at the High Court in Glasgow.
initially, Blair attempted to force through detention without charge for up to 90 days.
the BBC faces a prima facie charge of breaching its Royal Charter, specifically in its failure to provide balanced and objective reporting of current affairs.
weeks after the attack, a federal grand jury slapped Saipov with a 22-count indictment that included eight charges of murder in aid of racketeering, typically used by federal prosecutors in organized crime cases, and a charge of violence and destruction of motor vehicles.
today, those who contradicted us stand accused of the infamous charge of contaminating the population.
the post was a reversal from just a day ago, when Mr. Trump said in a number of interviews that he was indeed serious about the charge.
he said the house was already of interest to local police and that no charges had yet been filed against the arrested men.
but even before the latest revelations, the Bush administration's assaults on civil liberties were legion, including its imprisonment of hundreds of men without charges at Guantánamo Bay in an effort to evade judicial review of their cases.
with regard to prosecution I note, with disappointment, that very often charges against criminals exploiting victims of trafficking - for example for sexual reasons - are very weak, focusing only on the simple exploitation of prostitution instead of on the very real charge, which should be the reduction of victims to slavery conditions.
but holding 300 Lebanese and nearly 10,000 Palestinians - all of the first group and many of the second group without charge or trial - has proven to be a major source of irritation to the Arab peoples of the region.
nevertheless, he said that in the case of Petr Švácha, who was cleared of the charges and penalized with a fine, the central government can negotiate with the local government in Darjeeling, under the jurisdiction of which the matter belongs.
a tweet from Republican Texas Gov. Rick Perry's verified account on Sunday night included a disparaging image of the Democratic district attorney who is at the center of his criminal indictment on charges of abuse of power.
there are, moreover, reports that in recent weeks, a significant number of bloggers and political activists have either been charged with criminal offences, such as subverting state power, or have been detained without charge.
charges of blasphemy, prohibition of conversion to Christianity, harassment on a daily basis, murder, all that is happening.
even though his sister, Yingluck Shinawatra, is now in power, Thaksin is still trying to evade trial in Thai courts on a wide array of financial charges.
the extended detention of dozens of individuals in Guantanamo - without charge and without trial - is a basic abrogation of this right.
manning, who was born Bradley Edward but has spoken openly about identifying as a woman as early as adolescence, was convicted in 2013 on 20 charges, including six Espionage Act violations, computer fraud and theft.
our resolution rightfully raises the issue of the charges against the leaders of the political opposition, charges that look ever more selective in nature, and insists on a guarantee of the transparency of the investigations and of the judicial process.
her lawyers said the court refused to grant her bail over charges of extorting 50 million taka ($729,700) from a businessman when she was PM.
Mr. Ensign's lawyers said the Justice Department had "informed us that Senator Ensign is no longer a target of its investigation and that it has no plans to bring any charges against him in this matter."
I call on the Iranian authorities to release unconditionally Ms Abdi and Ms Safazadeh and drop all charges against them and their fellow women's rights campaigners.
furthermore, Cambodia's only independent radio station was closed with the charge of inciting riots.
though the outcome of my efforts has been demonstrably positive, my government continues to treat dissent as defection, and seeks to criminalize political speech with felony charges that provide no defence.
I appeal to all those involved in the conflict to cease forthwith from violence, and I call on the Turkish Government to accept the Kurds "lawfully elected representatives as negotiating partners and to drop the latest charges against them.
on the other hand, it has to be said that the Chinese Government has a moral obligation, among others, to release immediately and unconditionally all those detained solely for engaging in peaceful protest and to account for all those who have been killed or have gone missing, and all those detained, indicating the nature of the charges against them.
the charges again rest on electronic files, supposedly found in the defendants "homes.
he was arrested in 2003, at the age of 17, and is being held in administrative detention in Israel, without charges and without a trial.
Perry has pleaded not guilty and called the charges a political ploy.
after Manafort and his minions helped Yanukovych defeat former Prime Minister Yuliya Tymoshenko in the 2010 presidential election, Yanukovych had her imprisoned on trumped-up charges, with help from a legal brief prepared - at Manafort's bidding - by the prominent American law firm Skadden Arps.
hearts to fight SFA over Neilson charge and Warburton wary of January signings disrupting squad unity
alas, the government crackdown on Islamic militants is already petering out, as demonstrated by charges being dropped against a prominent Islamic leader.
it is the least sensitive charge under the act and there is no suggestion of criminal intent.
Mr Cubin maintains that those are trumped-up charges and that no evidence has been produced to substantiate them.
thus any use of this regulation to raise charges on domestic payments must be firmly rejected by the European institutions.
it would make sense, therefore, if the person now appointed to head the European Monetary Institute could later take charge of the European Central Bank.
if anyone like him had been in charge in his grandfather's time, "he would never have gone there."
a Steering Committee chaired by the Commission (DG IA - External Political Relations) has been in charge of the organization of the architects competition.
the Article 50 Task Force will be in charge of preparing and conducting the negotiations with the UK, taking account of the framework for its future relationship with the European Union.
the new generation took charge of the business only at the last moment and without the benefit of the expertise and experience acquired by the owner.
the executing agencies of the programme will be the Central Bank and the ministries in charge of framing and implementing social policy.
why did the NATO authorities in charge not have information on the permitted flight altitude in the region?
on the initiative of the town of Rochefort and the Centre International de la Mer (International Sea Centre), a maritime cultural centre in the Corderie Royale (Royal Rope Makers), was created at the end of 1992. the Association Hermione-La Fayette was put in charge of piloting the project.
he previously took charge of AZEK's affairs on a fiduciary basis.
until then, interference from China was covert and subtle, so that the public perception was that Hong Kong's Chief Executive, Tung Chee-hwa, was in charge.
a technical training course organized on Sylvie Grenier's initiative, coordinator and regional person in charge always very active and effective, was held in Lempdes, near Clermont-Ferrand, supervised by Jean-Pierre PICHEREAU, Expert YWF, 6th dan.
"it was probably a real crossroads," he recalled, of taking charge of Alloa.
chest of drawers made of epoxy coated steel RAL 7035 with 2, 3 drawers.
if BNFL had such a blue chip record in the field of public health and public safety why do lobsters along some parts of the east coast have levels of contamination 247 times greater than was the case only in 1993?
those who are looking for some action can enjoy our new club 'La Kashba "with different dj's and music.
the owner of the club says that the invaders of the farm made ​ ​ her an unfair competition, since they were selling drinks for three Euros, while in the club worth 10.
14 For behold, they would break out in great numbers, and would fight with stones, and with clubs, or whatsoever thing they could get into their hands, insomuch that we did slay upwards of two thousand of them after they had surrendered themselves prisoners of war.
the average Orcish cleaver or club is a big, crude affair much like the Orc on the blunt end of it.
option golfs "Escape" is as easy to play as an iron combined with the distance of a wood and forgiving like no other club in the bag.
for most of our evolutionary history, human beings - and our primate ancestors - have lived in small groups, in which violence could be inflicted only in an up-close and personal way, by hitting, pushing, strangling, or using a stick or stone as a club.
the assailants were said to have used rifles, grenades machetes, spears, PanGas, clubs and other arms to kill the people they found inside the church.
clubs and balls can be hired through our restaurant, as well as in a separate building by the golf course in summer.
a method suitable to players from all levels, based on the handling of the golf clubs accordingly to the pendular movement theory and the muscular agility required to facilitate a flowing movement (swing).
the club designs and supplies its own products such as articles of outer clothing, sports clothing and footwear, or has them manufactured via its network of approved resellers.
- transportation to a nearby sports club where you can use a golf simulator, tennis courts, jacuzzi, and sauna, exercise in the gym or play squash.
gallery D 137, Griboyedov club - all these echo the Art-clinic.
the concept of a closed, exclusive club is alien to the goal of "an ever closer union among the peoples of Europe" to which the Treaty of Rome commits us.
the role of and the way in which sports clubs are organised are important factors in how they negotiate with the European Commission and with the Committee on Culture and Education and the European Parliament.
the CoR also supported local club / school partnerships promoting young people's participation in sport outside school hours.
"one in three Europeans participate regularly in sporting activities, and there are more than 600 000 sports clubs in the European Union.
in my small country alone, for example, two million people - one-quarter of the entire population - are members of sports clubs, which number 14, 000.
thanks to the clubs children do not need to spend long hours alone in the afternoon while their parents work longer days than before, there being no let-up in the labour shortage that is beginning to emerge.
the European Commission has adopted a final decision finding that the recently amended measures in favour of sports clubs in Italy no longer constitute state aid.
that is why the rapporteur's approach of arousing interest in Europe in areas that citizens are passionate about, for example sports clubs, cultural initiatives and leisure activities, is a very viable one.
the principles of subsidiarity and proportionality are unambiguous in indicating that centralised legislation at European level far away from the sports associations, clubs and practitioners would not add any value to sport but, on the contrary, afford it significant disadvantages.
draws attention to her huge breasts, disproportionate to his body and small waist, but also a beautiful face, light eyes, and a perfect ass, who delivers in every scene to every cock to ride around.
in this video, which is part of the film Liliane Tiger AKA Filthy Whores she can be seen doing a striptease and lets one cock to burst.
operation was performed or because there is no room in the table cache), the counter is decremented if the table has been updated at any point.
devices of check of connection of electric meters, Devices for checking the counters of the electric power, Electricity supply meters, Induction single-phase electric meters, Electric meters induction three-phase.
operating standards are being maintained through extended hours for certain weekday counter services and use of alternative means of government dealings.
the second popular explanation of Putin's shift is that he is irrational, and that Russia's foreign policy is merely an extension of the fantasies of a man who stages stunts like leading Siberian white cranes along their migration route in a motorized hang glider.
it is the habitat of rare plants and animals like the white-tailed sea eagle, osprey, crane, great bittern, the European pond turtle, beaver or European otter.
its emblem, a stylized crane, is recognized almost everywhere as the symbol of the Polish flag carrier.
• Any riders who change their wheel (s) or cycle during the race must ensure that they also transfer their chip.
this initiative has also encouraged more and more staff members to cycle to work.
it would be better to state that you intend to walk or cycle for 30 minutes a day.
cycles must be in an acceptable condition, have functioning lights and a correctly fitted ChampionChip timekeeping chip.
riders not wearing a helmet or whose cycle does not comply with the organiser's or the UCI / NCF's joint start regulations may be either refused permission to start or not registered as having started.
there are not statistical data on the number of bicycles present in this region considering that here everyone uses a bike. it's not a case that this is the land where many cycle champions come from.
this will be achieved through encouraging people to walk or cycle for short journeys and offering training to professional drivers.
the future of Europe cannot be held hostage by electoral cycles, party politics or short-term wins.
the consumer's cycle will be the protagonist in the last part of the year due to the increase in the sales figures during the Christmas sales season.
first of all, have the accession states requested these earlier dates?
the Commission in close cooperation with Member States will draw a technical database, including risk data and risk scenarios, within three years from the date of the adoption of this Directive.
the expiry date for the implementation of the Transparency Directive by the Member States of the European Community was 20th January 2007.
in case of written agreement changes, a new date of delivery or a new term of delivery shall be agreed on at the same time, if necessary.
but the Council is obliged to comply with the institutional procedures of the European Union and the consequences of the accession of the Member States on the specific dates set.
from time to time we like to distribute via this email list a kind of newsletter to inform you about our work and about dates of the show.
the proposed date of entry into force is 1 January 2005.
the date of 31 March in the Commission proposal will be replaced by that of 15 May as the deadline for the communication of the compensation decision by Member States to producers and the Commission.
"white days" no new dates at the moment for winter 2011!
hence, you don't lose more time till an date of a public auction is settled, because exactly this time costs you expensive money.
delay of payment for our services begins, as soon as we furnish a reminder for the payment or require payment within a certain time period or at a certain date, even if this is not expressly termed a reminder.
a recent meeting of the electoral experts confirmed that all member states had taken legislative or administrative measures to allow the registration of nationals of the new member states to their electoral rolls even before the date of accession.
in this context, the Council also invited the Commission to come forward with Community rules on products that will allow further reduction of VOCs emissions to be in force before the date of the first review of the proposed directive.
based upon the progress made, the Commission proposed that the country be given a date to start negotiations.
in case of breach of the delivery date specified for each item in more than 10 days, the buyer may choose to cancel the order and receive the amount paid.
the Lithuanian authorities had a target date and they must now set a new date.
should you yourself take the initiative to apply for a position with Deutsche Börse aside from situations vacant, we would advise you to calculate a lead time of around three months before the date you would like to start work.
I also call for individual countries to be given possible target dates.
I believe that the timetable to be approved by the Council of Ministers next week will set very precise dates for the new Member States to join Schengen.
with dispatch with delivery date we consider the average dispatch time of the post office.
I urge that there should be an EU-wide referendum on the Constitution on the same day in all the Member States; the date I would suggest is 8 May 2005.
seconds since the Unix Epoch, similar to the values returned by time () and used by date ().
please use the form below by entering the number of persons per room and your travel dates.
while I understand the concerns of the Parliament, the date proposed will not give us enough time to gain experience with the programme.
in terms of Cyprus, I would like a clear statement that neither the Commission nor the Council intends to set a date for the opening of negotiations.
however, I would not like to see the new date being used as an excuse for having a long, drawn-out IGC from autumn 2003 to May 2004.
Parliament would like a clear date for action on this.
it is best to agree the date and time of the handover personally with your MEPLAN project manager.
it agreed to hold an extra meeting on a date yet to be set before the European Council on 13 and 14 December in order to reach an agreement that would enable negotiations with the European Parliament to start with the aim of approving the texts before the end of the year.
within the framework programme there are given dates for what you can apply, etc.
a specific date must be set for the signing of a final commitment.
times, dates and deadlines set for delivery shall be deemed to have been duly respected, if and when the goods were dispatched on time.
under the new agreement, Member States will receive the names, addresses, tax identification numbers and dates of birth of their residents with accounts in Andorra, as well as other financial and account balance information.
that date has been set by the Commission with the agreement of the Spanish authorities and Minas de Almadén in order to leave enough time to reorganise and restructure that company, and I think it deserves all of our support.
- the evaluation report on the implementation of the programmes should be available on time and preferably before the scheduled date in 2005.
"Poland has set 2003 as a target date for accession" Mr Verheugen said.
the Summit will set a date for the next round of negotiations for the new EU-Russia Agreement, for which the mandate was adopted by the EU Council of Ministers on 26 May 2008.
should you change your itinerary or dates of travel, this may affect the fare required to be paid.
so in supporting a favourable opinion on the application of summer-time and harmonization of the date, I once again invite the Commission and the Council to draw up a detailed report on the consequences of the application of summer-time, by consulting representatives of interested sectors and national experts in the Member States, to bear in mind the principle of subsidiarity and the responsibility of each Member State, and to take greater account of the opinion of Parliament as the opinion of a freely elected assembly and the expression of the will of the European people.
on the other hand, it should also be remembered that this date is in some way subordinate to the security of energy supply that the European Union needs, as this is a factor that the European Commission will undoubtedly take into account when formulating new proposals.
under the new EU-Swiss agreement, Member States will receive, on an annual basis, the names, addresses, tax identification numbers and dates of birth of their residents with accounts in Switzerland, as well as other financial and account balance information.
some countries plan to open up their national markets fully to competition well ahead of the 2009 target date set by the Postal Directive.
prima - Moda Tessuto steps into the spotlight in advance with the respect to the traditional fair dates, allowing the companies extra time to plan their work on the new collections.
as the European Union indicated in its declaration of 20 April, establishment of the Commission makes it possible to plan the date of the general elections.
please specify your date of departure. formato data non valido.
if subsequent alterations to the contract are agreed, a new delivery date or a delivery period shall be agreed where necessary.
please contact us if you would like further information on tailored modules, dates and / or fees.
if you would like to post an event as part of the German-Israeli Year of Science and Technology 2008, please enter the relevant details of the event including title, date, place and contact information.
Ankara is reiterating its desire to establish in December a date for the start of accession negotiations, but clearly, however much good will it may have, the European Council cannot set dates for the start of negotiations until the Copenhagen criteria have been fully complied with.
secondly, on the European search and capture order, as you will see in the 2001 work programme, we shall have very concrete dates and deadlines for the Commission to present its proposals.
I consider it too early at present to give a final answer regarding the decision which may be made at the Copenhagen Summit, but let me stress that in order to obtain a date Turkey must fulfil the conditions just like every other candidate country.
with ten more days to go before the 25 July date for the transposition of the new Framework Directive for electronic communications networks and services, Commissioners Liikanen and Monti will tomorrow host a workshop in Brussels.
the date on which the Commission must adopt the convergence report is determined, firstly, by when the Member State presents its request - the Commission cannot decide when a Member State is to present that request - and, secondly, by when the Commission has the reliable and rigorous data that it needs in order to carry out an appropriate, rigorous and accurate assessment of whether or not the convergence criteria have been fulfilled.
the recital indicated specifically that the decision should be taken on the basis of requests from the acceding states for derogations, which would not in principle extend beyond the dates mentioned.
the agreed delivery dates shall be deemed to be met upon notification of readiness for delivery, even if the items or services could not be delivered or performed in due time for reasons we are not responsible for.
the Regulation does not affect the current EU total ban on the feeding of meat and bone meal to farmed animals, which is a separate issue and remains in force without any date set to terminate it.
moreover, the EU must make clear that accession ultimately will be based on merit, and that target dates are aspirational, not binding.
today, just three months before the departure date, this deeply deceitful démarche has disintegrated before May's eyes - as well it should.
all cancellations made less than 2 days before the date the activity is to run, cannot be refunded.
nevertheless, children born more than 8 weeks prior to the due date and those weighing under 1500 grams are still at significant risk of not surviving the first days or weeks or be affected later in life.
I believe it would be a right and proper endorsement if we were able to send a signal to the new Turkish Government that if it fulfils the Copenhagen criteria of democratic values deeply entrenched and implemented in law, then perhaps the date of June 2004 would be appropriate for negotiations.
we confirmed the 2012 target date for the establishment of the Common European Asylum System.
all oral tests will take place in Brussels at a later date.
by that same date, they must submit their draft budgetary plan to the Commission and to the Eurogroup.
hence our urgent appeal in favour of the introduction of a social scoreboard, similar to the one already in use in the internal market, which details specific measures, expiry dates and deadlines.
(SK) A year ago it still looked like the date for the enlargement of the Schengen area would be postponed until 2009.
moreover, the Council would point out that, until now, there has been no formal confirmation of the date on which the current accession negotiations with the applicant countries will be brought to a close.
concerning the start-date of the negotiations, we trust the wisdom of the European Council, of the Prime Ministers and Presidents to make the political judgement with regard to when in 2005 they deem it appropriate to start the accession negotiations.
you are organising a beach tennis tournament and would like to contact the DBTV regarding dates and information about the event?
a date has been set for elections, and it must be kept to; the electoral commission must start preparing for them now, and that means, above all else, making sure that the electoral register is correct.
therefore, the approximate number of books to be published and edited every year, as well as the expected delivery date, are known beforehand by the contracting authority.
on this page you will find the current dates, fees, course details, and general course information.
for jobs that are repeated automatically, you can set Restrictions on future start dates.
the date of its first meeting will probably be fixed at the Association Council with Morocco in November.
this venue will be completed and inaugurated in the anniversary year, with the official date set for the last weekend in September, on 27 and 28 September.
for this reason I consider that the Council should bring every necessary pressure to bear on the Cambodian authorities to revive the 1991 Paris Accords, and I am also convinced that the Commission must take on the task of ensuring that the election date of May 1998 is respected, which, we all hope, should bring this tragic situation to an end.
if you would like an alternative date to this, additional costs will be payable.
contact us to arrange a date for a visit without any obligations.
(since, he cans obtain Rs 1000 now, exchanging the 50 stocks purchased on credit at current price) "In this case too as in the Earlier example, returns to the sellers of stocks May be negative if stock price rises to Rs 25 on the settlement date.
the two key dates in the text are 1 January 1999 (date on which the Member States are invited by the Recommendation to recognize cards which meet the standardized Community model), and 1 January 2000 (date by which cards based on the standardized Community model must be available).
we will inform you immediately we have received all goods of your order to agree a collection date. payment by EC card is not possible at the moment.
what I wish to say to you is that we have in fact organised, both with the Task Force and within the Commission, extremely regular meetings with the co-contractor and the two co-contractors, especially Steria. we can truly hope, Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, that this issue will be concluded in the coming months, with this decision on a final date, set as the start of June, when the Council will, in fact, have to make its decision.
I am told it is because the original date clashed with the European Council meeting and we wish to meet before that meeting.
it is also my understanding that no agreement was reached in conciliation on a particular date.
to build a containment regime against terrorism emanating from the Middle East, a date for America's departure from Iraq must be set.
if we do not want to let the Lisbon process become a gigantic flop, definite action will have to be taken, and the Commission will have to draw up a clear timetable stating how the aims are to be achieved, setting end dates so that the Member States can be called to account on their responsibilities.
so far from the date, by all means let us have an exchange of views on what may or may not happen, but how do we encourage our young people to go into the industry?
before the end of the year, Bulgaria and the European Union have to decide on the definitive date for closing units 3 and 4 of the Kozloduy nuclear power station.
the period begins 6 weeks after the confirmed date of delivery.
please use your mouse to select the dates you wish to book.
with respect to the latter, Article 12 (1) provides the dates in which the convenzione unica will replace existing licences for all operators and Article 12 (2) the principles the new contracts must adhere to.
the Commission encourages political dialogue within the terms of the Lusaka accords to overcome the conflict and expresses the hope that the recent declarations by President Dos Santos, inviting Mr Savimbi to set a date for his movement to end the war, will result in a dialogue for peace and national reconciliation.
in its proposal, the Commission anticipates the principle of authorisation to ratify and suggests 31 December 2008 as the target date for depositing the instruments of ratification.
a new election date could help; and we have tried to arrange this, but without success.
nevertheless, we can accept a final date of 30 April.
I would urge you not to issue a date too soon, for this will turn against us and against the process.
the MoWeS Newsletter contains up-to-date information about updates, new packages, changes and other news around MoWeS.
let us fix a date for the revision of the Financial Perspective!
1998 has been set as the date when the Parties will meet to review progress in economic reform and decide whether to move towards a free trade agreement.
Bulgaria should be able to meet the obligations of membership at the envisaged date of accession, provided that it steps up its efforts to that end in a number of areas, and that it focuses on strengthening its overall administrative capacity.
in the final confirmation of the reservation, the entry and departure dates will be indicated. this information will not be modified if you do not take possession of the accommodation on the indicated date, or if you abandon the accommodation before the planned departure date.
I would call on the Council to intervene speedily in order to ensure that the conditions established by the United Nations are respected by that date and that the Sahrawi people can express their right to self-determination and independence.
even though we have yet to set up a date for our ticket presale to start, there are tickets to be acquired!
EU legislation already sets out dates for the obligatory introduction of these safety enhancing technologies in the EU.
just enter the date of the next meeting of your EU project and all members that are able to attend will be displayed (it is also possible to enter alternative dates to evaluate the date that suits the most members, Demo.
the new regulations extend until March 2013 the preconditions for migration from SIS 1 + to SIS II, given that these preconditions for migration will not be met by 30 June 2010, the date originally planned.
it would not be wise to set any final target date because we have recently learned that schedule should not override substance.
as an ambassador you have the opportunity to invite three friends, but for reasons of space limitation is signups on the individual dates on a first come first served basis.
'with regard to finished cosmetic products, the Commission has embarked on the study of the legal aspect as far as GATT is concerned, as I said just now, and is planning to draft a proposal for a European Parliament and Council directive amending the basic Cosmetics Directive, which will confirm 1 January 1998 as the date at which experiments will be banned, other than in exceptional cases involving health risks.'
the simultaneous purchase and sale of the same amount of a given currency for two different dates, against the sale and purchase of another. a swap can be a swap against a forward.
among the twelve negotiating countries, ten have target dates for accession compatible with the Gothenburg timeframe.
the results of the Commission's negotiations will increase the supply of ferrous scrap to the EU in the short term and fix agreed dates for full liberalisation of the scrap trade.
you can set up additional dates for seminars as needed.
if you would like to book an initial consultation, please send us an e-mail to info @ clinic.avapeter.com and we will offer you several possibilities of dates to choose from.
we know that the decision on the date for opening negotiations will not be taken until the end of next year, but, with this in mind, we consider it all the more advisable that the Union should actively support the reform process already initiated by the current Turkish Government.
I believe we must consider how to fix the dates for these committee sessions, for, as has also been said before, it is disgraceful how few of us are able to participate.
in view of the proximity of the December date for the meeting in Geneva, I would like to ask, Commissioner, what kind of bridge-building and confidence-building you are engaged in at this time - having just had a moment to catch your breath after Cancún - to try to ensure that we have some success there?
as a result, you can match your addresses against postadress MOVE, the current database with relocation information, replace old addresses with new ones and therefore keep your address database up-to-date.
the Committee expressed its satisfaction at the effective level of implementation of the Schengen Acquis in the Nordic States in the light of the 26 February Council (General Affairs) confirmation of the 25 March 2001 as the date for abolishing the border controls of those countries' with the rest of the Schengen area.
the European Council calls on the Palestinian Authority to continue with the ongoing reform process, to intensify consolidation of the institutions and to set as soon as possible a date for the organisation of free and fair legislative elections.
recalling the detailed review of relations with Iran at its last meeting, and in view of the date set by the Resolution adopted by the IAEA Board of Governors on 12 September 2003, the Council considered that the Iranian nuclear programme remains an issue of grave concern and reaffirmed once again its position as outlined in the Council conclusions of 29 of September 2003.
concerning your call to speed up the e-inclusion initiative - which is planned for 2008 - I urge you not just to see the date of 2008, because 2008 is the time when we will have reached our objective.
issues affecting the general public such as the date of introduction of euro denominated bank notes and coins, conversion charges, dual pricing displays, the role of education and training (on which the Commission will present a separate communication before the end of the year) and specific issues affecting small companies;
to uphold this basic principle, we have, to begin with, proposed extending the legal basis to include Article 133 of the Treaty, but above all, we have postponed the date by which Member States will be obliged to implement it to 1 January 2007.
secondly, that there be transitional areas, of course, but with a cut-off date that was set, or in any case proposed, at first reading as 2008, if I remember rightly.
in this context, the EU looks forward to improved conditions for peaceful and democratic elections and urges the Government to announce quickly new dates for local and general elections.
it is also essential to keep to the target date of the end of 2008 proposed by the ILO.
in writing. - (IT) Following the nuclear disaster caused by the power plant in Japan, which was also related to a failure to adapt to current safety standards, we can say we have made an excellent choice when, during accession negotiations, dates were set for the definitive shut-down of three old Soviet-design nuclear power plants in Lithuania, Slovakia and Bulgaria.
the Council notes with satisfaction that a visit to Iran by the Special Rapporteur on Freedom of Expression has been arranged for November 2003, and that discussions are under way to agree a date for a visit by the Working Group on Enforced Disappearances during the first half of 2004.
the cards are valid for 12 months from the date it is issued.
first of all, because it sets a final date in accordance with our obligations under the Basel Convention.
at the suggestion of the Messe Husum management, the HUSUM WindEnergy Advisory Council confirmed the dates at their last meeting.
what happens if the event is postponed and I cannot avail of the new date?
fix the E3S date in Bad Salzuflen with just one click in your Outlook calender!
it is for that reason and in view of the sometimes considerable delays in implementing the economic and political reforms needed to create a genuine Euro-Mediterranean market that I think it necessary to revise the 2010 deadline as the date on which this free trade area will enter into force.
the recent reforms undertaken by the Turkish Government represent a real breakthrough and, while no date can be set for Turkey's accession until the political criteria are met, we will watch with interest the implementation of these reforms.
Florence confirmed 1 January 1999 as the date for economic and monetary union, as laid down in the Treaty and already confirmed in Madrid.
critics will also say that adopting such a goal without setting a target date for achieving it is largely meaningless.
most of all, I regret that the Socialist Group and the European People's Party have done this deal on pushing the date for the introduction of vehicles using carbon dioxide back to 2011 from the original proposal of the committee for 2009.
once the loading period has been established, this must be complied with because, on its expiry, seller will be free to consider buyer in default and to sell the goods to third parties; seller accepts no liability for any damage and expenses incurred in connection with any delays of means of transport, compared to the date of loading agreed to.
we have to set a date and keep to it.
the financial calendar provides you with an up-to-date list of both future and past publication dates.
the beginning of the school year is always in September, whereby each school has its own term dates.
soon you will find the exhibition dates of the first half of 2011.
the day before the arranged date, the passengers phone up to find out about the weather conditions.
however, most commentators consider that there is insufficient evidence of the advantages of and demand for an integrated numbering plan involving a European country code ("3" -xy), as proposed in the Green Paper, and that the starting date of 1 January 2000 is, in any case, unrealistic.
if you are interested in our irregular distributed travel reports archived in travelogues or dates of our slide shows join our this mailing list. fill in name and email, select Subscribe and click on GO.
today, I think it is too early to set concrete dates, but we must observe and demand progress from Turkey, as recent events, where the activities of political parties were banned, cause concern and do not show Turkey's commitment to respect civil and political freedoms and rights.
insofar as a cancellation date has been agreed upon in writing between the Hotel and the Customer, the Customer can cancel the contract before that date without being obliged to meet payment or damage claims asserted by the Hotel. (for specific information on terms of cancellation, please consult the Hotel directly.
date of referendum will not be announced until after an information campaign.
I would like to keep the date and I can accept the fallback as an addition to the text, if that meets with the approval of the House.
the dates of the exercise and details of the scenarios are not being publicly announced, in order to make it as realistic as possible.
this week a date was set for the trial of Bellona employee Alexander Nikitin.
however, we are not so naive or cynical as to deceive the European citizens by claiming that, by setting a specific date - which, furthermore, many believe to be premature - the current rail problems are going to disappear.
and we must not underestimate the importance of the repeated confirmation of 1 January 1999 as the date for the introduction of the single currency and the long-awaited unfreezing of Europol.
when it became clear that the French effort was in earnest, and a date was announced for preparatory talks on May 30, the clear timelines encouraged Palestinian officials to sign up to the process.
five months before the official date of the state elections, the red-green coalition lost in Hanover, and with that, their scant one-vote majority in Parliament over the opposition of CDU and FDP.
born in Italy, Eurostile had two designers, and two release dates, even if purists might insist that it really just had one of each. without a doubt, the typeface has had two official names.
here you can subscribe to our newsletter, if you would like to be informed regularly of our novelties, exhibition and event dates, and special offers.
many exhibitors found the initially scheduled date in the middle of April extremely late; Jagen und Fischen would have marked the end of the round of hunting exhibitions.
for total beginners only, we have special starting dates of every four weeks.
the dates set, for the end of 2008, have been adhered to, as regards the strengthening of supervisory committees, their mode of functioning, which has been improved, and the inclusion of a European dimension in the mandates of national supervisors.
on the issue of Bulgaria and Romania we need a target date, a focus.
we therefore call upon the Dublin Council to show clear-headedness, in the interests of the Union, and to refrain from confirming the date of 1 January 1999, as was incautiously done by the Florence and Madrid Councils.
the Council welcomes the ratification of the International Convention for the Protection of All Persons from Enforced Disappearance and the invitation of UN Special Rapporteur on Torture and looks forward to the fixing of an early date for a visit by UN Special Rapporteur.
the delivery of the ordered goods takes place while stocks last and / or up to a fixed dispatch date which guarantees a punctual delivery.
there will be no dramatic change in costs if the dates are changed.
this free service keeps you constantly up-to-date on the latest developments surrounding your flight.
we have stubbornly pushed ahead with the enlargement process, set a definite date for this and carefully reviewed progress.
for your reservation at the Amara Hotel Singapore, please select the dates of your stay and complete our secure online booking form.
it reports on the most important personnel changes in the field as well as event dates and birthdays of the week.
in order to avoid waiting, please contact our office for a fixed date.
whilst it is difficult to set a firm date for this, it is clear that it needs to get under way as soon as possible.
after the police officer found marijuana in the car, Mr. Orozco was issued a summons for possession and drug paraphernalia - petty offenses that each carry a $100 fine - and given a court date.
at the review of the rules scheduled for 2002, the WTO should at least agree to extend the deadline for TRIPS compliance for all developing countries and base it on development progress rather than on arbitrary dates.
coming week I have so many dates that there is no free one at all, but it means to arrange lots of things, which is really lovely!
the official name of the album is' Radio 'but a release date for the album is yet to be announced. the first single is' Cupid Baby 'and has smash hit written all over it.
this date will be set by the participants of the Kimberley Process when they meet at ministerial level in Interlaken (Switzerland) on 5 November 2002.
the dates for completion of the work on projects 1-20 and the details of the sections have been taken from the report of the High-Level Group, where indicated.
while considerable progress was made, the meeting ran into difficulty over the means of implementation (particularly in trade and finance), target dates, specific implementation timetables (especially as regards poverty, water, energy and health) and work programmes for putting the objectives into practice.
to make our program even more attractive and ensure it remains up to date, we work closely with universities and research institutes.
our exclusive interview with Independence Day Corey Taylor was conducted in late June, at the same time Collin Richardson was mixing All Hope is Gone "(no hope) And while Corey was busy with meetings to finalize details of the album, finalizing dates for the Rockstar Mayhem Tour tour, which will be co-leading with disturbed) and family obligations, he was deeply focused and friendly in conversation for 45 minutes, which was alternated with heartfelt confessions and peppered with levity.
it is always tempting to speak about very clear-cut dates but, especially with regard to membership, we know that many of negotiating countries at present are taking the working hypothesis that they will become full members in 2002 or, most of them, in 2003.
any extra work, requirement or modification in relation to the goods or their installation which is not expressly specified in the contract or which is expressly excluded by these conditions and which the Buyer requests shall, if the Seller is able and willing to agree thereto, be charged extra (including an appropriate allowance for profit) to the extent that such extra work requirement or modification increases the cost to the Seller of performance of the contract, and the Seller shall be allowed a reasonable extension or postponement of performance or delivery dates required to comply with any such request.
) The Customer's right to cancellation expires when he does not exercise his right to do so in writing to the Hotel by the appointed date, provided the Hotel has not delayed or failed to deliver a service stipulated in the admission contract.
for further information or dates of the conferences and seminars please contact us at info @ netgenium.com or by phone at + 420 242 441 548.
take note of the dates now in your agenda for the Forum for Swiss Foreign Trade and Investment.
however, in view of the paramount importance of nuclear safety, the opening of negotiations with Bulgaria should be conditional on a decision by the Bulgarian authorities before the end of 1999 on acceptable closure dates for units 1-4 in the Kozloduy nuclear power plant and upon a confirmation of the significant progress accomplished in the economic reform process.
many delegations agreed to allow public service contracts which had been awarded after a fair competitive tendering procedure to continue until their date of expiry.
what that exact date will be, will be part of the final compromise.
it's now official: after the fixture for the FC Eintracht Bamberg match against third leaguers Würzburger Kickers could not be settled due to repair works at the Fuchspark stadium, the date has now been set for 6 October.
it concerns the dates of our next mission to Israel; Mr Provan seemed to be worrying about a slight modification which had been made.
even binding agreed dates shall not be fixed dates, if they do not have expressly been specified as fixed dates.
my Group is calling for Community financing mechanisms to facilitate its introduction by the date envisaged.
further dates for groups of min. 5 People possible at all times!
the DATE _ constants are defined since PHP 5.1.1 and they offer standard date representations, which can be used along with the date format functions (like date ()).
the 2003 update reiterates that achieving a balanced budget remains central to budgetary policy but does not contain a target date.
the latter is to be handed over in March 2007, and I believe it is crucial that we make every effort to ensure that this date is met.
quick turnaround, affordable pricing, and easy online tools make expresscopy.com the perfect solution for the printing and direct marketing needs of businesses large and small, as well as for personal projects like Save the Date cards and holiday greetings.
at least they kept their shipping dates for all the prototypes and testing boards so far, so March 22th - March 26th should hopefully be fine.
the final date for the submission of applications for projects covering 1990-91 is 15 September 1990.
it's well worth marking the dates in your calendar.
no project commissions and public contact date - the best membership ever!
the usefulness of the pages depends on diversity and validity of the presented addresses and dates. thus, whoever can provide corrections or additional information is invited to do this via email.
you are entirely free to state your position as you wish, but this is about dates and calendars, not about texts and preferences regarding location.
you said there that after checking all the information, there should be an item on the agenda for the October part-session in Strasbourg on setting dates for a twelfth session in Strasbourg, from 3 to 7 November.
during the next few weeks and months, I will closely follow the preparatory process towards this date so as to ensure that the all-important EU trade concessions towards South Africa will indeed effectively kick in on this agreed date.
I wanted to know whether my offer of a date is being accepted, because if so, we can make an arrangement via the Bureau.
it will also identify a late-finish date that considers all risks for the each component by consultation with Domestic Agencies and industries.
if no specific delivery date has been agreed, we will deliver from stock as far as possible.
the EU should be setting firm targets for waste reduction, not producing non-binding aspirations for some far-distant future date.
informations for exact charges and dates, you can receive at the reception.
exhibition in Genoa, where to find all the info on current exhibitions, dates, car parks, hotels, ticket office.
read up on our current dates and events as well as on our participations on symposia, forums, etc.
I recommend, High Representative, that if we want peace we do not define any starting date.
therefore we ensure an up-to-date level of communication between the client and their agent and team.
Mr President, I am interested in your announcement about the changing of the date of the mini-session.
here you can find dates of seminars and fairs as well as news about our company and our products.
join Hyatt Gold Passport ™ and start enjoying exclusive benefits and free nights with no blackout dates at any Hyatt worldwide, including Park Hyatt ™, Andaz ™, Grand Hyatt ™, Hyatt Regency ™, Hyatt Place ™, and Hyatt Summerfield Suites ™.
if you wish to be up-to-date, please note this in your personal organizer.
the Board designated the conveners, dates, and meeting places for RI director-nominating committees that will meet in September 2007 to select directors-nominee for election at the 2008 RI Convention in Los Angeles.
see hotel photos, facilities, check available rooms for your dates and book Conte Biancamano Hotel Turin by cheapest rate.
the Siemens Financial Calendar lists all important investor relations events and their dates.
a further series of freelance tests is planned in Ireland in 2007 (date yet to be decided).
4.6 HAMM is not responsible for any delays in delivery or performance, even where fixed delivery dates or periods are affected and even if HAMM is late, if these delays result from force majeure or any circumstances which significantly impede or prevent delivery by HAMM, in particular, such circumstances include strikes, lockouts or any instructions issued by competent authorities, even if such circumstances occur at the suppliers "or sub-supplier's of HAMM.
- a date for being ready to trade in euros and for changing internal accounts over to the euro.
you can access the latest press reports under News; dates and details of upcoming events are available under Dates.
we have no confirmed delivery date specified sequential ships away from you after your order is not.
since version 1.5 Spybot-S & D is kept up to date by the Updater, a separate tool.
if the Commission considers that there may be an infringement of EU law that warrants the opening of an infringement procedure, it addresses a "Letter of Formal Notice" (first written warning) to the Member State concerned, requesting it to submit its observations by a specified date, usually two months.
with Winfonie mobile you can transfer contacts and dates to your cell phone.
3.1 The stated dates of delivery are non-binding until they have been confirmed in the written order confirmation.
the Buyer is not obligated to accept deliveries before the agreed delivery date and reserves the right to return them at the supplier's cost or to store then at the supplier's cost and risk.
thus and in fact that I am not prepared of this, and had to sort alle my document, I was not able to keep release date.
which means that an always up to date a-squared literally guards your machine whenever you get connected to the net.
town Musical Director, Rudolf Barth, has composed a commissioned piece for the town on the occasion of the anniversary, which will be performed on three dates.
if the Commission considers that there may be an infringement of EU law that warrants the opening of an infringement procedure, it addresses a "Letter of Formal Notice" to the Member State concerned, requesting it to submit its observations by a specified date, usually two months.
the fact that there is still no date for the integration of the WEU, so that the military backbone is lacking, is negative.
if the weather conditions are not suitable, an alternative date will be fixed.
in preparation for the big tour there, this limited-edition poster was created to announce dates and venues.
if you haven't been before, get the dates in your diary - September 7-12 - it will be an event to remember!
by clicking the arrow next to the field "Marked events note," the respective event / date will be saved under my.exporeal.net.
by clicking the arrow next to the field "Marked events note," the respective event / date will be saved under my.bauma.de.
the problem is that the date for conciliation is not until early September.
Scala & Kolacny Brothers are currently looking for extra dates that should fit in a tour in Germany during the summer of 2008.
if a certain concert date has not been announced, that's because it's either that we are not going to perform there or it has not yet been confirmed by the promoter.
you are making a date. what are you looking at?
this way you receive very up-to-date news and interesting dates beside these offers.
this is where we remind you of important dates and deadlines so that things continue running smoothly and nothing gets overlooked as you prepare for the fair.
in the Humboldt Auditorium and in the smaller Kleist Auditorium, the Urania shows selected repertory films, classics, art house films, special film series and, on selected dates, films followed by a discussion.
Symantec LiveUpdate is a good tool for downloading and being up to date with updates.
the admission date will be arranged directly with the patient.
this is reasonable as you too will not enjoy the date if the lady does not have any rapport with you.
confirmed delivery dates will require written confirmation by Pacific Spirit Ltd & Co.KG.
here you can find dates and details of all functions, events, concerts, guided tours and so on.
the Napfeny Apartments offer fully-equipped kitchen, air-conditioned top apartment, Sat-TV, barbecue, deck chairs and dining facility in the garden and safe parking in the backyard.
on the large deck you can find a BBQ which the hosts Ana and Ante Liović have prepared for you.
its been grueling work but made a full recovery, re-learned how to walk and today doing agility drills!
our steel ones weigh about 900 to 1000 g and are superbly suitable for drills and freeplay.
across the Cross trapani airport Airport Trapani Add new tag Airgest castelvestrano church in purgatory drills found crociffisso crucifixion crucifix wooden crucifix michelangelo michelangelo crucifix crucifix found the Diocese of Trapani Elio Marcheggiani St. Joseph Feast Mysterium Crucis Fulget The sculpture in wood attributed to the young Michelangelo marsala Michelangelo Michelangelo in Trapani painting exhibition Mysterium Crucis time flight drills ending flights trapani 2000 Easter procession mysteries of Holy Week program in the province of drills Easter rites Salemi San Vito Lo Capo scinnute Holy Week Sgarbi timetable flights Trapani drills.
I have entered three drops because my period has just started.
even if the desired cuts are achieved, they will account for less than 3% of total demand - a drop in an otherwise empty bucket.
I do not think it is a question of governing the rain, as has been said here, but rather of somehow reusing it, or being well prepared, so as not to lose a single drop of that vital liquid, and to avoid the floods which have also been mentioned here so many times.
if these rules really were to apply, we could not import a drop of oil from Saudi Arabia, which does not of course have even the first clue about human rights.
after cleaning, a soothing lotion is applied together with smoothing drops to facilitate absorption of the active principles.
always start with a very low dosage (1 drop three times a day) and increase slowly.
these drops based on natural ingredients revitalise tired and red eyes and have a soothing effect. read more.
unfortunately, $1.5 billion is little better than what charity could do - and still only a drop in the bucket compared to the extent of the damage.
iritis (inflammation of the iris) ca occur after the operation, which normally heals without problems (you have to put a high number of eye-drops in the eye).
obviously nicking someones chicken is theft, but is taking a drop of milk for your tea stealing?
actually it was simple last drop - if in this case Tickling is private has copied one of title Ukrainian brands from BBH раньнее the company has copied or it is possible even to tell спародировала a brand from Oboloni, namely BeerMix, moreover, in the latter case скопированно to within a sign there was even a product name (a low alcohol cocktail on the basis of beer).
traditional Balsamic Vinegar from Reggio Emilia is a true gem, appreciated by lovers of fine foods and savoured drop by drop.
calm economic waters had given the ECB and Trichet a honeymoon until last fall.
the new center-right government elected in the fall of 2006 has committed itself to continuing economic liberalization.
the first wave was connected with the US Federal Reserve's efforts to bring inflation under control in the fall of 1979, which caused international interest rates to spike, triggering a deep recession in the US and elsewhere.
Dr. Wulf H. Bernotat, CEO of E.ON AG, has been involved in organizing the Capital of Culture year since fall 2008.
with the housing collapse lowering spending, the Fed, in an effort to ward off recession and help banks with fragile balance sheets, has been cutting interest rates since the fall of 2007.
in Switzerland, the two largest banks (UBS and Credit Suisse) had a combined balance sheet in fall 2008 of around 8 times Swiss GDP - mostly based on their global activities.
the EU appeals to the Ukrainian leadership to ensure all necessary conditions for holding free and fair presidential elections this fall in line with its international commitments as enshrined by the Council of Europe and the OSCE.
Washington, DC - At least since the fall of 2008, leading economies "officials have agreed - in principle - that something must be done about financial firms that are" too big to fail. "
if confirmed, this would be the second deadly attack against a senior terrorist leader this fall.
this coalition should draft a framework that countries can adopt and present it at the United Nations climate summit in the fall of 2014.
likewise, Germany's Social Democratic Party (SPD) gained just 20% of the vote in that country's federal election last fall - the party's worst showing in the postwar period.
project partners include TUEV NORD Group (since fall 2007), the Hamburg Chamber of Commerce (since March 2007), University of Hamburg, HAW GameCityLab, Macromedia University for Media and Communication, and others.
the Commission will adopt the second series of Regular Reports in the fall of 1999.
indeed, the Prime Minister, who said in April that there would be no election in 2008 and probably not even in 2009, has not ruled out the possibility of calling an election this fall, it is what the law permits him.
Rowohlt Berlin was founded in the turbulent year of 1990 directly following the fall of the wall that separated East and West Germany.
several years later, in fall 2005, before a provincial court in the Upper Austrian town of Lambach, the screening and retreat of the war machine was repeated, but this time without the international flair of anti-G8 protests.
below is the graph of the daily number of unique visitors on my blog, this fall, until yesterday.
it is likely that the violence that erupted in the fall of 2005 in many French cities and suburbs, in which young and unemployed black people played a large part, has accelerated the willingness of French officials to come to terms with this historical legacy.
this summer and fall, I revisited many of the affected countries, including Malaysia, Laos, Thailand, and Indonesia.
working on the code generator and the infrastructure took some time, because I could spend little time on PHP-GTK during the fall of 2000.
the amount of oil pumped into the Persian Gulf by the Iraqis in 1991, probably to prevent an American Normandy-style landing, was over a million barrels and most likely close to 1.5 million tons--fifty times the amount released from the tanker "Prestige" off the Spanish coast last fall and forty times as much oil as ravaged the coast of Alaska in the 1980's, after the Exxon "Valdez" disaster.
a meeting of Hungarian and Romanian bishops is going to be held in Budapest in fall 2008, as the two episopal conferences agreed - said Mr László német,...
months of protests following the eviction of the caravan site Bambule in Fall 2002 can be interpreted as an indication of the anger over the curtailment of fundamental civil rights by a disproportionately large police presence.
this fall, Zelfi's innovative location-based gaming platform JOYity was released as one of the first extending applications for Android phones and is currently available via Android Marketplace exclusively.
in the fall of 1998, we traveled separately on business trips to Freetown, the capital of Sierra Leone.
this fall, for example, some teachers are being trained to use a new reading curriculum, the Wilson Reading System, targeted to students in the upper elementary and middle school grades who didn't master the basics of reading early in their school careers and are significantly behind their peers.
in my lecture for the opening of the transform project in Linz in fall 2005, I focused primarily on the famous starting point of Foucault's lecture, which names critique as the attitude, the art, the will not to be governed like that, not in this way, not at this price, not by them.
"and the new one won't survive the fall or the winter either," Miss Le Pen told supporters.
in the fall, the DVD box is to be released in the United Kingdom, France and the USA.
in the fall of 2000, Czech voters rebuked both parties during regional and Senate elections, with the Social Democrats losing their joint majority in the Senate.
and, in Germany, Chancellor Angela Merkel will try to position herself to win another term next fall, in an environment that has been tripping up traditional politicians.
in the fall of 2010 Till Fellner concludes his celebrated cycle of Beethoven sonatas, which has taken him to New York, Washington, Tokyo, London, Paris, and Vienna.
the conference will start in the fall of 2010 in Rome.
in fall 2007, Rigoberta Menchú was a candidate - as the only woman and the only indigena - for the office of state president, and on the first ballot she received less than 3% of the votes.
moreover, as a point to emphasise, the Prime Minister has refused to exclude that he might call elections this fall, although he pointed out that his schedule was very busy.
in Fall 2002 the project started aiming at environments with both, GNU / Linux and Windows desktops.
having secured regulatory approval from the authorities in the fall of 2007, the BLUECAR prototypes have to date accumulated tens of thousands of kilometres on the road, demonstrating the power and safety of the L. M. P. batteries combined with supercapacitors.
each year, in spring and in fall, the Interprofession de la Vigne et du Vin du Valais a contest which is called "sélection Vins du Valais." the wines are tasted by a jury of professionals who gives notes to the wines according to various criteria.
hence the oldest photos in this online photo essay about the transformations in the urban space of Berlin's Mitte district are from the 70's and 80's, the most recent being taken in fall 1999.
Mirjam is a sought-after actress and voice actress, and will debut in cinemas in the fall of 2009 in the movie "Hangtime" produced by Sönke Wortmann and Tom Spieß.
in the fall of 2006, Pierre-Yves Puippe succeeded to Remo Sargenti as president of the fan club.
Musharraf hoped to extend his presidency this fall without caving in to opposition demands that he renounce his military position and restore a civilian rival to the post of prime minister.
a rocking chair very beautiful and very economical for long evenings of reading your fall and winter.
we are now expecting the interim reports in both cases in the fall or winter.
this stylish restaurant has turned out to be Belgrad's hotspot of this fall and winter. located in Zemun (on the Donau's right bank, only 15 driving minutes from the center), the gastronimic surprises make it worth the adventurous trip.
the historic villa, built by Ernst August Claaszen, a Gdansk merchant, in 1903, became the seat of the Museum. it was thoroughly renovated in the fall of 2001.
why does my fan work for 15 minutes then cuts out and starts 30 minutes later?
theoretically, there should be a big heatsink and fan, but something of such transformers can not see it in stock.
special purchases include kimonos, mingei (local crafts including kites and folk toys); Kyoto silks, fans, screens, dolls; religious articles such as Shinto and Buddhist artefacts; paper lanterns; lacquerware; hi-fi equipment, cameras, televisions and other electronic equipment. bargaining is not usual.
if you place great stock in authenticity, I'm afraid that you will have to have one made or make one yourself. the fan museums in Paris (see museums) or London should be able to help you there.
always, if the contract part is limited to being only virtual, and we only pretend to move around by bicycle or to stay fresh with a fan.
only during a short period around 1750, half-circle fans were a bit more frequent, often with quite ornately painted and carved sticks. the sticks are about 28-30 cm long, rarely shorter (25-26 cm) or longer (up to 32 cm).
Asian folding fans are the most suitable - the exotic appearance can easily explained by the chinoiserie fashion of the time.
the leaves of folding fans were made of paper, parchment or "swan skin," which actually as the very fine leather of lambs or kids. the Frauenzimmer-Lexicon of 1715 mentions silk leaves, but the only extant example of a fabric leaf i know of (in the silk museum of Lyon) is dated to 1770-80.
despite the heavy downpour of rain on Saturday evening, approximately 1200 music fans went to the open air festival in the castle garden.
this technology puts across a direct driving experience that modern vehicles are no longer able to provide and that fans of classic cars hold in high estimation.
after huge success and at the request of many fans the CD "Canzone della Strada" by Quadro Nuevo is also available as limited double LP edition.
the device is still available online for fans to buy for a couple of euros, even though it comes from the stone age of the Internet.
Microsoft celebrates the 25th anniversary of its legendary flight simulation saga with this new version, Microsoft Flight Simulator X, designed for fans of aviation, and for professionals, as it also includes classes and a flight instructor.
Trekkie (or Trekker) is a term used to describe a fan of all or part of the Star Trek fictional universe.
in addition to the races of the cup series, the audience can enjoy car-related events targeting the fans of the brand.
so the spread and strengthening of Chávez's so-called Bolivarian Revolution was not in Brazil's interests, even though some of President Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva's officials appear to be fans of Chávez and his administration.
at the age of four, he was already a great fan of puppet shows (Le Guignol).
because he was fed up with constantly getting his hands dirty from oily bicycle chains and by the difficulty in disassembling and transporting traditional bicycles, former mechanical engineer Hubert Coenen from Stadhagen near Hanover came upon the Synchronflex PU timing belt and soon became an enthusiastic fan of its decisive benefits.
amalgamating Odysseus with Sherlock is certainly extremely difficult, even with the help of gene technology, which is why I - though a fan of English detective novels - must talk about Odysseus. for we are actually on an odyssey as far as asylum law in the European Union is concerned.
if you are not cycling fans, we would like to offer you interesting facultative trips you can join while the ship anchors.
the company has more than ten million "fans" on Weibo, the microblogging platform.
I have fans; the main thing is not to betray them, not to spoil what I have earned.
who knew you could make music with Windows sound files?
view image files saved in the DCIM folder of a digital camera.
all client files should reside in one folder when you run the setup file.
if applying by E-Mail, please send us PDF files or ZIP-compress your files.
in my company I have direct access to that specific folder on the server via SMB (normal windows file access).
you may also send us the images, as files, which you would like to see hand painted.
path and name of the file that contains the image.
just insert the name of the image-file you want to be used (including the suffix).
in the table below, you can download PDF files containing the invitation to the Annual General Meeting, including the agenda, and further information.
at the same time, you can also pack a group of small files inside a ZIP or RAR folder (for example, images), and place them on hard drive directories where there are files designed to be shared.
to verify that you have installed this update, select the Microsoft Component Plugin file in the Microsoft Office 2004 / Office folder on your hard disk, and then on the File menu, click Get Info.
replace the executable .exe file of your current PixelStudio version (this file can be found in the folder where you have installed PixelStudio 0.61) with the one contained in the zip-archive.
) Obsolete files in "images" as well as obsolete files in "thumbnails" may be deleted.
(CEE) informs you that information of a personal character collected through this form will be kept on file. the information will be used to manage your relationship with the company, as well as for the company to be able to send you information and publicity regarding their activities - including by electronic media.
Yahoo Multi Messenger is the "programme to chat with all your friends and to open as many Yahoo Messenger sessions as you wish simultaneously," for people who have more than one account.Yahoo Multi Messenger only requires you to open the .REG file to start using your multiple sessions, without having to install anything else.
now you need to create an alias of the .plugin file and drag it back to the Photoshop CS3 plugin folder. now everything should work again, we will keep you updated about the progress of this issue.
and seeking access to additional documents in the Commission's file.
I was able to generate an entire automation routine which exported each track as WAV file which then was saved in a designated folder.
underlines that implementation of the legal framework has to be improved by all parties concerned, in particular as regards conformity assessments, including the need for manufacturers to provide appropriate clinical and laboratory data as part of the technical file;
the data container enables not merely the exchange of single EDI messages, but of complete processes in the sense of a file (case file, supplier file), thus making it possible to transmit all documents in a business case.
this behaviour is even more open to criticism as the Bank would like to be granted extensive discretionary powers. these would allow it to send its own agents directly into reporting undertakings and to examine the books and files of these, in order to verify the information reported or to carry out the compulsory collection of this.
- rights of defence - language questions - time-limits - access to files - oral hearings - treatment of business secrets - right of third parties
I should like to know the outcome of advertising the post; why was there one candidate whose application file was incomplete; and what was missing from the file?
it is no good filing the data and leaving the files locked away in a cupboard somewhere. they must be the basis in 2002 for monitoring the voluntary undertaking.
this answer was already on file at the Bureau of Parliament as far back as May.
he also vowed to rid his administration of Habre's security agents and to grant access to the files of a truth commission that investigated Habre's rule.
there was one case that was also presented here today in which OLAF investigated the problem and referred the whole file with the findings to the French court, which did not support the full extent of OLAF's findings, but nevertheless, the partial recovery of unpaid duties has started.
however, with default settings, the webserver will treat the files inside it just like any other file - if requested directly, those files will be served.
therefore, in line with the rapporteur's proposal and having noted the legal and political safeguards, I support adoption of the text, including the minor modifications and corrections proposed by the Council, as well as the conclusion of the file through an agreement at first reading.
Güler, adopting an innovative line in its sector since 2002, becomes one of the first 10 customs clearances companies in Turkey by various benchmarks today. (branching, number of consultants in its personnel cadre, number of annual file, annual endorsement).
even though according to EU law the procedure for examining an application must be completed as quickly as possible, and in any event within 3 months of the submission of a complete file, the citizen had been waiting over four months for the recognition.
2. � Dismisses the application for access to the file relating to the Commission's decision of 1 August 1988;
we must demand that a standard file be drawn up on all donors.
can you tell us whether Bouterse had Dutch nationality at the time of the murders, and will you ensure that the mysteriously lost file on his nationality is made public?
the Jalema Clip File save considerable space because the file is only as thick as the number of documents in it, as opposed to traditional lever arch files, which are always 8 cm thick.
the language used in the letter is thus not that of a binding measure requiring the Italian authorities to close the file definitively and thus affecting the legal position of the applicants.
furthermore, where it is clear from the outset that the operation can only have effects limited to a single Member State, the Commission could also involve the national authorities before mergers were notified, and could pass on its own file as a basis for examination of a merger at national level.
nor can I make any judgment because obviously the personal files or disciplinary measures relating to Commission staff are not available to the Council.
by 30 April 1997 the office had opened 1,317 provisional files and registered 534 formal applications in individual cases.
in March 2002, TGI applied for access to all the documents in the Commission's files regarding State aid cases concerning TGI.
the "Commission file" includes all documents that are part of the specific procedure on which the Statement of Objections has been based.
Pattloch opens a file containing registrations with the trademark office in Peking.
concepts, ideas, found items, and materials all get packed in white crates, placed in white files, such as were on display in the Milan show.
you or your lawyer can ask to see the parts of the case-file relating to your arrest and detention or be informed about their content in detail.
they then proceeded, following a script, to switch props and roles, the first nurse reading from the file, "Alexa Holmes, Type A blood," and the second reading from the bag, "Type A blood."
the document collection houses files and official print matter, books and newspapers, programme brochures and identity papers, as well as private papers such as letters or diary entries.
for example, he may look into the files of yourself, Madam President, Mr Santer, President Hänsch, any Member of Parliament or member of the Commission, as he sees fit.
incidentally, it gives us the opportunity to start a comprehensive file on all Mr Trichet's actions.
this office was then closed and the relevant files sealed by the Belgian judiciary, meaning that the Commission did not have access to them.
the Court annuls a Commission decision rejecting in its entirety a request for access to the administrative file in a competition case concerning Austrian banks
Gordon Sisson found an interesting picture in his clip art file of an oil storage tank with a striking view of the stairs climbing around the side.
in that context, the VKI applied to the Commission for access to the administrative file relating to the 'Lombard Club "decision.
Germany was a cosy habitat for the Security spies, as Herta Müller had already written in July in the Zeit newspaper after reading her own file, 914 pages.
any applications that have been received by the Foundation and are pending will be kept on file and subsequently reviewed after the start of the 2009-10 Rotary year.
in the meantime, at the weekend, we learned that subsidies for the former Yugoslavia were misappropriated by ECHO and, in addition, the Commission staff involved obviously had the opportunity - as I understand it from the press, as UCLAF was not in a position to provide the Committee on Budgetary Control with sufficient information regarding this - to allow files to disappear, with the result that it is extremely difficult to investigate the case in detail.
as an example for the muteness of subalterns she draws on files from the colonial archive, which are supposed to provide evidence that Indian women during the British colonial era "voluntarily" submitted to the cruel custom of widow burning.
the Member States sent their files at the very last minute, in January, February and often even in March, with the last deadline being on 31 March, and I am sorry to say that it is taking longer than foreseen to examine all of these files, of which there are several thousand.
some details still have to be underlined in the technical files, and I look forward to that.
while it is true that the Raad van State and the Rechtbank, in the course of those procedures, studied the file of the Netherlands internal security service ('the BVD ") relating to Mr Sison's alleged involvement in certain terrorist activities in the Philippines, neither those judicial bodies nor the Netherlands prosecuting authority decided to open an investigation in respect of Mr Sison in the Netherlands in connection with those activities.
what about these return operations involving several repatriated persons, insofar as each person's file was assessed individually?
interested parties other than the Member State responsible for granting the aid do not have a right under those procedures to consult the documents on the Commission's administrative file.
the judge spent a day examining the newly unearthed files of Habré 's dreaded political police, the Documentation and Security Directorate (DDS), including their reports to Habré on massacres of rival ethnic groups and daily lists of prison deaths.
the Ombudsman found that the files relating to the programme had been held by the Commission's technical assistance office (TAO).
I know for a fact that the Commission has at least 17 box-files of evidence showing causality between exposure to whole-body vibration and injury.
according to the national file, on 1 January 1989 Mr El-Yassini was given leave to enter the United Kingdom as a visitor, with a restriction prohibiting his taking employment.
(FR) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I wish to draw your attention to the fact that, on your desks, you will find a file concerning the Lux Prize, a film prize that you are going to award.
the verdict added that the file submitted by the French Government was not based on 'serious and credible evidence' and that it was in respect of individuals suspected of being members of the PMOI and not the PMOI itself.
the Commission has closed the file after the parties to the agreement agreed to lift certain restrictions and committed to not renewing their agreement when it expires in 2000.
under this procedure, parties, having seen the evidence in the Commission file, choose to acknowledge their involvement in the cartel and their liability for it.
according to FBI files obtained by NBC News, more than 50 men from Monroe and the surrounding counties were suspected in the lynching.
the Commission today decided to close the file concerning the construction of a visitor centre at Mullaghmore (Clare, Ireland).
the United States Ambassador to Brussels has now informed me that my visa has been refused for political reasons, that the file had gone to Washington and the United States Embassy advised me to cancel my trip with the delegation.
a number of films have also used lines from Hamlet's soliloquy as film titles.
in co production with the Bavaria Distribution and Production GmbH two "Bibi Blocksberg" -feature films were produced.
the film is available in 2 m wide strips, which can be bonded together to create sheets of any sizes, and in sheets 4, 6, 8, 10, or 12 m wide and 25 m long.
the network offers casting directors the chance to exchange ideas on an international level about their different ways of working, to take advantage of synergies with international co- productions and to attract greater attention to the work of casting a film.
the exhibition is a journey through exemplary sequences from about 80 Austrian and international motion pictures, including film specific images of the city - from silent film until today.
this page is about film in the Star Trek universe. for information on the Star Trek films, see Star Trek films.
prepare yourself for something very intense. if you like to watch a hot dude get plowed in the ass while he fucks a tight little pussy, or if you like to see a guy and a hot chick chow down on another dude's cock, than this is the film for you!
he even borrowed one of the film cameras and experimented at home.
against this, let me put to you the liberal idea, which certainly does not represent a particularly strong attack on the power of the state, that there are things which are simply no concern of government, such as the flavour of jam people like to eat, how many layers of clothing they wear in winter or which narcotic substance they like to smoke, sniff, drink or inject.
with the first hours of the night it rains heavily on the city Fajtbo everyone in their homes, but the widow and the child was upon the face of the child to his mother Kdarhamanzer look confused and slipped into her lap, but the body of the mother and son clothes Aptla sky pouring water...
with hours of the night the first rains pounded the city Everyone hid themselves in their homes, while the widow and the child was the face of them Kdarhamanzer child to his mother look puzzled and slipped into her lap, but the body of the mother and son and their clothes plagues sky pouring water...
thanks to its big base area as well as the adjustable tilt angle that ensures optimal ergonomics, the LapChilla is perfectly suited for both office use and working on your lap.
licensed residents bar which specialises in malt whisky - free wireless connection for guests with own lap top computers.
the Union, together with the United Nations, must take the lead in building the new Iraqi democracy. it will thus have a major role to play which involves, not least, taking powerful, coherent measures to combat terrorism and the proliferation of weapons of mass destruction.
the lead roles - hard-boiled Gregor and idealistic Iosef - are played by Florin Piersic Jr. and Corneliu ulici, their dialogue dubbed in English by Channing Tatum (also an executive producer) and Joseph Gordon-Levitt.
back then Joey Wong played the heart-eating monster in the lead, now Zhou Xun ("Perhaps Love," "The Banquet") takes on the role.
"Ginrei no OJA" - "King of the Silver Mountains" - is the title of a 1960 "s Japanese film in which Toni plays the lead and which started a frenzy of wintersport enthusiasm.
before operation 'Cast Lead' the situation was exactly the reverse and 90% of the population of Gaza could take care of themselves.
"it must have sat in your stomach like lead," he said.
if lead is one of several elements you need to analyze for, the Handheld XRF Alpha Series is the most cost-effective screening solution.
), Most of the photos from the series' shooting Julie "were made with lead to the shadows.
the CSTEE is currently working on the issue of risks from the use of lead in general and an opinion, building inter alia on a study to be commissioned by the services of the Commission, should be adopted by mid-2001 on both the environmental and human health risks of lead.
we also offer PP ropes and webbings, natural, coloured and round leather of the best quality, and also chain leads and chain dog-collars, rope leads for dogs and horses.
Mike Sullivan and Jordan Cownie brought the home side level before Dwyer restored the Giants' lead.
Mr President, I would like to thank the President of the Commission for his specific declaration that the Commission intends to respect and apply the spirit and the letter of the resolution of 16 September 1996.
Mr President, you have said that you have made a decision using your own discretion rather than applying the Rules to the letter.
do you notice that individual letters in the navigation menu are underlined?
nowadays that is still done, mainly for informal letters. the term letter is also used for email messages with a formal letterlike format.
the Council regrets that due to the lack of flexibility by the European Parliament, the Conciliation Committee was prevented from fulfilling the letter and spirit of the provisions of the Treaty.
does the Commission regard these shifts and agreements amongst undertakings as running counter to the spirit and the letter of the Treaties and as detrimental to free competition and to the consumer?
we Members of the European Parliament need to join together to exert continuing pressure if this communication is not to be just a dead letter.
this would clearly violate the letter and spirit of the aforementioned decisions taken by the Heads of State and Government regarding the seat of Parliament.
for children who have one native language at home and learn another in a formal environment it is important to begin with the letter forms and sound in the native language first.
the Commission estimates that the price of a first-class letter in the UK would, for example, increase by 0.3 euro cents in the case of VAT being applied at a reduced rate of 5% and by five euro cents in the case of VAT being applied at the standard rate of 17.5 per cent.
in my view, Madam President, this decision infringes both the letter and the spirit of Rule 134 of our Rules of Procedure and I know that not only Mr Kristoffersen and myself but a whole lot of other people too are concerned about it.
the side-by-side display invites comparison to make it easier for children to notice that both words start with the same letter.
like the rapporteur, I believe that most of the considerations expressed by the European Parliament on these issues, in its previous report, since the Treaty of Amsterdam modified the uniform electoral system in accordance with the general principles of electoral law, appear in the spirit and the letter of the text before us today.
in view of this, the European Union must take specific steps which will help to increase respect for the letter of the law and democracy in the Islamic Republic of Pakistan.
it is often said that a characteristic of the European method of legal interpretation is its purposive quality, and I feel that to some extent the local enforcers of European law should act with regard to the purpose not only to the letter of the law.
in our view, the reason why the negotiations are stalling is essentially because, in addition to the technical details, the European Parliament is seeking to obtain a purely European statute for its Members with remuneration paid out of the Community budget, whereas this objective runs counter to the spirit and the letter of the Treaties.
in my opinion, however, this matter should not be allowed to obscure the reality of the programme of the Dutch presidency, and I would congratulate the President-in-Office of the Council on being the first of his kind to have interpreted, in keeping with the spirit and the letter of the Treaties, the essence of what the rotating Council presidency represents, in a way devoid of all self-will or populism directed towards domestic policy objectives.
the European Union hopes that early action by the Belarus Government to respect fully the letter and spirit of the Vienna Convention will enable a return to the status quo ante so as to facilitate the development of the more constructive relationship between the EU and Belarus which the EU wishes.
particularly the technical / legal customs and traditions which exist in all countries across the European Union should be considered in terms of their effect and not just their letter.
(it) Mr President, as one of the founding countries, Italy has a long experience of remaining true to the spirit and the letter of the Treaties, which, within the space of a few decades, have enabled us to develop peacefully one of the most remarkable political and institutional experiments in the history of mankind.
the letter and spirit of France's constitution makes the prime minister the country's second in command - "my collaborator," as Sarkozy said of François Fillon - whose key role is to protect the president.
as a result of this, users using the advanced mode in Spybot-S & D will probably notice additional filesets; those ending in the letter C are new ones containing the most up-to-date detection rules.
we do not believe that the size of the letters on the information notices should be decided by Community law.
therefore, whatever the current difficulties, it is right and even advisable that the joint budgetary authority should prepare a responsible, rigorous and effective budget for the year 2000 in line with the EU's political commitments and according to the spirit and letter of the Interinstitutional Agreement.
YE24 The first letter is the region, the second is for a weather forecast.
when selected, KPresenter will automatically capitalize the first letter after a period.
in this case, Italy unfortunately offers a bad example of waste management, failing to respect the spirit and the letter of European law under which a virtuous hierarchy, ranging from reduction to recycling, has for some time been consolidated.
in addition to contextualizing, the letters must also be connected (ligatures).
zhe can also be used in leet speak in place of the letter x.
the first letter that the NCD community should consider is "A," for activism.
as long as we face problems of enforcement, we should rather concentrate our efforts on good cooperation, both within industry and public authorities, in order to improve safety in practice and not by the letter of the law.
type the first letters and the software displays the next entries in alphabetical order and a list of suggestions.
I do not have much to add. my view, and that of the Legal Affairs Committee which I represent, is that Parliament must always interpret the Treaties imaginatively while not departing too far from the letter, because that might create more problems than it solves.
that is the spirit, and also the letter, of the Tampere agreements and the Treaty of Amsterdam, although we should discuss the legal basis of the common asylum procedure and uniform status.
the second set of boxes performs a similar function to the first except text entered in these boxes will allow two capital letters in a word if it is entered in this text box.
on trade issues, if EU markets are to remain open, we have to see to it that we need a genuine, bilateral and multilateral response from China implementing the letter and spirit of the WTO commitments.
the aim is guarantee that companies from third countries respect the same rules that apply to EU based undertakings in both letter and spirit - not to discriminate against them.
this is a proposal which promotes fraud and which is a flagrant violation of the spirit and the letter of Directive 2001 / 18 / EC, which was adopted last year.
in changing this legal base, the rapporteur has attempted to promote new powers for Parliament which do not appear to comply with the letter and the spirit of the Treaties.
obviously, the US is not facing a genuine national-security threat from allies such as Canada or Japan, which means that its tariffs are certainly a violation of the spirit - and probably also the letter - of WTO rules.
businessmen, politics, artists, public people always write with huge letters.
I congratulate her and the Committee on Legal Affairs for its excellence and thank them for incorporating so much of both the spirit and letter of our opinion into it.
this presidency has violated neither the letter nor the spirit of Question Time, the aim of which is to ask specific questions and receive the most specific possible replies.
the Council reiterated its concern about the obvious unwillingness of the leadership of Bosnia-Herzegovina to implement the letter and the spirit of the New York declaration, and efforts to unravel the Dayton-Paris GFAP.
it should also be pointed out that government investment expenditure is not excluded from the calculation of the deficit, which is a violation of the spirit and, in part, of the letter of the Treaty.
to see a list of all commands available which begin with a certain letter, type the letter and then two tabs.
the letters they may type next are displayed in uppercase to make them easier to find on the keyboard.
to view the list of our cheap rates for calling abroad click on the first letter of the country name of your correspondent in the list below.
to build fonts (including the Bitstream Vera set) with support for East Asian letters with X, make sure you have the CJK USE flag set.
due to space limitations, the confirmation e-mail may cut-off some letters or characters.
enter the first letter of the keyword into the search field (e.g. s for supply).
we must consider ethics, compliance with transparency and morality as well as the letter of the law.
moreover, the more letters a country has, the greater the number of uses it could find for any additional letter it acquired.
key, then press the number or letter of the access key.
zhe is one of the first letters learned by children who learn to write in Slavic languages, because it looks quite like a young frog floating in a pond, and in these languages the word meaning "frog" or "toad" is written "жаба."
we must also be aware that, in order to be useful in such a difficult situation, the troops deployed will have to be respected, and, in order for that to happen, they will have to be strong, that is to say, they will need to have the resources appropriate to their mission and to have the right and the duty to implement them not only in the case of self-defence, that is to say, when their own soldiers are in danger, but also when the spirit or the letter of the mission may demand it.
all this to underline that just one of the countries for which we had some hope a few years ago is threatening to slip back into a state of impunity again, the agreements of 1996 remaining a dead letter.
this includes the ability to enter and display umlauts, cyrillic letters or Chinese characters, or the option to also process all of the texts that are displayed (these may be graphics, for example) However, this also includes the elimination or adjustment of cultural peculiarities or sensitivities, such as the use of colors (white = innocence or sorrow?
the Group of Independents for a Europe of Nations objects to this federalist urge which rejects the principle of subsidiarity, the letter of the Treaty and the sovereignty of nations.
this is not just a matter of common sense; it is also inherent in the principle of subsidiarity that is always being lauded here but in practice is increasingly proving to be a dead letter.
now you need to bring orange letters back into the game and blacken them again, until you find a way to form a final word.
now, countries can get into business with fewer letters and add letters more parsimoniously.
the yellow link is different from the link in bold blue letters in that it will open a new popup window with the website of the marina.
and we still have a long way to go before CAP means more to the man in the street than just three letters.
try to place a word, check it, then insert it again now with only one letter in uppercase, and looks like change your security level.
type the first few letters of the contact's name and Skype will filter out all contacts that match the filter.
I find this really quite dreadful: it contradicts the letter of the Treaty, and I hope that it will not happen.
clearly, we in this House have to discuss the issue of the spirit and the letter of the Pact, with due regard for the Pact and within the constraints of the current situation where we have to apply it to both large and small countries.
exclusive extract from Howard Jacobson's acclaimed new novel about love and the letter 'J'
even for a single language like English no single encoding was adequate for all the letters, punctuation, and technical symbols in common use.
and here are my photo etched letters already attached to the bulwark.
in the original lay-of-the-land sheet, in the area where today the borough of Au-Haidhausen is, one can make out not only the street name "am Gasteig" or the elevation "Auf der Lüften" - but can actually read in large letters "mental asylum."
accelerators are the underlined letters you see in the text of the widget.
NowMyMail function merely on the incoming mail, does not provide mailing features, letters, the title does not support Chinese (there will be garbled),...
if you are unsure about the name of a program, type the first few letters then press the Tab key on your keyboard.
a - out the text of the interpretation are likely to be the author, by adopting one of the copies already in the investigation, for reasons mentioned in a timely manner, and compared with a copy (B) to adopt the text of origin, and certain that the right thing in the non-origin of the phrase or words proved correct, and noted in the footnote when needed, often we find minor differences in some words or letters which would not affect the meaning, it might find in a copy In some sympathy Balvae Ballowao example, we find no need to refer to it so as not to overburden the book margins frequently unnecessary, and to avoid swelling the size of the book.
first, we are - and I am - in favour of a just peace between the Israelis and Palestinians, and therefore in favour of the spirit and the letter of the Oslo agreements, which must be applied.
all the copycats require are a few additional letters in order that they can register their brands.
we feel though, after the speech that we have heard here this morning, that it may be because that item in the Treaty of Amsterdam which was, of necessity, destined to be almost a dead letter or just hot air, is now gaining a certain visibility, creating greater consensus and asserting itself naturally, thereby making the path towards a common area of freedom, security and justice seem much more credible.
beside our ideas and creativity it goes without saying that we know the tools like HTTP, (X) HTML, XML and several more abbreviations with 3 or 4 letters, as well as web programming, search engine optimization (SEO) and Google Adwords.
the system requirements for using the CopyStation include a PC with Windows XP, a free USB connector, seven available drive letters and administrative rights for the software.
menus are written in straggling white letters on weather-stained mirrors.
if this modifier is set, letters in the pattern match both upper and lower case letters.
if a country lacks a letter, it cannot make the words that use it.
HS, E2 is a Prefix or Roman letters specified countries.
it makes it delightful to enter Greek letters, fractions and all the stuff that makes a formula look like a formula.
the court held that the bags of the Korean company which were covered with an emblem consisting of the letters "L" and "V" with a square, circle, diamond and flower petal pattern, could without any doubt be confused with those of Louis Vuitton.
there is still a great deal to do to ensure that both the letter and the spirit of the Treaty are respected in this area.
trendy ® has been studied to adapt to very many wheels and just like with a dress you will find its sizes followed by the letters S (small), M (medium) or L (large) for all wheels from the smallest to the biggest ones, including SUVs.
State aid to small letter io £- A / C €CT - We Corja this A-MA-MOS celebrate dates.
C) certification to the effect that the operations as per letters a) and b) have been notified, as also related to their contents, to the entities to whom or which the data were communicated or disseminated, unless this requirement proves impossible or involves a manifestly disproportionate effort compared with the right that is to be protected.
for Detroit, if only for one night, it was a return of the three-letter F-word that has been so elusive over much of the season's second half.
through a side window, one then sees light boxes for eyesight tests and hears the letters of the alphabet read aloud continuously and monotonously.
when you type the first 3 letters of an item in the list, the auto-completion box pops up, and you can press Enter to complete the filename. check the box to enable this feature.
companies' profits can dive if a letter or dot is put in the wrong place.
I found the site WiiDrives a page where you enter the first 6 characters of the serial number of the Nintendo Wii (2 letters and 4 numbers) and he says what is the drive of the Wii and what chips Unlock will work on it.
every letter does not have the same number of alternates.
therefore the game plays the correct sound for each letter whenever possible (when a sound is not matched to one but to a group of letters, such as the sound "ch," the name of each letter is heard as that letter is typed).
six letters are enough to sum up the sinews of war on the Internet.
"the drive letters start with a" C "and move on to the following letters, depending on the number of partitions to be labeled.
countries that have a greater variety of capabilities can make more diverse and complex goods, just as a Scrabble player who has more letters can generate more and longer words.
the last codex, the only Psalter in the collection (codex XI), has one of its initial letters decorated with the scene of Jonah being saved from the waters; the decorations at the sides are carried out in a wide variety of ornamental, floral and geometric designs and enriched with scrolls bearing weapons and grotesque figures, taken from the decorative repertoire adopted in 16th century painting and sculpture.
suitable, for example, for checking the code number of a letter / character or just to display a font completely with a certain font size. only available in German.
it takes there some moments until I identify the correct letter.
internationalization is often written "i18n," where 18 is the number of letters between 'i' and 'n' in the English word.
at this point, it is easy to learn the letters.
the comments off-topic, promotional crudely, offensive, written in capital letters, type SMS or illegal will be deleted without mercy.
this injudicious plan contravenes both the spirit and the letter of the framework directive on water.
in case I do not do any of the above mentioned evilnesses, I will NMU policy, forbidding usernames starting with capital letters and having a dash in them, for they are annoying.
some have criticised Tongyong Pinyin for matching more than one traditional zhuyin initial to the letters c and s. others have pointed out that every single Mandarin syllable can be expressed in equal or fewer keystrokes in Hanyu Pinyin *.
Ππ Pi is a letter in the Greek language alphabet of Earth, originating in the early period of Human history.
the Great King Antiochos, the God, the Righteous One, the Manifest (Deity), the Friend of the Romans and the Greeks, the Son of King Mithradates Kallinikos and of Laodike the Brother-loving Goddess, the Daughter of King Antiochos Epiphanes, the Mother-loving, the Victorious, has recorded for all time, on consecrated pedestals with inviolable letters the deeds of his clemency.
if you go to the Help menu, you can find a number of curiosities * *, such a miniature Tetris game that appears when you press the letter "t" in the "About µTorrent" section.
keyboard shortcut for loc functions are a letter and are independent of the F number.
with Arthaus Paint & Fotoshop you can combine designs, images and drawings with letters and texts the way you want to.
the saved words are then displayed as predictive text entry options the next time you type in a letter or letters that match the beginning of a saved word.
the capitalis rustica however preceded it as the Roman casual hand. flowing more freely and with greater verve, its letters stand more closely together, and are essentially taller than they are wide.
are case sensitive, strings starting with a capital letter will come before strings starting with a lowercase letter.
J and V were the consonantal forms of I and U, pronounced in the same way as their vowel counterparts, so they did not require separate letters.
by including the 200 letters (or nucleotides, per the artist's sophisticated scientific lexicon), Dewey-Hagborg hoped to illustrate how astoundingly similar, at least in biological makeup, we all are.
and to drive us faster down this road they top it off by playing the good old refrain about the spirit of the treaties going beyond the letter of the treaties.
the user names depend on the SAP system ID (SID) which consists of three letters.
X is the twenty-fourth letter of the Latin alphabet. it is in the form of St Andrew's Cross.
deadkeys allow you to press keys that will not show immediately but will be combined with another letter to produce a single character such as é, è, á, à, etc.
press the key more than once to scroll through letters.
this attitude negates the very spirit and letter of the conciliation procedure.
by default, as in Perl, a backslash followed by a letter with no special meaning is treated as a literal.
this his father had always done to stifle the letter j before it left his lips.
a mix of upper- and lower-case letters and numbers is considered a good password.
this is expressed by letters ranging from D = very soft to T = very hard.
with some letters it's hard to decide which band to pick.
furthermore, the element 'ck "corresponds to the initial letters of the words' creaciones" and 'kennya, "thus establishing the origin of that element and explaining its presence.
in a nutshell, this means strict adherence to the letter and spirit of the Bonn process as well as to sound macroeconomic and financial management.
for that reason we recommend the use of secure passwords (random combinations of letters, numbers and special character). you should not save passwords anywhere or tell it others (the euIRC-Team will never ask for passwords.
we are well aware of how they are to be interpreted, and I could not contemplate taking responsibility for any breach at all, either of the spirit or of the letter, of any convention whatsoever.
in this context The Welsh letter w is pronounced similarly to the Yorkshire English pronunciation of the letter u.
it was possible to "zaprząść" xml file with ASCII codes of individual letters + their coordinates but then again I have to manually edit everything as it is not cool.
the resulting Hamada captures the feeling of a pen on the page; ink edges out from the contours and moves across curves, letters, and lines!
press the "START," wait until appears on the screen is the letter "L," ie LOAD - Loading.
in addition, animated by an abiding humanism and faithful to the spirit, as well as the letter, of the UN Charter, Annan stretched the executive authority of the organization through creative interpretations of the Charter and a charismatic personality to secure the adoption of the exciting, but challenging, "Responsibility to Protect" (R2P) principle.
the ROT13 encoding simply shifts every letter by 13 places in the alphabet while leaving non-alpha characters untouched.
Bucephalus "gaze is directed at the letters. the horse is depicted at the very moment it recognizes scripture.
the relationship between the individual letters is indefinitely variable and not foreseeable.
change your password often using a combination of letters and numbers and make sure you are using a secured web browser.
underneath, with the letter (s) if it relates to the sounds of the game.
the construction of the Deurganck dock lock is one of the Flemish Government's key projects and is in line with the objectives of the 2020 Pact.
the bottom part of the cassette is put in the lock with the top part of the bottom cassette, and the top part fastens exhaust rivets or self-cut screws to the directing.
one of the locks, which connects the spacecraft with the sciences.
the final dredging work is scheduled from the end of 2014 until the end of 2015, and the lock is due to open at the beginning of 2016.
significant bottlenecks in the form of inadequately dimensioned locks, bridges or fairways and missing links such as the connection between the Seine and the Scheldt river systems are hampering the sector's full development potential.
when you come through the Narbonne lock, you will sail under the Pont des Marchands, one of the only bridges in France on which houses are built.
the objective of the project Ariadna is to design and build-up a new series of navigation support systems to allow optimisation of the maritime infrastructures, the navigation on dense traffic in ports and access areas, rivers, channels, lock access areas, and traffic separation areas as well leading to efficient (in terms of capability and economic terms) and environmentally-friendly operations.
a calm waterway running across the vineyards of Macon, Beaujolais, and Lyon hillsides. you can head 112 km South, as fas as Lyon, with only 2 locks to pass.
Indian children inhale large doses of sulphur and potassium chlorate to fashion flammable powder into matches.
but it's as if he has reached from his book, snatched that dramatis personae page from your fingers, and lighted it with a match.
polluting environment, damage road, informative and other signs and devices, throwing down cigarette ends and matches and other inflammable and environment polluting materials.
whether through a business partnership or an acquisition - we will find you the ideal match.
that is why I should like to ask my honourable friends to vote in favour of this motion which, I think, for both mines and depleted uranium ammunition, is a commensurate response to the current situation.
but hardly any television camera wanders into the favelas of Rio, the slums of Calcutta, the hungry children in Kinshasa or Luanda, into the miserable USA reservations of Indians, or views the soup kitchens of Marseille and homeless of Berlin, the victims of gold mines in Papua-New Guinea, the families of the murdered leaders of the Brazilian landless movement, the crippled victims of land mines and the cities and villages destroyed by war.
if they do not have enough venting channels in their core, and still lie on a hard board, they retain moisture: even mold could occur beneath the mattresses.
the grain needs to be wetted all over with propionic acid in order to prevent mold from developing.
this information will help make the move towards goods that reduce emissions as well as noise pollution.
moreover, even after their move, Mr Iida can be granted a right of residence in Germany on another legal basis, without it being necessary to rely on his daughter and his spouse's EU citizenship.
finally Advocate General Jacobs states that the concept of free movement is not based on the notion of a single move to one Member State followed by integration into that State, but rather on the possibility to move repeatedly, or even continually within the Union.
this may have been a one-off event, however, due to the move to the Agency's long-term office building.
you can ask for a move from one Spanish province to another without having to worry about anything.
Detroit and Seattle showed plenty of interest after his move to the US - and there were plenty of other teams making inquiries after his impressive open training day late last year.
the latter includes non-commercial movements across EU external borders and third countries "frontiers by private personstransporting a wildlife specimen covered by EC Wildlife Trade Regulations, either as part of a household move or as part of their personal belongings.
how soccer's financial rules impact Neymar's move to Paris
we started Links Moving Asia in 1997 with a group of like minded individuals who believed that an international move could be done more cheaply, smoothly and easily.
to accept exceptional expenditure presented by the institutions such as the move to the Berlaymont or the replacement of members of the Commission and members of the Court of Justice;
personally, the move from science to the law gave me a unique opportunity to broaden my horizons with, amongst other things, an assignment in the USA and qualification as a European patent attorney.
X.org modularization was another hot topic, as well as the move over to autotools as means for an easier development state.
here are some of the financial aspects of Neymar's move to France.
by the time the agency makes its next move in 2005, it has expanded to occupy a total of three build ­ ings at that loca ­ tion.
obviously the move into the theatre venue a few years ago led to a higher number of participants.
"it's the best thing that could have happened for us; we won't get this sort of opportunity again," says Fischer about the move to the Lech, which has been accepted "positively and with understanding" by employees.
but as the king had spoken, the move had to take place.
'the Uwv ") because, since his move to Spain, Mr Salemink was no longer compulsorily insured (as from 10 September 2004) and was not eligible for invalidity benefit.
1925 Move to Innsbruck, from 1929 in Igls near Innsbruck, where the firm still is today.
1972 Move of premises from Oberhausen to Schermbeck into today  s production plants.
during the move we will be not able to respond to enquiries in full or carry out business as usual.
Axel Klemmer was born in Berlin in 1963. five years later he moved to Munich and it is owning this move that he did not waste his talent on rowing.
plan your move in advance, so that you can organize all the details carefully, choosing the days this will be carried out and taking care of all the details.
before his move into consulting, he held research and teaching positions at the universities of Toronto and Vienna.
his move to America sparked more glory, winning the Mr. Olympia contest consecutively from 1970-1975. after claiming that he was not giving anyone else a chance to win, Arnold retired in 1975 and moved into acting.
I now turn to CEDEFOP which has finally got over that tragic move from Berlin to Thessaloniki.
she is more afraid of the move than of the spider on her front door.
Dubsteppa Laurie 'Appleblim' Osbourne was born in Derby and following numerous moves reached London in 1994 where he became bassist with the experimental rock band The Monsoon Bassoon.
by the resolute maintenance of our location in the Bernese Jura after the daring move from Berne to the more rural Courtelary.
the OMICRON team had now increased to more than 100 employees which warranted a move to larger premises.
the move will neutralise the success of Corbyn's drive to attract young voters
unwelcome moves by American or Japanese politicians are officially branded as "insults to the people."
global redistribution through taxes that would be levied by an international body may seem far-fetched today, but the logic of development that we are witnessing - particularly the move away from nation-states as the locus of sovereignty - suggests that it may eventually come to pass.
it is natural that the eyes make little moves during the treatment.
I would invite you to look at the work of ritu Birla, who has proposed historiography itself as a secret encounter. this is a very bold interdisciplinary move.
Mr President, faced with the process of liberalisation and deregulation currently underway in the European Union, moves for proposals to be put forward and action to be taken in the field of public services have built up. the contribution of these has led to the fact that Article 16 of the Treaty of Amsterdam recognises the essential role of services of general interest in ensuring social and territorial cohesion.
Mumbai - India's economy could soon be on the move again.
as was noted in Bali, any move on the part of the developing countries will depend not only on serious commitments by the developed countries to reduce emissions, but also on substantial efforts on the part of those countries to provide funding, especially for the transfer of technology and creation of the necessary administrative capacity.
we also see ourselves as a port - with a fleet of employees who are always on the move.
labour has sought to avoid a constitutional debate, because any move in the direction of federal institutions requires addressing the party's over-representation in the UK parliament.
when I did not do a particular move the right way, Ahnya gently aligned me in a loving and patient manner.
on 8 May 2008, Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi appointed her Minister for Equal Opportunity, a move that received international attention due to her special background and her appearance.
in the West, virtually every move of the artist, the art market, and the art public is documented.
we were just one of countless groups of ordinary citizens that were on the move after the enormity of the earthquake became apparent.
toddlers are always on the move, excited and able to explore the world around them!
long drifted moves, focus on joints, with specific attention to tensed areas.
they have often not recognised themselves in the circular and self-referential intellectual moves of scholars who merely look for ambivalence and hybridity in every human gesture, for instance, without any sense of the inequalities and the distribution of resources.
I am sorry that you did not do this because, of course, moves are now afoot which we perhaps do not like at all.
Mr President, just when responsible people and governments are watching every penny, the Commission proposes more expense - Youth on the Move card, European skills passport, European Vacancy Monitor - through Europe 2020, all for cultural diplomacy and to get young people to travel when they do that already, backpacking their way round the world on their own initiative.
on completion of the moves foreseen in 2002, the Commission will launch proceedings under article 50 of the Staff regulations in respect of A1 officials, who have no foreseeable work assignment as Directors General, Deputy Directors General or Conseillers hors classe.
the user can control the moves of a robot in a maze.
it is always comfortable atmosphere prevails when maid is watching your every move, and administrator vmiyut usmihatysya.
the Lich King has risen, and his forces are on the move.
aspiring champions jump on a giant trampoline, shooting up to nearly 30 feet in the air, and are called upon to perform a series of tumbling moves (twists, pikes and somersaults) before eventually landing on their feet.
at Schleuniger, there was a lot on the move in 2005.
with the transition to the euro, they will at some point have to convert old notes and coins into euros and, at that point, there is an opportunity for control and follow-up of leads that have perhaps been given from other sources.
the Client must quote any hazards and notes on handling known to him.
of note, in fact, is the considerable increase in sales in Italy thanks to a subsidiary of Piadena with the new cash and carry and new production companies of Mediterranean plants.
I must try to remember the stories Alice told me, figure out how her skills are relevant to Juan's problems and compose a note.
one positive note was from the Republic of Ireland, which saw its PMI grow to 57.3, its highest level since the end of 1999.
here are important notes to the implementation of the central architecture components described.
notes travel along with the article, even when it's imported into QuarkXPress.
and when the first notes of "Solu May" arrived, everyone began to fidget and sing as "Solu May solu May, salama... salamalicum.
Magnoli incorporated the notes of past and present to create an exquisitely-designed 5 star luxury Prague hotel.
the various Member States' more or less panicky reactions faced with people 's desire to find sanctuary and a new life in Europe have struck a very discordant note, given the humanitarian values the EU stands for.
the idea behind the development of the Aulochrome - on September 10, 2001 - and its completion in 2002 is the fact, that you can play only one note at a time on the saxophone.
Mr President, it is quite opportune that I am the last speaker, as I want to add a note of optimism to the debate, which until now has been rather gloomy.
the PitchCorrect plug-in removes intonation problems in real time and shifts recorded vocals to the next note value on a defined scale.
but, putting to one side both the general celebratory atmosphere and the slight note of cheer in my voice, I am in fact dissatisfied.
in some recitals, for example, I might change between a single Bb horn and a double horn - not only because of some low notes, but also because I play entire parts of certain works on the F horn only.
the dual approach is a technique Chromatic Melodic Embellishment connecting two notes separated by minor third, with two chromatic notes (two consecutive semitones).
so I welcome the note of caution that I detect in some parts of the text.
the action of moving from one note to another by sliding your finger without interrupting the sound, but through all the intermediate sounds.
if we hear notes of criticism here in Parliament, then that is important and necessary.
in addition to its root note, every sound contains one or more overtones (whistling tones).
you're not singing by yourself - and in a group of 50 people singing, who'll hear if a note's out here or there?
and yet a leaked internal communiqué from the hospital struck a rather different note.
if we do not want war, if we do not have the means to wage war, then we should not sound a warlike note.
the notes from F # 3 to D4 are produced by overblowing the fundamental scale (first-degree overblowing), the fingering is the same as that for the lower octave.
the Council, at its meeting of 31 October 1994, took note with great interest of the Communication of the Commission.
- notes with interest the Commission's assessment report, which represents the first stage in implementing the conclusion of the Madrid European Council;
the Commission suggested the funding of peace-keeping operations and the ACP took note with interest.
"the Council examined with interest the above report and takes note of the findings and the criticisms formulated by the Court of Auditors concerning the management and control by the Commission of the above interest rate subsidies.
it took note with great interest of its principal conclusions, in particular its finding that, while efficient within the limits of its current scope, the Directive does not measure up to the ambitions expressed in the unanimous Council conclusions of 26 and 27 November 2000.
in this context, the Council notes with interest the recommendations by the Court on the ways to remedy the shortcomings observed.
takes note with interest of the Communication and fourth report from the Commission on the present situation and prospects for radioactive waste management in the European Union covering the situation until the end of 1997;
notes with interest the Commission's intention of submitting a proposal for a Framework Directive on charging for the use of infrastructure for all modes of transport;
6. notes with interest the Commission's intention of submitting a communication to lay down guidelines for the application of public procurement legislation to transport infrastructure projects,
notes with interest the recommendation to further improve the monitoring system and ensure that appropriate indicators are monitored in the new programme period and ACKNOWLEDGES with satisfaction that the Commission will devote attention to this.
in particular, the Commission takes due note of the strong interest expressed by your institution for legislation relating to sources of noise.
we hope - and I say this also as chairman of the Delegation to the EU-Slovak Republic Joint Parliamentary Committee - that the Slovak President and Prime Minister will take note of the recommendations of the joint parliamentary committee and heed their significance for the process of integration of Slovakia.
the European Union has taken note with interest of the decision by the Emir of Kuwait to grant women the right to vote and to stand as candidates.
Mr President, I have listened with great interest to the debate and taken note of the different concerns expressed.
of particular note is the fact that spammers, viruses, worms etc have been known to abuse e-mail addresses posted to our mailing lists.
notes with interest that a number of Community interventions under the Structural Funds directly concern the cultural field (historic and artistic heritage, traditional crafts, etc.);
the designs of the bank notes were announced by the European Monetary Institute at the Dublin European Council in December 1996 (and were confirmed by the European Central Bank in September 1998).
India's current policy of replacing 1,000-rupee notes with 2,000-rupee notes undermines the long-term effectiveness of its policy.
in addition to order tracking it also offers document management (display and archiving of order confirmations, delivery notes, invoices and test certificates) and the claim status.
each country must also produce the stock of notes required for its own market.
firstly, as far as notes are concerned the European Central Bank alone is empowered to commission the printing of bank notes.
everyone is jostling to get hold of a note; the Convention draft is being dealt with as if a piece of game were being hunted to death so that everyone can pull out a piece for themselves.
public frustration is now mounting, because the government has failed to meet the demand for new printed notes.
the most vulnerable, the most fragile, those who are least well-informed, small businesses, micro-businesses who may find themselves bearing the cost of worthless, forged notes that they have accepted by mistake.
the customer is relieved of the requirement to fill in delivery documents (way-bills, shipping notes etc.) and of the relative liability.
I wish to specify that the system is based on the experience acquired from all the Member States, and it ensures consistency with the unit values planned for notes.
anti-Semitism represents an offense to democracy, but -for believers- also a serious and culpable matter in front of God (...) Understand well that when one burns the synagogue, they also burn the church, the mosque, democratic politics, culture and much more... Thus, dear friends, today we are again together and tomorrow we will be always together to be silent and listen to the voices of those drowned in the Shoah.
there are sculptured stone reliefs (also called "organ") not far from the farmstead.
welcome are also piano, harpsichord, organ, guitar and harp players.
a new recording session has been done recently on a historical organ!
Bishop Vitalis de Lestang (1621- 1652) ordered Crespin Verniole to install an organ.
the organ was rebuilt between 1680 and 1687 by Jean de Joyeuse, and was then enlarged between 1772 and 1775 by Jean-Pierre Cavaillé.
largest organ of the whole Balaton-region is to be found also in the church.
guest house landlady Veronika Schramm, like many of Kallstadt's inhabitants, mentions that descendants of the Heinz family made a donation towards the church organ when they visited, which was very well received.
the old lead windows were left in their original state, as was the masonry with angels, and even the organ.
also the church organ with a large quantity of antique wooden and metal pipes represents a remarkable masterpiece from an artistic and historical point of view.
no longer by sticking microphones to organ and drums in order to get the instruments to produce unheard sounds via the self-made effects devices.
also after the town fire a new organ was built between 1668-73 by the master organ-builder from Glückstadt Berend Hueß and his apprentice Arp Schnitger on which Vincent Lübeck played from 1674.
oratorio for mixed chorus, children chorus, soprano, organ and orchestra.
the organ has now been refinished and looks good for its age.
many of them are the pride of the city, such as the cathedral of Oliwa, with the wonderful organ, and the picturesque, historic garden surrounding it.
composition for eight portative organs, percussion, great organ and conductor by Jean Guillou.
recently he took up the street organ and became St. Petersburg's music man, because he was ready for this complex role with all his Bohemian existence, philosophy and image.
this massive church boasts the largest church organ in Central Europe and its tower is open to tourists for the fine view of the town centre.
"the Christian Müller organ, built between 1724 - 27, in the Grote Kerk in Leeuwarden was modified in the prevailing fashions during the 19th and 20th centuries, and in 1972 was restored to the original form.
however, corruption in the tax administration, an upsurge in organised crime and a plethora of cases of fraud mean that the organs of State - government, parliament and the judiciary - and spending controls do not yet work properly.
the third volume narrates how Old Shatterhand and Sans-ear chase the bandits Fred and Patrick Morgan, how Old Shatterhand tracks a pack of railtroublers, who ally with the Ogellallah; how Winnetou is killed in action, how Old Shatterhand looks for the testament of his blood-brother, and how the scoundrel Santer faces his deserved end.
we cook our meal (rice, of course), and just when we started to swallow it down a pack of twelve wild domestic pigs turns up.
the hydro and aerodynamically researched and manufactured convexly designed device decreases the palm's resistance in the water.
place the palms of both hands behind you on your lower back just above your waist.
there are lines in a palm that can change during the course of life, but there are also lines and patterns that remain the same from the point of birth until the time of death.
fill the palm of your right hand with water and wash the face from the top of the forehead to the bottom of the chin.
the pressure is made with the thumbs, palms and soles.
"suddenly, a shot banged loudly and simultaneously a feeling of heat and a terrible pain in my palm struck me.
there is no need for an EU directive to legislate on total harmonisation or detailed specifications relating to the construction of buses, for example the width of seats, height of boarding platforms, provision of palm-operated buttons, or size and location of exit signs.
in a previous experiment the research team had already discovered that the duration and pitch of a kitten's miaow changes depending on how urgently they need help.
furthermore, public anger is reaching fever pitch, owing to the effective redistribution of wealth away from workers brought about by Macri's policies.
34Soaps, organic surface-active agents, washing preparations, lubricating preparations, artificial waxes, prepared waxes, polishing or souring preparations, candles and similar articles, modelling pastes, "dental waxes" and dental prepartions with a basis of plaster
unique little details - the lid with its stylized rosebud, the plates' arched edge, the delicate handles with their sweeping floral motif - never cease to please the eye.
from simples name plates, badges, or machine plates to 2 and 3D fine art work engravings or embossings.
put the whole eggplants on a baking plate covered with baking paper. bake at 200 ° C (392 F) until done.
all the edges of the steel sheet are milled on a plate beveling line (welding seam preparation) in order to produce plate with tight tolerances in terms of dimensions, angularity and parallelism of edges.
the plate commemorating the award obtained by Alizée on October 29th 2008 in the award of "Las Lunas del Auditorio" was finally placed in the enclosure placed (Auditorio Nacional) in Mexico City.
the plates are intended as a contrast to the cenotaph to the entrance hall, which underlines to much the hostility towards the former rivals of Germany.
plot lines are often 'adapted' for comic or satirical effect, and certain familiar scenes tend to recur, regardless of plot relevance. 'straight' re-tellings of the original stories are rare in the extreme.
you will appreciate the first gear especially on slopes and on heavily neglected plots where mowing is to be performed with special care and attention.
Hancock is a superhero born to the cinema, there is no balloon behind him.. A real genuine superhero short film.. Beautiful the basic idea, that of an alcoholic superhero, quarrelsome and unable to use his powers without disastrous combination, too bad the ending where instead you back on the usual "binary," the good superhero, with his costume, which fights the bad guys and save the innocent.. There's also the usual story of impossible love, but I will not reveal anything more of the plot.
all very well, except that the subsequent paragraph in which Cameron supposedly describes the plot of the book instead gives a précis of the 2012 film version, which added new characters and detail to pad out the fairly brief original text.
the expansion is not limited by a linear plot line but makes use of new ways to expand your empire.
I do not know, should be throwing rle hours of play and see if the plot takes so many turns as in the Baldurs... but for now all very well painted.
thanks to the choreography, scenic images and video animations they were able to follow the plot regardless, according to the press release from Münster's Young Theatre.
given he is an avowedly hands-on parent, it seems unlikely Cameron is so unfamiliar with the book's plot, in which a young unnamed boy hears how the local environment was devastated by the avaricious, tree-chopping, thneed-knitting Once-ler, despite the protests of the eponymous Lorax, a squat, moustachioed creature who "speaks for the trees."
I look forward to reading the plot of Pharaoh to continue in the line up that will last my son at least.
this film is an old-fashioned puzzle movie, though plot is very bland, but the recent downturn of the face of it seems to me you can give me some encouragement, the plot is very simple, is a breakthrough of the disciples wanted to face the a super-intelligent master, coupled with great patience, as well as unfathomable wisdom of words.
"part of what he's doing that makes it feel like a reality show is that he is feeding you something every night," said Brent Montgomery, chief executive of wheelhouse Entertainment and the creator of "Pawn Stars," about the Trump show's rotating cast and daily plot twists (picking a fight with the N.F.L., praising Kim Jong-un).
the plot of Dragon Ball Z Mugen Edition consists of a tragic event on Earth which causes the planet to be divided by darkness.
Europe's tragedy is not the result of an evil plot, but stems, rather, from a lack of coherent policies.
so the clan elders concocted a secret plot to take the late king's young sons out of the country.
Putin's claim that democratization is actually an American plot "to gain unilateral advantages" resonates with many societies following the disastrous invasion of Iraq and revelations about the National Security Agency's spying on citizens and leaders worldwide.
at the end of The Manchurian Candidate, another brainwashed character - Frank Sinatra's Marco - escapes his programming to foil the communist plot.
prosecuting that decision would have inflamed suspicions of an anti-Serbian plot; choosing not to prosecute would have incited countervailing charges that the Tribunal was not fulfilling its mandate.
diplomatic pressures intensified yesterday on the Syria of Bachar al-Assad, who, with the support of Russia, is resisting them and has denounced a "plot" against his country.
perhaps the greatest film of this type, The Manchurian Candidate, concerns a communist plot to use the brainwashed son of a leading right-wing family to upend the American political system.
Jose Martinez Andreo, who last May was replaced by Juan Morales, current popular deputy, and then alderman of the municipality, and according to investigation sources consulted by the Chain SER, could be leader of this plot.
lastly, I wish to mention an aspect which is of the greatest importance, and that is the confiscation of all illicit proceeds acquired directly or indirectly from the crime of trafficking or from being a member of a criminal organisation or of a plot to traffic drugs.
a group of loyalist liberals hold key financial and economic posts, balancing the hawks in the military and special services, including structures like the Security Council, which frequently serves as an incubator for elegant conspiracy theories about Western plots.
violent conflict in Dagestan, bomb attacks in Moscow, and all this in the midst of rumours about plots and all kinds of theories as to what is supposed to be behind it all, and all the different associations being made, for example with the forthcoming parliamentary elections and attempts by certain groups to undermine this process.
obviously, the terrorist threat is real and endures, as the recent foiled plot in Germany attests.
legal systems cannot, as it were, be transplanted like flowers from one pot to another.
I do not know whether it is a direct consequence of this Risi initiative that three ladies signed the European budget today, but I should be delighted if this Christmas present on which we are deciding today could also continue to benefit women in the future.
the war is a present to us from law-abiding Europe, your Europe.
the President of the European Commission, Mr Santer, like most of the leading figures present with the exception of Mr Blair, who refused, received a present in the form of a gold watch of very considerable value.
in one song, I've hidden a modification of a real famous Melodie - the one, who will first recognize this Melodie, will get a present!
the Spanish Royal Family also have one of their official homes in Costa Teguise which was a present from the King of Jordan. this is known as La Mareta Residence and is where the President of the Spanish Government, José Luis Rodríguez Zapatero, has also spent his summer holidayso.
Mr President-in-Office of the Council, just imagine if you had to hand out 20 or 25 presents to ensure that everyone agreed.
during this hour-long light-hearted programme with the famous presenter, who was a fervent Barack Obama supporter during the presidential campaign, the president and his wife also recalled their favourite childhood presents.
of course, all presents with the utmost secrecy because they belong to Santa Claus who knows someone needs something, something needs somebody...
Mr Commissioner, what is being presented to the public and the European Commission as a strategic alliance between ARBED and CSI is really a strange privatization operation, or absorption. we Spanish socialists think it is a present from the Spanish Government to a company, strangely enough, with public participation.
the coverage by some Turkish media has been like a slap in the face. "Germany's present on the fiftieth anniversary" is the title of one article on the Haber X Turkish internet platform, which comments on the circumstances around the series of murders.
past (almost) the holidays, the flood that has surrounded us and made it difficult to arrive at our New Year's guests coming back, get back to normal life after the hectic Christmas-New Year period, I think we all promise For next year, no presents, nothing special for New Year, and then regularly at the last minute I think about it...
get into an old tradition of Val Gardena, get enchanted by nativity scene figures and find the right present for a beloved one.
on the other hand, the task is enormously important for democracy and, at present, the information budget in the EU is approximately a quarter of a euro per person per year.
on behalf of the PSE Group. - (NL) Mr President, on behalf of my group I, too, would like to congratulate the citizens of the nine new Member States on the present that the Portuguese Presidency will be giving them on 21 and 22 December.
Madam President-in-Office, I am not giving you a present, but not because I have anything against red as a colour.
this is grace, a wonderful present, that you only need to accept.
I see her (Lady Luck) as a gigantic present and once again I am confounded; that it is me who has been born into the sunny side of life.. "
the company has been manufacturing and offering to the Bulgarian market advertising paper bags, paper bags for presents and loose goods bags since 1997.
products under those brand names are actually designed in England but made in China, and anybody who doubts that China can produce good-quality products should visit their local model train shop at the weekend and, maybe, like me, buy a present for their grandson.
the Council noted that the data available at present did not make it possible to distinguish between the relative merits of the approaches proposed for the improvement of recording equipment.
and a present that one of his friends gave him for his birthday!
besides, on our web-site exists an online shop where you can find a present to your beloved one for any taste and send it to her accompanied with flowers.
a friendly word costs nothing and yet is the most beautiful present.
finally, you can order a portrait as a present or to surprise someone. in case it's not possible to take a photo as I prefer it, we can use your photograph.
Santa Claus loves Bo too, maintains Michelle Obama, adding that the dog would "naturally" have a present, according to the programme's advertising trailer.
TÊTE DE MOINE and the Girolle make a much coveted present and the attraction of your party.
the Open Air gala concert in the Brewery Gardens will surely be a nice present not only for the festival, but especially for all its visitors.
their eyes will sparkle with joy when they begin to open their presents.
the certificates owner can change. that means you can use the gift certificate as a present for a third person if you like.
the designers work topics tremendously on it at present to give clothes and accessories deranged, modern and coloured!
at present there are 46324 products available in this web shop.
it is not unique to any particular race, creed, or culture, nor is it bounded to any particular time or place.
when the fantasy breaks against the hard rocks of reality, the poet may even decide to get off from the world, as did Mayakovsky, in full race, why not managed to stop it.
to learn more about how to get started go to the game guide and the FAQ where you will find information about the various races and classes in the game as well as how to create your character.
. I voted against the resolution in relation to the World Conference against Racism in Durban to make it clear that this conference has done the gravest possible disservice to the promotion of good race relations.
there is also a big barrier, and in the case of finding a good professional, he lacks the experience necessary to work with this breed, which makes the training much more difficult, and in most cases the best way out is blame the dog or race to get by.
next to the lift's door a small set of officers from several different races had assembled and did wait for the next lift.
in this issue, the Insider takes a look inside the quest lines of the two new races introduced to Azeroth, and the daunting challenges to be found in the shattered world of Outland.
first and foremost, Europe is a project for the people, for every single person living in Europe, without distinction of race, colour or nation.
otherwise there would dominant homozygots would be generated and this darker coloring would dominate in the race very shortly.
the long centuries following the Sundering were difficult ones for the troll race.
after a faction change, a character's hearthstone is automatically set to the inn inside the capital city of their new race, which is also where they re-enter the game world as a member of the opposite faction.
in the aftermath of Warcraft III, the battered races of the world attempt to regroup and prepare for a new age of exploration and high adventure in World of Warcraft.
although I could not be, my "correspondents" tell me that the Federation was launched... and the quantity and quality of the specimens was very good... especially, I say it was a good strain on the events of colts and fillies beginners and this shows that our race continues to climb... the judgments, all very successful, were made by Jose Perez and William Strong... Congratulations to the Federation and the organizers of this great competition, so it is Paso Fino!
in "Sunnemo," a village in the neighbourhood, it's possible to visit the Husky farm where they can tell you all about this special dog race and where you even can take a walk with Huskies.
a new threat has entered the known universe, a race who have devastated one sector, and have the power to continue their reign of destruction, a race called the Khaak.
as a race, Night Elves are typically honorable and just, but they are very distrusting of the 'lesser races' of the world.
this framework decision if implemented also challenges traditional values of free speech and this is harmful, not helpful, to good race relations, which we all desire.
for one thousand years, the magic barrier around the ancient fortress city has contained this threat; now, the fate of Kalimdor and all of Azeroth lies in the hands of the mortal races.
251 Participants from 29 Countries submitted 702 entries, including 369 Races, 297 Special Powers and 36 other ideas!
the referendum campaign revived nationalist politics, which in the end is always about race, immigration, and conspiracies.
in 1871, British novelist Edward Bulwer-Lytton, in The Coming Race, described a superior race, the Vril-ya, who lived beneath the earth and planned to conquer the world with vril, a psychokinetic energy.
in 1871, the British novelist Edward Bulwer-Lytton, in The Coming Race, described a superior race, the Vril-ya, who lived beneath the earth and planned to conquer the world with vril, a psychokinetic energy.
* Some races have three varieties of the normal-speed mounts (require 75 riding skill), while others have four.
• Monographic, in the case of our race, is where are the best examples and players of our country, the latter are most important to breeders and exhibitors, as they are judged by specialists.
in the Cuban fields where abounded trapiches and there were hundreds of dowries of slaves of men and women, the races were mixing by violent actions of the masters that abuse of their slaves and later in the different independences wars they went getting the freedom and the mixing continued extending to the present time.
nothing, absolutely nothing, however, should allow us to trivialise Nazism, the intended aim of which - should we need reminding - was to exterminate sub-humans and to enlarge the essential space of the superior race through mass warfare.
whether or not we consider robots to be the next form of mankind, despite the rather odd, non-biological connection to our race, originating in our minds and not our bodies, we will have to reckon with them as an independent species at some point.
it is there in the dark recesses of the mountain's peak that Nefarian has begun to unfold the final stages of his plan to destroy Ragnaros once and for all and lead his army to undisputed supremacy over all the races of Azeroth. Blackwing Lair is a max-level, 40-player raid dungeon, with many new encounters and tempting rewards awaiting the intrepid adventurer that dares enter its halls.
the dreadlords served as his personal agents throughout the universe, and they took pleasure in locating primitive races for their master to corrupt and bring into the fold.
but as tensions rose in the Midwest and drew nationwide coverage, Perez saw responses from white women that centered 100 percent around race.
all our members, regardless of race, color or ethnicity, besides promoting their sports skills via our portal, have the opportunity to play games, participate in regularly held competitons and win awesome prizes.
additional features coming in The Burning Crusade include two new playable races (the Blood Elves and the Draenei), flying mounts, new talents and abilities for all character classes, the new jewelcrafting profession, new magical weapons and armour, and many enhancements to player-vs.-player action.
the Founders themselves were rarely seen, even by their servant races, and were treated as gods or myth.
furthermore, the troll race dominated much of ancient Kalimdor--the only continent on Azeroth before the Great Sundering--long before the night elves came into power.
to better understand the wide variety of possibilities we invite you to consult the races and classes pages of this site.
there are also quite a few races and individuals who have attained immortality after leading a mortal existence.
masks have races with 6-inch spikes and a focus stuck on the top.
Medivh was forced to deal with each race separately, using prophecy and trickery to guide them across the sea to the legendary land of Kalimdor.
the Encyclopedia will contain information about all major races, factions, and characters, and you will also learn interesting new things about the different worlds that make up the Warcraft universe.
ever wanted to try a particular race and class combo in Arena?
despite the trolls "attempts to keep this new race from claiming further territories, the night elves built up a mighty empire that expanded rapidly across Kalimdor.
the nobility, the court, the clergy, the people requested his grace, but the cardinal was pitiless, and Montmorency, the last of its race, was carried out in Toulouse, in the court of the house of city (Oct. 1632).
over the subsequent centuries, Vikings, Saxons, Anglo-Normans, Jews, English, Scots, Spaniards, French Huguenots and many other races came, saw and intermarried with the Celts.
much experimental and statistical evidence shows that individuals trust and associate more with others of the same race.
which, for hello of our race, lost by your jealousy, it is humiliated and returned obeying until dead (pH 2), which built its Church on the solid stone, and promised that the doors of the hell will never prevail against it, wanting to remain with it all over the days, until the consumption of the centuries (MT 28,20).
the ancient subterranean kingdom of Azjol-Nerub, which had been founded by a race of sinister humanoid spiders, sent their elite warrior-guard to attack Icecrown and end the Lich King's mad bid for dominance.
the sporelings, a mostly peaceful race of mushroom-men native to Outland, are facing numerous threats to their quiet way of life.
you will be accommodated in modern and stylish apartments with kitchenette, telephone, Sat-TV, all with balcony or ter-race.
now we, very humbly, dedicate to Grand Master Choa Kok Sui this humble work of disintegration of negative Karma of the human race if GOD, through the intercession of our beloved teacher, will bestow it to us.
the peoples of Azeroth celebrate their triumph of many thousands of years ago, when an alliance of good races (Night Elves, Tauren, and Earthen - a proto-dwarven race) defeated a terrible evil.
this dark race of vampiric demons (also known as dreadlords) conquered a number of populated worlds by possessing their inhabitants and turning them to the shadow.
the rejected appeal (technically called a petition for a "writ of certiorari") was based primarily on the US Supreme Court's 1986 "Batson v Kentucky" ruling which stated that a defendant deserves a new trial if it can be shown that the prosecutor used peremptory strikes to remove otherwise qualified jurors simply because of their race.
in an artist statement written on the gallery's wall, Manning's super-sized signature below it (the "i" in her last name dotted with a heart), called for an end to the "automatic factionalism that gender, race, sexuality, and culture have been the basis of."
these factors make the abolition of capital punishment increasingly difficult, but it is our duty, not only as Members of the Parliament, but as members of the human race, to continue our tireless efforts to bring this practice to an end.
in a 1955 letter to The Orlando Sentinel, Hurston questioned the Supreme Court's demand for forced integration, calling its decision in Brown v. Board of Education "insulting rather than honoring my race."
tall, tough and hardy humans, the Norsemen are the main race of Midgard. driven out by the cold and the snow, they moved to these lands with the help of the Dwarves.
could it be that the next phase of evolution for the human race is to do with this increasing electrical circuitry?
in the lower valley there are wide glacial-river terraces favoured by settlements and by cultivation, mostly of grapevine, rye, wheat and maize, while the rest of the region flourishes with the raising of livestock, in particular bovine of the alpine-brown race.
strongly associated with healing, peace, and tolerance, Elune has been revered by the night elves and other races since ancient times.
they are the largest race on the island and are familiar with all its facets inside and out.
these aim at preventing the export of weapons to governments which abuse human rights, to areas of conflict or to regions engaged in arms races.
the country of origin principle encouraged a race to the bottom in regulatory terms, but the country of destination principle encourages stark and stupid protectionism.
winner of 5 races at age 2, among which the Prix Delahante (Listed Race).
my group therefore particularly deplores the fact that no measures have been taken to stop the taxation race between the Member States.
especially in the night the camping grounds look like a fair ground which makes the special atmosphere of the 24h race.
they must also keep records of the waste that they handle.
Mr President, I am also pleased that the French police guarded us so well, of course, but I want to ask Mr Rübig if he has another record in his repertoire, and if he will stop boring us with this rubbish!
it will be the first time in ski history that a unique record will be set up. fastest Speed Sandskiing for the Guinness Book of World Records.
it also contains a record of the history of Abraham and his descendants, beginning with Abraham, and the covenant, or testament, the Lord made with Abraham and his posterity.
the first record came out in the middle of last year, called "Kept Low."
the name of the composer and producer HECTOR ZAZOU, Paris, is usually associated with records like "Geologies," "Les Nouvelles Polyphonies Corses," "Sahara Blue" and with names like John Cale, Ryuichi Sakamoto, Jon Hassel and Bill Laswell.
"someone came in recently and said:" I don't have a record player, but I want to buy a Radiohead record so we can put it on our shelf, "" he says.
with more than 80 million records sold around the world and with his concert held in Moscow in 1997 that attracted the most visitors ever, this...
and even the most important representatives of the German country music szene say, that they need to record songs with German lyrics in order to be successful enough to be allowed to make the next record.
he has, however, noticed a new wave of people influenced by the media hype, people who heard about the comeback and felt compelled to buy back their old records.
it uses lots of high-sounding words that give the impression that the EU is professional, well organised and has properly-maintained financial records.
he agrees that those who purchase records are more likely to be introverts who like their own company, adding: "I don't smoke, I don't drink very much.
14 And as he dwelt in the cavity of a rock he made the a remainder of this record, viewing the destructions which came upon the people, by night.
what is particularly important is to bring a rapid end to the mechanisms that allow 20% of appropriations recovered from irregularities in the EAGGF-Guarantee to disappear, leaving no trace or record in the Community's books, in sums and for purposes of which the Commission is unaware and much less controls.
it will not even encourage poor musicians, as it is not their records that sell more than 50 years after they were made.
this is a new record for ENGEL - it has never welcomed so many visitors to a symposium before. and this despite the very tense market situation.
in July of 1912 Columbia decided to concentrate exclusively on disc records, and stopped recording new cylinder records and manufacturing cylinder phonographs, although they continued pressing and selling cylinder records from their back catalogue for a year or two more.
I am referring both to a single original work of art, as in the case of the plastic arts which we are discussing today, and to works which are reproduced such as books, records and audio-visual material.
they just finished the works on their new record in the Antfarm Studio Denmark with no less than Tue Madsen.
today or tomorrow we will hopefully receive a reply to our record application from the Guiness Book of Records.
then the general church recorder can enter the record on the general church book, with the certificates and all the attending witnesses, with his own statement that he verily believes the above statement and records to be true, from his knowledge of the general character and appointment of those men by the church.
they have been described as the result of subtle ideas and years of enjoyment of thousands of records.
this is an important part of 'women's culture. "" both the red front side of the record with the silver labrys, a double-bladed ax, and the lyrics about violence against women, female friendships and lesbian coming-out leave no doubt that the battle for women's liberation is only possible without men.
the seller is always to find at the start of each advertisement before the record list begins.
and if some good lyrics and a great voice was not enough, in the booklet of the record we can see some minirelatos who develop the history through the songs.
his covers for Columbia - combining bold typography with modern, elegant illustrations - took the industry by storm and revolutionized the way records were sold.
when he got the call to do Toby's record he asked me to come on board as the recording engineer with my mobile Nuendo rig.
for many music enthusiasts records represent the only way to listen to music in all its emotionality and complexity.
they are certainly not spending their Thursday mornings loitering around the record shops of Berwick Street, flicking through records and avoiding the gaze of a creepy, 30-year-old fake television presenter who is looming over the shoulders of unsuspecting middle-aged men.
Elanora, 27, has been walking around Fopp for a few minutes, looking at the variety of records on sale.
Phoenix releases its first record "Vremuri" (Times), an EP with four songs.
his reason for acquiring such a vast number of albums and singles is partly a result of his disposable income: he is now able to buy records he couldn't afford when they originally came out, and to repurchase items he sold when he was young and skint.
he has been part of the musicians roster of the Deutsches Schauspielhaus, he has played on records from Taco to BLÜMCHEN, and - with his subtle humor - which seems to be a trademark of ALL members of UK 5, he adds to the success of the zany duo kahl & KAYSER, its other half being Ernst kahl, the great painter, screen author and politically inspired comedian.
not a leaf falleth but He knoweth it, not a grain amid the darkness of the earth, naught of wet or dry but (it is noted) in a clear record.
the St. Hilarius chapel was first mentioned in records in 1267 in the Württemberg register: count Hermann von Sulz sold "the mountain with the parish church for Tumlingen on it, together with the Bailiwick" to Master Eberhard von Horb and his brother Dietrich for 20 silver marks.
apparently, it is only a technical matter, with perhaps some rather more exciting elements such as reduced rates for records and CD-ROMs.
the two songs' It Pays Off 'and' Million $Man 'have clear hit potential and bring the record a good reception.
the Lakers finished the 2000-2001 Season with a 56-26 record, tied for second best in the NBA.
but perhaps the most exciting innovation offered by Bitcoin is the "blockchain" - peer-to-peer software that keeps a record of all transactions and a tally of who owns what.
the Enhancer restores efficiently the clarity of high frequencies. it restores the dynamics of high frequencies in dull tape recordings or old records.
to the left is a stairwell, a wall of which is stacked with records by Adele, Jeff Buckley, Amy Winehouse and Fleetwood Mac: a mix of contemporary and classics, the essential records for any average collection.
their old records were released on vinyl, and sold well. royalties from these record sales provided some much-needed income for the aging Harmonists, who were then scattered throughout the world.
that is the most anemic consumer recovery on record - fully 1.5 percentage points slower than the 12-year pre-crisis trend of 3.6% that prevailed between 1996 and 2007.
it also helped give the series a record audience at the time.
Mr President, during Commission Question Time at the last part-session 34 questions were tabled by MEPs but only eight received answers, which is a new record.
we have before us a report which had 106 amendments in committee - a record for the discharge.
among his many records, there is also flying at 15,445 metres, above the Andes, but with a co-pilot.
if you want to know how to get to EuroSpeedway Lausitz the fastest way, to inform yourself about our different track layouts, if you're searching an overview of our area or grandstands or if lap records are the important thing for you, you will find the right information directly in this category.
it must be something of a record to receive a six-minute reply at Question Time.
this important step should be applauded, but at the same time, we cannot overlook the fact that China holds the record for the highest number of death penalties, the true number of which we do not even know, due to a lack of transparency and the fact that certain people are qualified as non-people.
Germany also holds the record for the efficiency of LEDs with 150 lumen / watt (lm / W).
century Child came out in May 2002 and made a sales record, selling gold in Finland within 2 hours!
the record of abstention beaten at every single European election should serve to remind us that the supranational level is not that of a fair and effective democracy.
the wish to outperform the old record prevalences pretty soon.
I found 3 typos in my texts which could be considered a (sad) record, but I'm actually more shocked about the fact that no one ever made me aware of them.
this is a record, as I think we have 13 or 15 requests, and even though Members are still asking to be included, we obviously cannot have 20 people speaking.
even in good times, the German Government of Mr Schröder went through the 3% ceiling, and Greece, of course, broke all the records, because the Greek political class is utterly unable to manage money.
sadly, as a native of Galicia I am all too aware of the unfortunate record held by that part of Spain. eight such accidents have taken place there over the last thirty years.
(HU) Please forgive me for the unusually personal note, but while we have been discussing the programme against cancer and many people emphasised what a terrible illness this really is and how many people die of it, I could not help remembering that four years ago I too was suffering from this illness, and at this very time of year I think I managed to set some sort of record, according to the oncology department.
because, according to the definition used, this income could be higher than the minimum wage, which is what 15% of French workers earn; a record among developed countries.
I can prove that no matter where you are, if the music is good, and you know, the talent is there, you can make a record number one, anyone, do not have to go to LA (Los Angeles), do not have to go to New York or Chicago or anything like that, passion is what matters, not the technology.
free entry to museums and art galleries - certainly in Scotland and the United Kingdom - has seen record levels of people visiting cultural institutions.
2010.02.11 --- On the occasion of the first meeting of the interdepartmental committee of disabled people to coordinate the activities of ministers and the relations with associations and CNCPH, the first minister, Francois Fillon in an exclusive interview, we brings his view of politics and the balance of the action his government is on record.
President Barack Obama's new budget calls for a stunning $1.75 trillion deficit in the United States, a multiple of the previous record.
it could mark the end of a Ryder Cup career that has never quite matched the heights of his individual record.
instead, such incentives - such as the US corporate-tax cuts enacted in December 2017 - reduce government revenues, on balance, and help to fuel record-high profits for companies, while producing little private investment.
in its first year, the programme supported a record 650,000 mobility grants for students, trainees, teachers, volunteers and other young people and paved the way for the first student loans for a full Master degree abroad.
been back at their historical origin, the last summer games have broken all records.
the same thing applies to the banking sector where the arrival of the euro gave a veritable boost to the mergers and acquisitions which eat up jobs and which shifted the emphasis of banking towards financial and even speculative activities. the sad record is held by Renault which is gratifying its shareholders with its swingeing job cuts at Nissan even if it means exporting the most horrendous image of Europe to Japan whilst, as an indirect result, shedding several thousand jobs within the European Union itself.
China, the self-styled democratic Republic of the Congo, the United States and Iran have the sad record of coming at the top of the list of the countries which apply the death sentence.
despite February setting a new monthly record with around 1,940 relocations, the current pace of relocation is still well below expectations and below the European Council endorsed target of at least 3,000 monthly relocations from Greece and the target set by the Commission of at least 1,500 monthly relocations from Italy.
however, it is the essential, yesterday was a day of record here in the Money... Come home more of these!
this is a real record, which I hope will now lead to greater consideration of the financial constraints in our legislative activities.
the current cycle is by far the longest the Fed has waited since the end of the last recession; the record had been 35 months, and this is 74 months and counting.
you made reference to the fact that your team set a record in terms of attendance.
one can always dream of better, and I had actually stated that, if the world record was in my reach, I would certainly attempt it.
following the motto "Chase after the record" the three surf-pros Bernd Flessner, Helge Wilkens and Gunnar Asmussen will fight for the minimum time.
the new data confirm that 2015 was the hottest year on record, and show that the global run of record-breaking temperatures continued through the first two months of this year.
this Eliasson-designed automobile, the BMW H2R, is a racing car powered by hydrogen that has been developed to achieve speed records and at the same time point to the future in terms of sustainable mobility.
with an increase of 26.3 percent, hotel rates in the Norwegian city are holding the record for Europe, even.
currently, the record for image resolution among camera phones is 10 megapixels.
one record was improved on by the Hungarian, Evelyn Verraszto, 200m medly, and the two others by Russia in the 4x50m medly relay.
he is frequently booed and mocked by fans, and many thought that baseball's commissioner, Bud Selig, should not attend games at which Bonds might tie or break the record.
in love there is no ladder to be climbed or records to be broken. what you want is relaxing and enjoying.
the club is not connected to Guinness World Records. we cannot give "official" information related to Guinness World Records and their record book.
having unleashed 238 world records since February 2008, these swimsuits will end their epic story in Istanbul, which had also seen the first ones in 1999, during the same competition.
the young swimmer did not succeed in reducing the record he currently holds in the 400m freestyle (3: 32.77), but did, nevertheless, make an impression by achieving his second personal best time (3: 34.55), ahead of the Russian, Nikita Lobintsev (3: 35.75) and the Dane, Mads Glaesner (3: 36.82).
this is a record and means that China, for the tenth time in succession, is the global leader when it comes to new trademark applications, informed the authority.
Loris Capirossi's record breaking 277th Grand Prix appearance may not have ended with a repeat of his Brno podium return, but the Italian was still happy that an important step had been taken with the Rizla Suzuki GSV-R. Capirossi had a busy weekend due to the arrival of a new chassis used previously only at the post-race Czech Republic test, but believes that any early teething problems had been resolved by the end of the Sunday race.
we are an agency capable of achieving more than 2500 customers in a match, which is a true record and a challenge in organization and control.
the large variety of species that are caught in the island's waters is evident from the fact that these fishing records have covered many divergent fish species, such as the blue marlin, swordfish, yellowfin tuna, bigeye tuna, Atlantic bonito, barracuda and albacore, among others.
in fact, the carbon-14 monitor gave a 493-centimetre-long Greenland shark an age of 335, while the record-holding shark, at 502 centimetres, was apparently 392 years old.
in any event on Tuesday the difference between German long-term rates reached a record of 210 base points and the price of contracts to cover the risk of bankruptcy (CDS) took off to reach 263 points, producing a certain amount of panic in Rome.
Serbia and Bosnia and Herzegovina have recently suffered the worst flooding since records.
Middle-distance runner Muir is leading the way, having set five British and two European records in the past year.
at Airbus, a record number of aircraft, 453, were delivered.
this record was accepted by the Guinness Book of Records, but later they added the comment "Some experts on calculating prodigies refuse to give credence to the above - largely on the grounds that it is so vastly superior to the calculating feats of any other invigilated prodigy.
the winning sequence in the first division ends directly behind champions MVV and is sufficient for promoting back to the Eredivisie. the goal is achieved and the average attendance, 12.400, is a first division record.
Julius Nielsen, who has been studying the sharks, says record goes to a female thought to be between 272 and 512 years old and is five metres in length
the implementation of the budget was the poorest on record.
Hitler in anger against the record Usain Bolt Hitler angry cons delivery Kanye...
his current aim is the ascent of the "Seven Summits" (the highest mountains of all continents) in a new minimum record time.
they focused on buying assets, repackaging them, and selling them, while establishing a record of incompetence in assessing risk and screening for creditworthiness.
this record was broken by Elector August the Strong of Saxony some two hundred years later, in 1730.
accordingly, as the Democratic Republic of the ruler, the people's trust to accept the terms of reference (mandate), must give priority to defending freedom of expression, democracy can not fault the way the Democratic buried.
use the comfortable text editor EDDIE for text input, typing and typesetting. even edit all control codes for text rulers, style and kerning information and stuff directly in the text editor.
strong cardboard (ask at your local printshop, they'll usually have something like this left as waste), a cutter, meaning a tinker knife (from the local homeworker's market), a steel ruler (plastic rulers will be turned into fine plastic chips by the cutter), as well as area-applicable glue.
although they don't have a taste like the sea variety, some of them like the Corvina and the brave Dorado (named after its golden scales) destach among the others.
she referred to sayings such as: "Holzauge sei wachsam" (keep your eyes peeled), "wie Schuppen von den Augen fallen" (like scales falling from one's eyes), "ein Auge auf jemand werfen" (to cast an eye on someone), "den seinen gibt's der Herr im Schlaf" (good things come to some when they sleep) and "seine Hände in Unschuld waschen" (to wash one's hands of something).
many cafes, restaurants and hotels have only kosher food, with no pork, seafood, fish with no scales, or dishes that combine milk with meat.
organic shapes, wild colors, unusual use of stone, fragments of tiles and mosaics, facade reminiscent of scales and soft curves everywhere, all of which are typical of Art Nouveau by Antoni Gaudí.
after all, were the scales not falling away from the eyes of Chinese leaders, and were they not now turning for salvation toward the God of capitalism that they had once so militantly denounced?
this reptile had more than 6 meters in length, evidence indicates that this reptile ate fish fossils were found in scales of fish and cephalopods in their stomachs.
the needles of the Dermaroller will remove the grey scales.
management of major scales in response to the emergence of a new sharp or flat in the key signature.
indeed, in certain environments, an acoustic piano can prove disruptive; the diligent tones of children practising scales are unlikely to be welcomed by other family members wishing to watch television, while even the most gentle, soothing Chopin preludes have the potential to irritate neighbours if performed after an acceptable time.
the most common scales are 7 sounds like the major scale, minor, or the mixolydian, etc..
basic major scale, and on each of his notes make a scale, we get 7 scales different, they all are the harmonic field of the major scale.
compare the natural harmonic sequence with the musical scale and learn more about temperament and tunings.
interval is a highly unstable, very dissonant, that divides the scale into two equal parts (the chromatic scale has 12 semitones, the tritone is 6 semitones).
bodystyling's global method helps you win the battle with your scales in a natural and healthy way.
absurdity of 2009 was the obligation of physiotherapists to have a large mirror, a refrigerator and two stepping scales in the office.
the reason to repeal the legal acts is that they are no longer necessary, technically outdated and / or applied more seldom, as in the case of the directive on weights for use on non-automatic weighing scales.
it employs highly sensitive scales to weigh the debris particles caught in the membranes, thus determining the weight of each component's residual contamination before rinsing.
our Accredited Metrological Laboratory ensures in conjunction with the Czech Metrological Institute mandatory metrological validation of medical scales.
we put pressure on wood quality used in doors production (glue laminated timber of pine-tree or mahogany), its tightness (seal goes through the entire circuit), rendering quality, but also the aesthetics and functionality.
Eldim's high-quality seal and honeycomb technologies supplement Sulzer Metco's existing abradable and braze markets, while the EB / PVD coating capabilities of Sulzer Metco Coatings BV is a logical step in the expansion of Sulzer Metco's coating services business in Europe.
a) E-Fork ® conceived from the mechanic version Forkseal ® along with the electronic part consolidated inside the seal.
and it are not only the seals that protect the camera against annoying dust.
Freudenberg develops and produces seals, anti-vibration systems, filters, nonwovens, release agents, speciality lubricants and mechatronics products.
as an alternative to braiding, BIW also has modern weaving and knitting machines to produce a wide range of hoses and seals.
the Council decided not to oppose the adoption of a Commission regulation laying down implementing rules for regulation 1007 / 2009, which sets strict conditions for the marketing of seal products in the EU.
the five-metre-long animal can ramp this up to 2.6 km / h if necessary - but this maximum speed is half as fast as a seal.
the seals are also significantly disturbed, particularly during the breeding season, and breeding sites are not adequately protected.
through windows, visitors will be able to watch polar bears, seals and penguins swim and dive.
it is similarly important for the Czech Republic that the labelling of Czech slivovice, which is traditionally distilled from plums, cannot be used also for, say, European distilled spirits that are plum-flavoured because plum juice has been added to the spirit.
the European Commission welcomes completion of the negotiations on the wine and spirits agreements between the European Union and South Africa
the aim is to allow European producers of spirits to retain their indications of geographical origin on the world market.
the Council adopted today - by written procedure - a Decision for an Agreement between the European Community and Canada creating more favourable conditions for the harmonious development of trade in wine and spirits drinks (11012 / 03).
that means, Mr President, that the various amendments I would really like to have introduced so that unit prices could be compared everywhere have been withdrawn in favour of the solution offered by the Commission, in other words that wine, spirits and the like may remain exempt.
the purpose of adopting a single regulation bringing together the two existing regulations is to pursue a well-defined policy for spirit drinks, adapting the current law to the new technical requirements also defined by the World Trade Organisation.
the agreement, if confirmed by the European Parliament, will mean free sizes for pre-packed products except for wines and spirits, for which the current existing fixed sizes have been streamlined.
the Commission also manages two registers for geographical indications of wines and spirit drinks.
it will also become easier to trade wine and spirits, exports of which are important for both the EU and Mexico.
one proposal in particular that has been taken on board is the abolition of the initial proposal for the categorisation of spirit drinks; secondly, the introduction of a strong quality policy for spirit drinks; thirdly, the withdrawal of the proposal to allow flavours to be added to eau de vie; and fourthly, the strengthening of the powers of the European Parliament by introducing the regulatory committee with scrutiny procedures in most of the cases for which provision is made for comitology.
Madam President, firstly, I want to say that the Commission is to be congratulated on rejecting a recent proposal by the WHO that we should ban the sale of duty-free alcohol and spirits.
the EU is the number one exporter of spirits to the Colombian market and, as a result, the trading partner most affected by these measures (followed by Mexico, Costa Rica and the United States).
the Korean consumer market, in turn, wants access to speciality European agricultural products, such as wines, spirits, meats, cheeses, all protected by geographical indicators.
the EU's openings on certain products are limited and calibrated and are balanced out by Canadian openings that satisfy important European exporting interests, such as cheese, wine and spirits, fruit and vegetables, processed products and geographical indications.
the Council adopted a Regulation on spirit drinks and a Regulation delaying by two years the entry into force of the electronic identification of small ruminants.
the new legislation provides for a final rate of 27% applicable to all spirits as from March 2003.
on the basis of the information available to it, however, the Commission considers that it is not a medicinal product but a herb-based alcoholic product with properties wholly comparable with those of other spirits marketed in Germany.
apart from the fact that this would eliminate customs duties on products of concern to Portugal, such as textiles and clothes, we are also concerned about the specific case of the Davos Agreement on wines and spirits.
these and different spirits, which are the specialities of other countries, need another designation, primarily to prevent attempts at misleading customers.
the agreement also regulates production and quality standards for wines and spirits in bilateral commerce.
the Association Council noted that both Parties are currently negotiating mutual concessions in agricultural products and processed agricultural products with a view to further liberalising bilateral trade and improving market access in the pre-accession period, as well as an agreement on wine and spirits which covers both new mutual concessions and improved protection for denominations.
the Commission suggests specific commitments be negotiated in order to guarantee fair market access opportunities for those wines, spirits and other agricultural and foodstuff products.
first of all, the border countries, the Eastern border countries in particular, may face a rise in the flow of smuggled goods because the prices of spirits are much lower, both in Russia and Belarus, and the decision to fight against smuggling should not only focus on the strengthening of border protection.
(SK) When Slovakia acceded the EU, local producers were required to make changes to the designation of alcohol and spirits.
the same applies to rum, since we have signed a unilateral agreement with the United States on the import of colourless spirits, and that includes rum, which will inevitably lead in the short term to the economic destabilisation of the entire Caribbean!
while it is easy to say what sake is not - it is definitely not a distilled spirit like vodka or gin - it is a bit harder to say exactly what sake is.
it has also undertaken to give exclusive protection to certain traditional names of spirits such as "grappa," "ouzo," "Korn," "Pacharan" and "Jagatee."
Sweden pursues a restrictive policy on alcohol, which includes high taxes, especially on spirits.
therefore it has been important to update the 1989-1990 regulations, to bring greater clarity and greater legal certainty to improve the definition of the main spirit drinks and to resolve any problems with spirits with a quasi-geographical indication status.
first of all, broadening the definition of vodka to include spirit drinks based on raw ingredients other than those traditionally used infringes the law and is damaging to the economic interests of current vodka producers and consumers.
at that time he sold more than 60 million litres distilled spirits a year. he had branches in Russia, Germany, Hungary, Italy, France, Spain, and on Malta.
"cocktail is a stimulating liquor composed of spirits of any kind, sugar, water, and bitters--it is vulgarly called a bittered sling and is supposed to be an excellent electioneering potion, inasmuch as it renders the heart stout and bold, at the same time that it fuddles the head.
2 / 3 parts "furniture" spirit "loft" in 2nd and last floor of a building 30 ye...
the more recent historiography only deals with what the inhabitants of Åhus calls the three sins; eel, tobacco and distilled spirits.
if you travel via Brussels airport, as most Members here do, you go into the main lobby in terminal B and you can buy a bottle of spirits and 200 cigarettes.
however, Greece does not have a derogation for the spirits Tsipouro or Tsikoudi and currently applies a reduced rate of excise duty (50%) to Tsipouro and Tsikoudi as well as super-reduced rate (around 6%) to the production of those same spirits by small producers, so-called 'two-day distillers'.
what we now have is a proper registration system for geographical indication, which is important, and I am glad we have got rid of the three categories of spirits.
increased imports from third countries as a result of the Uruguay Round Agreements, imports of diluted alcohol at a zero tariff rate applicable to spirits and greater quantities of blends of alcohol with denaturants imported at far lower tariffs have increased pressure on the sector.
these concerns relate to the market for aniseed flavoured spirits in Finland,
in 2014, EU exports of spirits to Colombia valued at 43 million represented approximately 14% of total agricultural exports to Colombia and 77% of total Colombian imports of spirits.
1879 the tenfold-refined spirit was presented under the name of Absolut Rent Brännvin.
it differs from grain spirit by having a characteristical taste, which is caused through the nature of the raw substances, their treatment and production (especially by a slightly smoking for Scotch Whisky).
the panel was brought by the United States and Australia against the EU system of protection of geographical indications and designations of origin for agricultural products and foodstuffs other than wines and spirits.
all other spirits (mostly imported) are subject to a system of price bands at substantially higher taxes.
exclusion of 45% of agricultural products is in conflict with the spirit of that approach.
I think there is nothing in the letter and spirit of the new treaty to contradict that level of flexibility, and we are going to be very flexible when it comes to the new innovative drafting of this flexibility article in the Multiannual Financial Framework.
in that spirit, the Commission proposes to focus on initiatives that could help to trigger inclusive and sustainable growth in the long-term.
that is apparent from the wording, context, spirit and purpose of the provision of EU law.
if you find another player acting in a manner that contradicts the spirit of the guidelines detailed below, you must first verbally request the offending player to discontinue his / her behavior.
in my opinion, all these amendments which have been adopted by the Committee on Fisheries are in line with the spirit of the measure which the Council felt obliged to adopt in order to assist the diversification of those fishermen severely affected by a measure which they feel is particularly unfair.
to achieve this, the Commission and the Council must provide evidence, as their representatives have just confirmed, of the generous spirit that spurs European governments forward in their relations with South Africa and provide a measure of the mutually advantageous consequences that might derive from the furtherance of economic relations between the European Union and South Africa.
the European Union urges all parties concerned to exercise restraint and appeals to Israel and the Palestinian Authority to intensify their efforts with a view to urgently concluding the Framework Agreement foreseen in the Sharm-el-Sheikh Memorandum of September 1999 and the Permanent Status negotiations within the agreed time-frame and with the courage and spirit of compromise that they demand.
on the subject of these two recommendations, I should also like to highlight how the Committee on Foreign Affairs has contrived to imbue both proposals with a markedly political spirit. this is doubtless the result of the committee 's composition and outlook.
in this context, thanks to the spirit of enterprise and to the precious experience matured by their fathers, in the field of porphyry, Girardi Pio and Roccabruna Benvenuto give life to the Art Porfidi Italia s.r.l.
many philosophical spirits ot the times were combined in Kahn's personality. he participated in all the radical experiences of modernization in the early 20th century.
the owl's golden wisdom and peaceful spirit are expressed beautifully in this stunning piece - the first Swarovski owl in colour!
Lars Hendrik Gass, in charge of festival management, desires an immaculate chronicle for this special occasion - a reference book about festival spirit and media in contemporary change.
Abigail Breslin was already three years for advertising spots, including Toys'R'US, in front of the camera before 2002, in M. Night Shyamalans Mystery Signs drama - characters as Mel Gibson's film subsidiary her film debut and gave a Young Artist Award nominated.
a caretaker government oversaw new elections in the spring of 2001, which ushered in Alejandro TOLEDO as the new head of government - Peru's first democratically elected president of Native American ethnicity.
the front frame down to the front leaf springs is painted as well.
in this mode, the robot will act like a spring in the specified direction.
the extra-long springs of the latest generation of dual mass flywheels significantly reduce the spring rate compared to a first generation dual mass flywheel.
Barnes GROUP, USA, Associated Spring - complete spring program, extension springs, compression springs, helical torsion springs, gaseous springs, disk springs (DIN 2093), tool springs (ISO 10243).
"you must not feel the springs when touching the mattress with hands or sitting down on the mattress," warns Helena Prokopova.
next spring the Commission will also deliver proposals on drinking water we promised in response to another successful Initiative.
completely renovated in spring 2008, this elegant 4-star deluxe hotel is situated directly in the centre of the world-famous holiday resort of Bad Gastein.
the charming countryside of the Basel region with its many cherry trees in spring boasts a particularly beautiful display of blooms.
in the spring of 2006 Air Berlin was floated on the stock exchange.
this is a nature reserve, a marshy area with ponds, in which water lilies, reeds and various other marshland plants thrive, and in spring the frogs give a concert. the route marked "R" leads past the nature reserve over slabs of ground-down porphyry rock, down to the idyllic Göllersee, a small lake.
the district is very well known also for the very good conditions of its runs - from the beginning of December to late spring.
delivery of the system is scheduled for the spring of 2010.
in Sportgastein cross country skiing fun attracts way into spring with a snow-granted high track situated around 1600m above sea-level.
as you know we were in Mammoth Mountain CA this spring where we met some korean guys.
in spring the Ujście Warty National Park is very important due to the breeding area of many rare and endangered bird species and the high density of some Polish bird populations.
the beautiful island paradise of Mallorca is getting ready for spring.
whether you choose to stay at the tourist complex or in a hotel near the city, there are warious sports fields nearby and the spring is the best season to experience the Poreč region on a bicycle.
not only do we have to deal with unstable weather gods, but also with decreasing popularity of jogging. but we do our very best for "The mountain adventure" - Det Norske Fjellmaraton - to be "the most beautiful adventure in spring" for as many as possible.
thanks to the slope below the Lomnické Saddle and the rally down to the Tatranská Lomnica is the craggy Mountain-lake an important ski-center in winter as well as in spring. from the valley you can take the elevated-wireway and get to the Lomnické Saddle.
4 And next spring let them depart to go over the great waters, and there promulgate my gospel, the fulness thereof, and bear record of my name.
by spring 2016, we will consider measures in this area.
why have no legal proceedings commenced against those responsible for the oppression perpetrated in what has become known as the 'black spring of 2001'?
the mountain spring in May / June brings lush flower-filled meadows and sprinkles the higher slopes with gentians and all kinds of anemones.
this international event, which took place in spring 2007, turned the city into a wonderful Mediterranean viewpoint, one which attracted many prestigious spectators.
established in the spring of 2004 and housed in a splendid building designed in a typical Amsterdam style, the Savoy Hotel Amsterdam is really magnificent.
and in the spring we will go to the very top - with a very special offer.
during holidays and spring weekends the city centre is crowded with families and visitors who flock here to enjoy the first rays of sun and take part in interesting excursions to the nearby resorts of Gabicce and Gradara, charming villages situated on the top of the promontory ovelooking Cattolica which boasts breathtaking views over the whole of the Riviera.
if anyone should suggest in order to cover the edges of the pool with sand only they should be asked what would happen during the process of water replacement in the spring, winter protection action or in the process of assembly of Any additional elements.
during spring, each year the whole area behind the dunes of this unique part of the North Sea coast turns into a sea of colour as the narcissus, tulips and hyacinths burst into bloom.
the Commission proposes adding to the list of projects the Nordic Gas Grid, to which Parliament gave its support in the spring.
apart from that, in spring 2007 we have planted close to a hectare of noble grape variety Viognier, from which we produce a very special white wine that fits perfectly with seafood and all sorts of fish dishes as well as with Asian cuisine.
since spring 2009, one of the three screens, the Parallel, continues to broadcast eXcetris films.
after days of wine and roses from last spring, when inflation was the prevailing trend on the markets, uncertainty again rears its ugly head, which is not surprising since it is their natural state, in an environment in which agents make decisions about the naturally uncertain future.
the largest number of defaults on sub-prime mortgages will occur this spring.
there are beautiful diving resorts as well as archaeological sites withinan hour drive. the surrounding mountains are perfect for hiking and biking activities in spring and autumn.
an inspired concept was introduced to the Piazza Marina when the Hotel & Residence Il Teatro opened its doors in the spring of 2005.
7 Let each company, with their captains and presidents, decide how many can go next spring; then choose out a sufficient number of able-bodied and expert men, to take teams, seeds, and farming utensils, to go as pioneers to prepare for putting in spring crops.
his long-standing wish to go to South America with Stephan Döge became reality in spring 1994.
the topography is built up in relief on an areal photograph of Reykjavik, Iceland in spring of 1967.
since spring 2004, the caves and grottoes on the cliff face have been abandoned and are now empty.
March was named after the roman god Mars, which went for the god of war but also the spring and vegetation.
"snow security till spring" is therefore not a blunt phrase in Serfaus, not just because of the most modern snow machines on 75km of slopes.
the Arab spring has thrown the pieces up in the air, and, like it or not, the Palestinians and Israelis are caught up in the regional turmoil.
this centrepiece of the programme had its debut performance in Freiburg this spring, to great success.
the age-old X-ray machine - after several attempts at repairing it - eventually broke down in spring.
in 2003 the son Martin took it over and in the spring of 2008 he started the completely refreshing of the new Hotel.
in the spring, we shall be presenting a general vade-mecum on these offices.
such one-stop-shops should be in place in all Member States by spring 2015.
the French army commander had occupied Bavaria since the spring in 1800, during the War of the Second Coalition with Austria.
flights from Szczecin to Dusseldorf Weeze will begin in the spring, and the price per call in one direction will be from 59 PLN (taxes and fees are included).
demand for the tour together with UNHEILIG in spring is still undamped.
since the riots last spring, China's government has taken many pro-active measures, even adopting a "Serf Liberation Day," to defend its record in Tibet of the past 50 years, while continuing to talk with the Dalai Lama's representatives.
s & T's takeover of The Information Management Group in the spring of 2007 extended S & T's geographical footprint into the US, Germany and Switzerland, as well as Japan and China where rapidly growing IT-markets are of special interest to S & T.
as regards the conflict in the south-east of Turkey, the plan to launch an incursion into northern Iraq has existed at least since spring 2006.
he attended primary school in Vaduz-Ebenholz, and he entered the Liechtenstein Gymnasium (high school) in 1979. he graduated in the spring of 1987 (high school diploma type B, with an emphasis on literary history).
the overwhelming majority of the cities and regions that responded to the consultation conducted by the CoR this spring believe that the Europe 2020 project, as it stands, does not have the means to deliver on its promises.
the outlook for global growth and world trade has deteriorated considerably since the spring, due to the downturn in emerging market economies, particularly China.
this became clear in the demonstrations that spread this spring from Istanbul's Taksim Square to much of the rest of the country (though the protests had more in common with Brazil's recent unrest or the revolt in Paris in 1968 than with the popular movements in Egypt or Tunisia).
in the spring, when its feats of memory are needed less, the chickadee's hippocampus shrinks back to its normal size.
Aiko ® Pink can be obtained as of February 2011. Aiko ® Red and AIKO ® White will be available as of spring 2012.
the Microsoft Switzerland management therefore decided to initiate a corporate health promotion program in spring 2007.
one of the internal conflicts within the IDF, which was conceptual as much as it was hierarchical, was articulated in the context of the debate that followed the closing down of OTRI in the spring of 2006 and the controversial suspension of Naveh and his co-director DOV Tamari.
in the spring of 1995, there was a complete collapse of the sheep market in Ireland.
support for the euro fell sharply since the spring, but remained high at 58 per cent.
as a young man working in the Texas oil patch in the spring of 1980, I watched prices for the US benchmark crude rise as high as $45 a barrel - $138 in today's dollars.
(the GfK Association), a total of 19,295 people in 19 countries were surveyed in spring 2009.
yet when in the spring of 2006 an epidemic of measles broke out among the 322 Jarawa it became clear how little is in fact being done for the survival of this ethnic group, which is 60,000 years old.
summer, between June and September, ranges from warm to very hot, while spring and autumn are generally mild throughout the country.
on the edge of despair they asked the Mother of God for help. she pointed the way to the cows but asked the boys to build a chapel in her honor at this place where all of a sudden a spring was bubbling up from the ground.
ther are two sulphurous springs, which can make nearly 'miracles', especially when it comes to the cure of psoriasis, akne and eczema. this complex offers a first class rehabilitation.
it is difficlut for us to find out reception because the room was located in different place. (according to staff, the reception will move to room side, so you may not be confused.
our creative staff are now housed on the 2nd floor as well as the ground floor of Hindenburgstraße 32.
I liked every thing, but the staff, they were wonderful!
Saxo Bank enables private investors and institutional clients to trade FX, CFDs, ETFs, Stocks, Futures, Options and other derivatives via multi-award winning online trading platforms, as well as offering professional portfolio and fund management.
this last point is particularly relevant in the case of Japanese stock or dashi, where soft water ensures that the flavours of the dashi ingredients, be they konbu kelp, bonito flakes or shiitake mushrooms, and those of other ingredients in the dish, are exploited to the full.
the ingredient, which forms the basis of countless Japanese dishes, is the equivalent of stock or bouillon in Western cooking or tang in Chinese cuisine, but as shown in the chart below, it differs subtly from these in a number of ways.
the adaptation of fishing effort to stocks is a priority measure in the planning of Structural Fund assistance for areas dependent on fishing.
COMDEK also offers the competitive benefits such as indurance, commission or employee stock.
film is available at most game lodges, even in remote areas, but stocks are usually smal and of the common sizes and brands.
moreover, Article 28 of the regulation is in fact directed, in keeping with the spirit of Article 114 TFEU, at the harmonisation of the Member States "laws, regulations and administrative provisions relating to the supervision of a number of stocks and the monitoring, in specific situations, of certain commercial transactions concerning those stocks.
always on the right track - learn everything about the quotation of the LANXESS stock here.
their admittedly crude analysis shows why, if volatility continues to fall in 2007, prices of stocks and other assets can still go a lot higher.
in addition, US interests will be able to own up to 49% voting stock in EU airlines, whilst the reciprocal agreement allows just 25% voting stock for EU interests in US airlines.
"history shows that 'quality' stocks tend to outperform during the three months following an initial rate hike," Goldman Sachs analysts said in a report for clients.
prior to that, Jonathon primarily focused on the analysis of infrastructure and development stocks within global emerging markets, including 2 years as dedicated country portfolio manager for an Asia Pacific portfolio.
they looked at the number of customers or subscribers as the basis for valuing internet stocks.
in the past years, they managed to pay the debts off by the mass sale of stocks of the power and distribution networks they acquired from the state during privatization.
in the current deal as I understand it, US interests can own up to 49% of the voting stock of an EU airline, whereas EU interests can only own up to 25% voting stock of a US airline, and I am not sure that is fair or open.
as part of this program, E.ON plans to buy back stock worth approximately EUR 7 billion.
although a minority of all publicly traded European stocks, European companies producing quarterly financial reports dominate stock indices in several Member States (DAX-Index in Frankfurt, MIB-Index in Milan, IBEX-Index in Madrid, CAC-Index in Paris, and also the techMARK segment on the London Stock Exchange).
the sobering truth is that the current world economic crisis was substantially caused by the collapse of speculative bubbles in real estate (and stock) markets - bubbles that were made possible by widespread misunderstandings of the factors influencing prices.
when one American client sold her internet start-up to a major search engine she received $180 million worth of their stock in payment.
in 2017, they will need to reappraise how the global economy works, and recalibrate accordingly their assessment of every stock or bond on sale, because even if some market fundamentals remain the same, many others have clearly changed.
a name change and a 200 for 1 stock split started Metco's decade with a bang.
Deutsche said the impact on stocks tends to get more pronounced later in the rate-hiking cycle and returns begin to diminish.
Cameron Doerksen, an analyst with National Bank Financial, lowered his rating to "sector perform" from "outperform" on Thursday with the view that the stock has limited upside over the next one or two quarters.
to move stock from your brokerage to ours, please give the broker our name, account number and our DTCC clearing number.
information can be anything from your user name to your current score in an interactive game to a list of stocks in your portfolio.
even in spite of these changes, the essential idea of the program, to gain finances for the buyout of bad mortgage stocks, the value of which had dropped because hundreds of thousands of Americans were unable to pay off their mortgages, has remained intact.
discussion about the impact due to the phasing out of nuclear energy has meanwhile pushed RWE stocks to an all time low and also left a significant mark on Eon.
but, given that many IT entrepreneurs were young at the start of their careers, with limited ownership of stocks, a more refined explanation is needed.
Xetra ® MidPoint allows trading members to trade stocks from DAX ®, MDAX ®, SDAX ® and TechDAX ® without disclosing the volume and the limit of their order.
stocks in the Asian markets experienced a dramatic drop on Tuesday, even though the indexes ultimately erased a part of the losses during the day.
transactions with stocks from the Czech Energy Enterprise (ČEZ) reached nearly half of the regular daily trading.
fully 90.6% of US families in the highest decile of the income distribution owned stocks - double the 45% ownership share of the other 90%.
in April 2007, Agere was merged with LSI in a transaction valued at approximately Euro 3 billion in stock.
and while stock markets are recovering in much of the developed world, Japanese stocks continue to stagnate.
search the glossary for explanations of key terms relating to the stock exchange, trading and products.
PKN is a Polish joint stock public company, active in the refining of crude oil and the wholesale and retail of petroleum products in Poland, the Czech Republic and Germany.
MANNLICHER classics are available in half stock, full stock, and Mountain versions.
as far as legally permissible, the general meeting of the shareholders may also take place at other places where a stock exchange on which the company's shares are admitted for trading is located.
this measure, which should be adopted at the next Council meeting, is intended to offset the effects of the drought in Europe which principally led to a serious reduction in European Community cereals stocks, which dropped from 209 million tonnes in 2002 to 184 million tonnes.
they discussed issues raised in the Intergovernmental Conference on the EU draft Constitutional Treaty that are relevant to economic and financial affairs, and took stock of the state of negotiations with Switzerland with a view to the conclusion of the external dimension to the EU's savings tax directive.
- The next item is the debate on the oral question to the Commission by Pervenche Berès, on behalf of the Committee on Economic and Monetary Affairs, on possible stock exchange mergers and future architecture of financial markets in the EU (00069 / 2005 - B60240 / 2005).
a majority of the population wishes to be guaranteed transparent production processes, animal-friendly stock-keeping methods, attractive landscapes, clean water and healthy soil.
pursuant to § 161 of the German Stock Corporation Act (Aktiengesetz = AktG), the Management Board and Supervisory Board of companies listed on the stock exchange in Germany are required to make an annual declaration stating that the recommendations of the Government Commission on the German Corporate Governance Code have been and are being complied with or list the recommendations not complied with and state the reasons why not.
all the parties involved should take stock of their responsibilities in the light of this precarious situation.
"the current rent is still less than the amount needed for simple maintenance of housing stock," commented Pavel Klimes, director of RPG portfolio of residential apartments, and reminded that neglect of the housing stock complained about in relation just to those angry tenants, is the main reason for the increase in rents according to the house owners.
the most recent achievement is the proposal for a Directive on improving the gender balance among non-executive directors of companies listed on stock exchanges (IP / 12 / 1205).
(22) LOOKS FORWARD TO the Communication from the Commission on addressing the challenge of deforestation and forest degradation and its impact on climate change and biodiversity loss, which urges a joint reduction of emissions from deforestation and forest degradation, and the increase in carbon stocks through sustainable forest management and afforestation / reforestation.
the Agreement for the implementation of the provisions of the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea of 10 December 1982 relating to the conservation and management of straddling stocks and highly migratory fish stocks (the United Nations Agreement on straddling stocks) was adopted in August 1995 by consensus at an International Conference called by the United National General Assembly.
this is true for delamination - an error referring to the separation of layers in the printing stock, both paper and cardboard.
the Treasury and Federal Reserve are adding preferred stock to the balance sheets of the US mortgage giants Fannie Mae and FHLBC and the insurance giant AIG in the hope of shoring up their capital cushions and lowering their borrowing costs so that they can buy more mortgages.
on this issue, the option of a weekly publication of information on commercial stocks is currently being studied.
for more information about used objects in stock call us.
the following web pages contain information concerning the complete line of SV GOLF balls, particularly information regarding which balls are currently in stock.
you can get an unlimited number of special-price tickets, for example for your direct mailing (while stocks last for the printed tickets).
the boy's siblings were later vaccinated, too, but only after stocks of the vaccine were secured in the US and hand-carried back to Pakistan.
Madam President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, medical research which is essential for patients must be approved quickly and with minimum bureaucracy, but at the same time ethical boundaries must be strictly respected and the subjects must be given maximum protection from abuse.
no single entity keeps track of the real extent of the abuse of all human subjects engaged in research either in the United States or worldwide.
mathematical economist Donald J. Brown and psychologist Laurie R. Santos, both of Yale, are running experiments with human subjects to try to understand how human tolerance for ambiguity in economic decision-making varies over time.
even offline, there's no guarantee that a research subject is being completely honest.
after ensuring that the subject has understood the information, the physician should then obtain the subject's freely-given informed consent, preferably in writing.
for the collection of data during hypnotic experiments, he developed a whole series of apparatus that permitted the quantitative detection of reactions from the research subject (see photograph).
the proposal, while continuing to uphold patient safety, takes better account of the actual risk the subjects will be exposed to during the clinical trial and adapts the regulatory burden accordingly.
the researchers asked the experimental subjects to thoroughly study two paintings; Sassoferrato's Virgin Mary from the 17th century and Leonardo da Vinci's Lady with an Ermine from the 15th century.
between June 2008 and December 2009, in total 7,940 screening eligible average risk subjects were enrolled into the PRESEPT Study at 32 clinical sites in the U.S. and Germany.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I should like to depart from the subject of agriculture in order to discuss another important area with you, that of social policy.
Mr President, I want to thank Mr Gallagher for taking over this report from Mr Macartney and for doing an excellent job in maintaining the concern and knowledge which Mr Macartney brought to the subject and his particular feeling for the industry and the people engaged in it.
Madam President, Madam Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, I would first like to thank you for this opportunity to discuss this interesting subject with you here today, a subject of great importance to the citizens of the Member States of the European Union.
this text is the first binding European legislation on the subject.
I know that the European Parliament has been consistently proactive on the subject of injury prevention, and today's debate shows the interest in this issue.
Mr President, although artistic education is now a mandatory subject in almost all Member States, there are substantial differences in the way it is taught.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I too am pleased to be able to state this evening, as Mr Schmit has just said, that we are achieving a genuinely positive example of institutional cooperation between Parliament, the Council and the Commission, and that we are doing so by means of an instrument, the codecision process, that is having its first truly important application here today on a subject that affects people's everyday lives.
the European Council confirmed at that time that a common asylum and immigration policy presupposed the establishment of common rules on the subject of family reunification.
the European Union's true problem is that there are still certain subjects which are subject to unanimity.
may I also remind you that in the decision of the European Parliament and the Council of 23 October 1995, which called for 1996 to be the European year of life-long education and training, the subjects for that manifestation included promoting professional training which ensured that all young people could acquire qualifications and promoting continued education and training.
in your relations with Mr Jarzembowski, you will have seen how right Karl Marx was when he showed how people's institutional position also determines their political position on various subjects.
on other subjects the composition of the European Parliament, closer co-operation, the creation of a new post of European Public Prosecutor, which Ms Theato has come out in favour of, the Court of Justice and the Court of First Instance and many other points our positions converge.
it is about stronger partnership for the outermost regions, with a number and diversity of recommendations which are clear proof of the strong commitment and dedication of the European Parliament to this important subject.
we know perfectly well that some of these subjects are difficult for certain Member States.
the same is true for energy policy, on the subject of which Mr Schmit said that there was a prospect of removing obstacles to energy cooperation.
I would, however, like to urge the Commission - I do not know whether Commissioner Liikanen is present, but, in any case, we have already discussed it in the general debate - to move quickly if it is to present a legislative framework covering all the subjects, so that an issue which is very sensitive from an institutional point of view can be addressed in an organised, thorough way.
in his splendid major speech yesterday, President of the Commission Romano Prodi mentioned that, for the sake of the EU 's political legitimacy in the future, it will be necessary to produce a list of those subjects the EU is to deal with and those which the Member States are to deal with.
while this is encouraging, specific national support policies for low achievers in science subjects do not exist in any European country.
and since I am unable to do so, I would prefer not to, because these are all subjects that I can refer - or Parliament can refer - to the Council.
the EU welcomes the fact that China and the Union have embarked on a dialogue concerning human rights which, by complementing the political dialogue with the EU and its Member States, may help to reconcile the differing views on this subject.
the European Parliament itself repeatedly expressed its view on this issue right up to the final proposal for a directive on legal protection of bio-technological inventions, but it was already very clear on the subject in 1989 with two resolutions on ethical and legal problems of artificial human procreation and genetic engineering.
in the light of the progress made in cooperation and the development of links between the European Union and Mexico, dialogue and future relations between the two will undoubtedly benefit from an exploration of a number of further subjects.
I can tell the honourable Member that there has never been a debate devoted specifically to the subject of European tax havens, although it has featured in debates on a number of subjects in which the question of fiscal harmonisation has been addressed.
it will be comprised by African and European decision-makers, entrepreneurs and civil society representatives that will steer the future work on this subject.
I also wish personally to compliment the rapporteur, who obviously has a thorough knowledge of the subject as well as great political sensitivity.
this is a fundamental legal principle and also, in our view, an integral part of democratic citizenship, which is one of the reasons why the Commission has put forward a number of proposals on the subject in the report which it is currently preparing for the Intergovernmental Conference, including a recommendation that the principle of equal treatment should be included among the tasks of the Union.
the report will result in hazardous substances being listed on the labelling of construction products and further studies to follow on the subject from the Commission.
I may say that my honourable colleague Mr Parodi has, of course, already taken part in this preparation in his capacity as rapporteur and that the main components of this highly complex report - which could not be otherwise, given the White Paper that has been presented, for it had to address an extremely wide diversity of subjects - will be incorporated into the agenda for this third Transport Conference in Helsinki.
I think Mattel's problem has really focused attention on the important work that we do in this House, particularly my fellow members of the Committee on the Internal Market and Consumer Protection, on what is traditionally seen as rather a dry subject, one that concerns product regulation, market surveillance and conformity assessment.
as in the previous phases, so-called "SLIM Teams" of experts will come up with a report on each subject, to be followed by Commission proposals.
the report contains the economically sensitive subject of support which goes beyond compensation for effects which have not yet been included.
since 1993 the Cologne Business School is educating students with international background in a practical orientated way. main study subjects embrace European Management, Asian Pacific Management, Tourism Management and Media Management.
this is why there are three subjects on the agenda supported by the European Union since the Seattle meeting. these are market access, regulation and the integration of developing countries; the unity of these three subjects is guaranteed by what is called the single undertaking.
the Commission has already published two previous Communications on a way forward on the subject (see IP / 09 / 1549 and IP / 10 / 610).
with regard to the intervention on the subject of nuclear security, I must say that the responsibility, which in this area is national, is provided for in the international agreements of the International Atomic Energy Agency, in other words, in the Convention on Nuclear Safety to which Belarus, Russia, Euratom and the majority of the Member States of the European Union are parties.
it is a truly important issue since I think it is really crucial for both the transport sector and the tourism sector - two subjects for which the Committee on Tourism and Transport is responsible - to have found a balance for this mode of transport as well.
we agree on the need to update the Community regulations in question, to take into account the changes in national legislation and several bilateral agreements arranged between the Member States on this subject.
although we did not see eye to eye in every respect, I do think we managed to agree on the essence, and we will in that way help bring about a European strategy on a subject that is only set to increase in importance in the next few years.
personally, I have no doubt that the aspects of the world framework you have brought to light will be kept in mind, otherwise I cannot see how the European Union can carry out its action effectively; also, aware of the determination with which the Commission has acted and intends to continue acting on this subject, I think I can assure you that this dimension you have brought to light will be perfectly kept in mind.
it also provides access to other documents published by international and supranational institutions on relevant subjects, such as auditing and control issues.
we have spent a lot of time working on the subject in this Parliament, and as everyone has said, we are very concerned about the future of the Natura 2000 network.
however, persons from other departments that are also affected by this subject, such as purchasing staff, are welcome as well.
even those who will not vote for the compromises proposed by Mr Sacconi cannot fail to recognise that Europe is in the process of developing, on the subject of chemistry, the most progressive and most ambitious legislation in the world.
the Swedish Presidency has proposed that the conciliation committee of 18 November be an opportunity for the three institutions to reach a political agreement on this subject.
the subject of asylum is seen as sensitive in all the Member States, as is shown by the fact that it has been impossible, to date, to get any of the previous draft directives on this subject adopted by the Council.
reaffirms the importance of continuing to work towards preventing juvenile crime, urban crime and drug-related crime, as outlined by the Council decision to establish the EUCPN., and supports the chosen top priority subjects, as outlined by the EUCPN in its first work programme.
I hope that Parliament's concrete and precise position will facilitate the achievement of our common objectives and help find consensus on the subject of humanitarian aid.
I must draw the Commission's attention to the fact that, in countries such as Italy, Portugal, Spain and Greece, only 5% of managers allow consultation and information on subjects which are not exclusively related to health and safety in the workplace.
Commissioner, you mentioned among the top priorities the thematic subjects energy and climate change.
the ideal of European law contrasts, above all on certain subjects, with the complicated panorama of Community rules which, when they come into contact with national rules, turn, more often than is desirable, into real gibberish.
she also spoke on CNN about the subject. because Child Protective Services do not make their investigations public, it is not known whether any action was taken as a result of Allred's letter.
students may start gathering some background information and then use their new knowledge to take a position on related subjects or to exchange ideas and facts with their peers.
amongst other subjects, our discussions will also focus on the approval of our major economic policy guidelines with a view to rounding off this excellent procedure by intensifying microeconomic control for closer monitoring of the extent of integration of products, services and capital markets throughout the Union, in order to boost the gains of a single currency.
one must make sure that the grading of the child into a class is made on the grounds of his / her knowledge and abilities, which, however, does not mean that the grading in all subjects is dependent on general knowledge or the performance of the child in one particular subject.
the efforts of the rapporteur, Mrs Haug, to incorporate the suggestions of our Group on that subject deserve a great deal of gratitude.
the Act on Universities and Colleges is relevant also for CVT as it states that higher education institutions have the responsibility of organising CVT in their own subject areas.
social Sciences encompass a great many subjects related to everyday life from home economics to societal structures and is a wonderful base for discussion and comparison between pupils of different countries.
there have been a series of good reports over the year and much energy and hard work has been put into the subject by you and my colleagues before me.
perhaps you could look through the agendas for this week and find another subject, another position where we adopt acts under the codecision procedure, unless you really do think that everything we discuss this week is of high priority.
I have just mentioned the problem of genomics, which affects many subjects relating to health and biotechnology, but in the field of nanotechnology, with which Mr Linkohr is very familiar, which is, in other words, developing technologies using more intelligent processes and materials which waste less energy and matter, a large number of sectors will be affected, including the automotive and the aeronautics sectors.
but for many other aspects and subjects I am confident that the Agreement can provide immediate direction to our ambitions and efforts, even though in legal terms the Agreement may not yet be fully operational.
central management (Zentraldirektion), the institute's governing body, which consists of 18 members, is made up of representatives from various archaeological and prehistoric subjects, most of which are professors at German universities. the director of the Directorate-General for Culture and Communication of the ministry of foreign affairs is also a member.
-once again stressed the importance of taking account, when defining the Community position in negotiations with third countries, of the characteristics of the Community agricultural market and of the socio-economic repercussions of the proposed concessions on that market, as well as of the need to develop a consistent overall strategy on the subject;
health is now one of our main priorities, and we should be proud of this, because it was essential that Europe should, as it were 'look after its health' and should at last put in place a comprehensive and integrated strategy on this subject.
I decided to find out how it really is with these diseases, so I read many articles and even talked to different experts in this subject to get some specialist information.
the area of non-conventional medicine, and the possible regulation, via EU legislation, of freedom of establishment for practitioners of such medicine is a subject where Europe needs to proceed with great care.
eco'Diagnostic provides expert advice and economic and financial analysis in a number of subjects related to health and education policies of government.
I think portray is the most difficult subject in photography.
the examination set for each of these subjects must be passed.
this support is much wider than was the case for previous proposals on the subject of tobacco.
which, in her opinion, are the issues that remain under discussion, and which are the most difficult subjects in the negotiations?
it is perfectly possible to include racism and xenophobia as part of these, as we have already done with the subject of equal treatment for men and women, which is now automatically taken into account in programmes intended to benefit the people of Europe.
in Greece, typically, all highschool students, as they approach their examinations for admission to university education, have to memorise one book, just one book in each subject!
the case-law in 2001 demonstrates the abundance and range of the matters dealt with by the Court of Justice and the Court of First Instance and the breadth of subject covered in the various fields of Community law.
two countries (Lithuania, Romania) teach entrepreneurship as a compulsory separate subject.
we already have a considerable number of scientific reports on the subject, and we should further develop and support these initiatives.
the Council further hopes that the IPCC will assess all model scenarios for future emissions that bring out more clearly the consequences of action or inaction on this subject over the coming decades and which will contribute to our understanding of the implications of different stabilisation levels.
in 2003 in my own country, Ireland, a Science, Engineering and Technology (SET) Committee was set up to make recommendations on strategies to increase the uptake among women and girls of science subjects and higher level-mathematics at second level and to increase the number of females choosing science engineering and technology courses at third level.
using ICT to teach foreign languages and scientific and technological subjects (including environmental issues) has been especially popular, respectively accounting for six and five of the selected projects, but there are also projects aiming at using ICT to teach arts, business studies and law.
among the subjects to be prioritised are information technologies, biotechnology and environmental protection.
but, though public health is a major regional challenge, so far universities have been placing far greater emphasis on subjects in engineering and technological fields.
the Department for Education is due to release the new syllabuses in English and maths tomorrow - the first subjects to undergo a radical overhaul.
even after conservative colleagues had come out in favour of a socioeconomic campaign, especially on the subject of the information society, they could not resist the temptation to use their fortuitous majority on the day to reject this sensible amendment.
welcome, at the present time it is of importance to be able to rely on an office that can offer an integral service of advising in the scope of legal, taxes and business subjects. Firmalex believes that it is the right of those individuals or companies that require these types of services to have good advice in the Mediterranean area.
you'll find several links to websites about different subject areas on this page.
in modern times, other subjects, namely natural and engineering sciences became more important - but still, institutions of tertiary education focusing on these and not offering the classical canon were denied the prestigious denomination "university," so they had to use the general word Hochschule (higher school, i.e.
the jurors will be teachers, national representatives of the Ministry of Development Affairs (or a corresponding national agency), representatives of the Ministry of Education (or a corresponding national agency), and experts specialised in subjects relevant to art and development issues.
this will involve a particular effort to identify subjects on which it is in the interests of both sides that the Committee be consulted - whether consultation is compulsory or not - and then the application of appropriate follow-up measures.
the story of Dianetics and Scientology began long before the publication of Mr. Hubbard's first book on the subject.
in German schools, Polish remains an exotic subject option, even in states near to the border such as Saxony and Brandenburg.
however, there are few subjects in the world which have been so thoroughly researched as the relationship between people and alcohol.
I have tabled an amendment on this subject, and I hope you will support it.
the material published must be structured into subjects. there is a minimum requirement of 10 subjects.
our high profile global marketing and PR campaign, supported by our reputation as a first class, independent authority on the subject, ensures that we will deliver attendance by global industry leaders in the technology as well as users and potential users.
) in physics, physical chemistry or a closely related subject is required and excellent knowledge in a field relevant to the main research themes mentioned above is expected.
the first defense is to push for an educational system that really forms critical minds, namely through the (nowadays) largely neglected subjects of literature, history, and philosophy.
in the analysis conducted recently by Bass Player (USA), have already left more subjects in magazines Bass Guitar Magazine, Guitarist, Guitar & Bass (all three of England) and Bass Magazine (Japan), and sites like Ultimate-Guitar.com (USA) and Audiofanzine.com (France).
and translators have to know the basics and some of the details about the subjects they deal with.
there is still much to be learned on this subject and we are constantly going to seminars and conferences on this mater.
the curriculum covers both the subjects related to the development of practical language skills and a package of supplementary subjects (such as literature, history, life and institutions of a given country).
on the subject of intellectual property, which is a very sensitive subject in the textile sector, recent years have been characterised by a veritable explosion in statistics.
if you want to further refine your search to return only specialists in specific subject areas, you can select up to five subject areas (hold down your Ctrl key and use your mouse to select multiple subjects).
its refusal to engage in dialogue can only limit the transfer of ideas and knowledge on subjects of mutual interest.
the training covers a continuous process, the cycle is renewed each time it repeats, learning is a change in behavior occurs and the day-to-day and in all subjects.
beside this existing expertise I can of course become acquainted with other subjects.
in addition, Erasmus will support the activities of 26 "Thematic networks" between faculties and university departments, professional associations, research centres, which constitute large "fora of reflexion" on a specific subject area or on specific themes.
the language departments are further divided into units specialising in particular subjects.
for every lesson in every subject across every grade, educators have access to detailed lesson plans developed by academics.
the turn in production, the transition to an added value on the basis of their forms of living, awareness, knowledge and communication, turns the subjects of communication (teachers and students, researchers, people working in the fields of telecommunication, transportation, creative industries, journalists, translators,...) into desired beings and subjects of desire at the same time.
we have heard a host of interesting proposals on this subject.
I have been speaking for almost twelve years now on the subject of racism and fascism, xenophobia and antisemitism.
the most popular subject areas were social sciences, business and law (26%); science, engineering, manufacturing and construction (18%).
they are dedicated to teaching and / or tutoring specific subjects including Math, Verbal, Corporate Finance and Accounting.
Jaen University has strong ties with both training (expert and specialist courses, MSc and PhD degrees) and research in the Social Economy, specifically on the subject of cooperatives.
men outnumber women among graduates in maths, science and technology subjects.
in 2006, for example, a national study that tracks student performance in various subjects found that only a quarter of America's 12th graders were proficient in civics.
the Engineering Days allow those studying technical subjects to meet with Swisscom and nine other top employers in the sector.
furthermore, allowing teachers to explore programming in different subjects together with their students strengthens their competences in using coding as a tool for teaching digital skills.
hold a degree in computer-science or a similar subject or have practical experience in that area.
depending on the subject, colleagues have an influence of 3 to 5%, and aren't even asked in the selection of a partner.
I agree that we should spend money on this subject.
this is where the points of interconnection between subjects, problem fields, and cultures - in the sense of readily translatable "contact zones" - become accessible.
provision of support for students in science subjects - primary and lower secondary levels (ISCED 1 and 2), 2010 / 11
this online textbook collection is invaluable to students mastering critical subjects and an essential resource for clinicians and scientists in the health sciences and related fields.
regulatory burdens and the reduction of regulatory burdens is a subject which is thick with rhetoric and clichés, but rather thin on action and practicality.
during the work as Head of R & D department Prof. Spies obtained a professorship for the subject "Sealing technology of elastomer materials" at the University of Kaiserslautern, Faculty of Mechanical Engneering.
he published hundreds of articles in Polish journals, and wrote a series of books on these scientific subjects.
the BDÜ "s Membership Databank, available online, provides clients with the contact details of more than 6,200 professionally qualified interpreters and translators, classified by special subjects and covering a total of 83 languages.
the BDÜ "s Membership Databank, available online, provides clients with the contact details of more than 6,000 professionally qualified interpreters and translators, classified by special subjects and covering a total of 83 languages.
while there will be no formal requirement to devote more of the timetable to maths, Coalition sources said the extensive maths GCSE - combined with more weighting for the subject in league tables - was likely to encourage schools to provide extra teaching.
languages now, as a subject choice, are being held in the same regard as STEM subjects (science, technology, engineering and mathematics) in independent school curriculums and elsewhere.
they are highly skilled specialists in the subject they are teaching.
I congratulate him on raising the ante to ECU 200m and for pursuing his own aim on the subject of land mines.
impressed with my knowledge of the subject, she suggested autism to my parents but with uncertainty.
it is quick and easy to enter all subjects, classes, classrooms, teachers and their contracts.
EU citizens are the subject of actions taken by Parliament, the Council and the Commission.
whilst I would stress that the British Government did at the time recognise citizens of Gibraltar as British subjects, and since the European Parliament's resolution says that all citizens of the European Union must be free to take part in European elections, it seems to me that the position of this Member State is in clear conflict with that resolution.
. Mr President, this question has everything to do with the debate that we have just had in the plenary on communication with the public, on the poor turnout at the most recent elections to the European Parliament, and on the subject of greater involvement by the public, which is also important to the Council, and on which it made a statement in July.
I have also noticed that the PPE group theoretically supports this standpoint, but still links the right to free movement of subjects of third countries to a common European policy of immigration.
it gave a more than seven-year adjustment period, something particularly long in terms of any adjustment. I hardly dare touch on the subject of the confidence of European citizens in the Commission but I am sure that European citizens would hardly increase their confidence in a Commission that was to propose the continuation of a sort of hidden regressive subsidy at the expense of the general taxpayers in Europe going to a large extent into subsidizing forms of consumption that Community policies, if anything, tend to discourage.
indeed, we are at the final stage of negotiations and I think that the package that is being prepared by the Danish Presidency, consisting of a number of key components on the subjects of agriculture, nuclear safety and border control, is, of course, one that is certain to appeal to our citizens in the European Union as well.
formerly, in the days of Orwell, one could see all power as Big Brother, who controlled every action of his subjects.
indeed, the deal that Hong Kong's colonial subjects appeared to accept - leaving politics alone in exchange for the opportunity to pursue material prosperity in a safe and orderly environment - is not so different from the deal accepted by China's educated classes today.
Nepal cannot be allowed to regress to a system whereby the King is undisputed ruler and the rights and lives of his subjects are in the hands of one man.
it is certain that the measures taken by the Government - in the case of the massacre at Acteal and the events in Ocosingo - are an attempt to restore confidence and the country's credibility, within the limits of the legal system and the rule of law, under which all subjects must be seen as equal, beginning with the Government and ending with the citizens.
many Saudi subjects feel the same pattern of continuous uncertainty and torpor.
his son Tupac Llupanki was a great conqueror; his grandson Waynacapac gave the empire splendour, while his great-grandchildren Huáscar and Atahuallpa were involved in internal struggles until the Spaniards arrived and occupied the city in 1533, thanks to the support of Inca dominated towns, which saw the Spaniards as liberators and eventually also became subjects of the Spanish crown.
with such resistance to change, it is no wonder that so many political leaders try to lull their subjects to sleep, hoping that when everyone wakes up, it will all have proven a dream.
these presidents with extended powers have not been able or willing to improve the quality of life of their subjects.
entry into the program often involves a personal audience with the Saudi prince, in a ceremony that emphasizes the paternalistic and personal nature of governance in the Kingdom, where all subjects are regarded as well-cared-for children of the royals.
incensed at seeing Morgana bringing his subjects back to life to turn them into monsters, Arawn is said to have sent the Inconnu to help defend Albion and Avalon against the evil Morgana.
whereas Machiavelli's prince was still a ruler figure, governing from above to below (to put it briefly), in the context of the raison d "état, the sovereign had to conversely start from the territory and his subjects.
the rule of al-Nasir - who viewed the Shia as an intrinsic part of the Islamic community and sought to treat all of his subjects equally - was characterized by a marked decrease in sectarian tensions.
the Palestinians are seen as colonial subjects, and the longer Israel continues to occupy Arab territories, the more this perception will be confirmed.
Austrian and Hungarian Jews were among the most fiercely loyal subjects of the Austro-Hungarian Emperor, because he shielded them from the violent nationalism of the majority populations.
to the writer Geert van Istendael, King Albert II's subjects "identity overload is not a handicap.
the first area to be tackled was coal and steel, i.e. the sector producing arms and tanks.
features of the game include random storyline generation, richly detailed character generation, complex NPC interaction, and of course over 150 different mechanical designs ranging from jet fighters to giant robots to city-smashing tanks.
even the supply from the new spring was sometimes only maintained because the elevated tank at Pettstadt was filled by hosepipe.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I would now like to illustrate the most important results of the European Council that has concluded the Italian Presidency's six-month term of office.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, the Florence European Council will be the culmination of the Italian presidency's term and the government of my country is approaching this important appointment in full awareness of the responsibility facing us, but also of the significance and value of the work that has been done since last January.
the Turin European Council, a crucial episode in the Italian presidency's term, set an agenda for the work of the Intergovernmental Conference.
the Tripartite Social Summit discussed the Commission's recent stock-take of the Europe 2020 strategy (see MEMO / 14 / 149) and the mid-term review of the European Semester.
the fourth academic year is planned for the stay in Germany, during which the students absolve one term in enterprises, and attend certain training courses at the partner universities and do research for their Bachelor paper, predominantly in enterprises.
under its terms, the European Council's presidency would have far greater stability; in place of the current six-month rotating presidency, a European political leader who could command the necessary support would be elected to serve as President for two and a half years.
where long-term plans governing TACs or effort levels exist, these have to be followed.
- Mr President, the results of the recent elections in Israel basically legalised the strategy of the unilateral imposition of the terms of any resolution to the Palestine problem.
a second protocol, extending its predecessor by one year under essentially the same terms, was negotiated in February 2011 and provisionally applied until December 2011, when the European Parliament decided not to consent to its conclusion.
search engine optimization is the process of achieving top rankings in the search engines for a website's most relevant search terms.
this proposal should be approved by Parliament on the terms proposed by the rapporteur.
(it) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, the European Union really must ensure that the treaty signed between Brazil and Italy, which aims to regulate the terms and procedures of cooperation in matters of extradition, is respected.
our Parliament should not give politicians terms any different to those governing the conduct of our citizens.
I am simply asking for Parliament and the Presidency to verify whether the initiative taken by the courts and the Italian police force with regard to Mr Mastella constitutes a disrespectful act and an extreme violation of the terms of our immunity.
furthermore, under the European Employment Pact, emphasis is to be placed on measures which help avoid long-term unemployment and introduce more flexible arrangements for the participation of older employees in work.
presumably, as I am certain Mr Wijsenbeek knows, they should act positively and collectively, because of the terms of the provisions that exist under the current legislation, because of the need for a revision in 1999, because of the fact that these projects by definition have long planning and development periods.
following the difficult market situation for milk last year, the Commissioner established a High Level Expert Group on Milk (HLG) last October with the purpose of discussing mid-term and long-term arrangements for the dairy sector given the expiry of dairy quotas on 1 April 2015 (see IP / 09 / 1420).
coupled with preferential rules for acquiring long term resident status and for family reunification, the Blue Card scheme presents an attractive package to potential highly qualified migrants.
the European Commission is therefore called upon to maintain a robust negotiating stance for a long-term settlement of the matter, under terms of legitimate, balanced competition.
further to the common position adopted on 22 September 1992, under the co-operation procedure with the European Parliament, the Council adopted in substance the Directive on unfair terms in consumer contracts.
therefore, Mr President, as I understand that Parliament must be sensitive to our citizens' concerns, I would ask you to include in our agenda a Commission statement, followed by a debate, so that we can examine the circumstances in which this incident took place, the causes, the measures that the European Union needs to take in order to prevent a recurrence and possible terms for European Union solidarity.
during his first term as Israel's prime minister, Binyamin Netanyahu refused to continue to negotiate with the Palestinian Authority on Olmert's terms, and never considered holding talks with Hamas.
"overall, we found that there has been working on, we believe it is necessary to develop a long term program that redefines the vocation and the economic course of the state, it is important to detonate all the material and human potential resource that Sinaloa has," he said.
a nation hopelessly beaten in every battle of the war, one army captured and the other overwhelmingly routed, with a navy swept from the seas that dictated her own terms to the victor. "
a second option would be to try to negotiate the terms of a new Middle East, a successor to Sykes-Picot.
a neutral judge - not one of the creditors - usually sets the terms in insolvency proceedings.
there is a big difference between serving a very dense population, like that of the Netherlands, which is concentrated on very flat territory, and serving, on the same terms, the same population spread over thousands of islands, as in Greece, or over a very diverse territory, as in France.
to give the beneficiary banks the option, as part of a second tranche of operations, of either issuing subordinated debt securities on the same terms as for the first tranche or issuing preference shares.
Japan was never formally colonized, but it, too, felt the West's dominance, at least since the 1850 "s, when American ships laden with heavy guns forced the country to open its borders on Western terms.
the lack of response to the European Commission's non-enforcement in Spain and Portugal of the terms of the Stability and Growth Pact (SGP) is one of those times.
executives are searching for cost cutting solutions and the terms of office rental are also reconsidered at many places. what is the role of emphatic, honest, open communication in such situations?
I shall be glad to hear from the Commission how it intends to keep its promise of 8 April last year that it will, before the end of this year, consider jointly with the Council and Parliament how the terms of Article 103a (2) can be implemented.
this Parliament has repeatedly expressed the viewed, echoed by Commissioner Vitorino, that the UK opt-out is illegal under the terms of the Single European Act.
to address the concerns related to MIFARE, Qualcomm committed to offer licenses to NXP's MIFARE technology and trademarks, for an eight-year period, on terms that are at least as advantageous as those available today.
§ 3 PROVISION BY PORTUM (1) Portum shall, within the framework of these Terms and Conditions, grant the Bidder the simple, non-transferable right to use the online access for the term of the agreement in order to registrar, modify, maintain and delete his own data within the scope of the Supplier Database.
if we are to have long-term sustainability and develop a truly green economy, we have to take care to foster environmental-friendly businesses and use resources efficiently, and that includes the way in which we use our workforces.
certain costs, like for example management fees charged on the basis of the terms and conditions of the relevant Financial Instruments, are in many cases not taken out of the quoted prices on a consistent basis over the term of the relevant Financial Instruments, but are subtracted in their entirety from the relevant Financial Instruments' fair value at an earlier point in time, as determined by the market-maker in its discretion.
this calls for a radical solution, which, at the same time, also provides clear legal structures, so that the countries which are not included can be certain that they will be involved when they fulfil the conditions. it must also guarantee that the small countries are on an equal footing, because we know that the community structures not only ensure cohesion but also decision-making ability in the long term.
the Commission's report under Article 104 (3) should appropriately reflect developments in the medium-term economic position (in particular potential growth, prevailing cyclical conditions, the implementation of policies in the context of the Lisbon agenda and policies to foster RD and innovation) and developments in the medium-term budgetary position (in particular, fiscal consolidation efforts in "good times," debt sustainability, public investment and the overall quality of public finances).
the national court must in particular assess whether that right is conditional upon the non-compliance by the consumer with an essential obligation of the contract and whether such non-compliance is sufficiently serious in the light of the term and amount of the loan.
for this reason, the legal frameworks of the proposed mechanism must be strictly limited both in terms of scope and time.
any long-term agreement for the time after 31 October 2010 must be negotiated and concluded under the rules of the Treaty of Lisbon.
'for the duration of the fifth parliamentary term, the following Articles 1-5 shall apply by way of a transitional arrangement '.
the proposal specifies that insurance cover should remain valid for the whole term of the contract, irrespective of temporary stays of the vehicle in another Member State.
unless these studies are done, poor countries might find themselves continuing victims of worsening climatic shocks, such as severe hurricanes, droughts, and flooding, without realizing that the events are not accidental, but the result of long-term patterns of global energy use.
prospective investors should note that where no periodic interest payments or other distributions are to be made during the term of a Financial Instrument, where such Financial Instruments are in the form of securities or are otherwise tradeable, a realisation in the secondary market of such Financial Instruments may be the only return potentially available to the investor prior to settlement of such Financial Instruments.
the European Union welcomes the appointment by the UN General Assembly of Ms Navanethem Pillay for a second term as High Commissioner for Human Rights following the proposal by the UN Secretary-General.
in relation to the fourth issue raised by Baroness Ludford, I wish to say that the Greek Presidency has given pride of place on its agenda to the debate on family reunification and on the status of long-term residents in the European Union, together with the directive that Parliament debated yesterday, on the entry of third-country nationals for the purpose of paid employment and with the directive on the conditions of entry and residence for citizens from third countries for the purpose of study.
that is why I agree with the rapporteur that use should be made of the cultural contribution of the Structural Funds, especially now with the mid-term evaluation of the 2000-2006 programming period, so that we can take additional or corrective measures, such as promoting vocational training and, of course, promoting education at higher learning level, because in many countries, such as my own, Greece, it is inadequate.
at this stage, and before you return your verdict in all good conscience and responsibility, I should like to repeat that this treaty is useful, that it is a short-term treaty, that we need to take note of it, that we need to use it and that we then need to move on.
our term of delivery begins at the date of our acceptance of order provided that we have received all documents, required approvals and releases to be supplied by the ordering party, that the plans have been clarified and approved, that the terms of payment agreed upon as well as other obligations have been observed and that all technical questions have been settled which were outstanding when the parties concluded the contract.
this Contract is concluded for a term of two years (from May 1, 2011 until May 1, 2013) with the final view to achievi...
Shevardnadze's initial term did bring a liberal foreign investment code and the foundation of a state based on the rule of law.
the Supervisory Board shall elect from among itself, in accordance with § 27 sections 1 and 2 MitbestG, a Chairman and a deputy for the fixed term.
today, the solar terms are mainly used for determining when to insert a leap month in the lunisolar calendar.
the small amount of progress that has been made, such as deleting pilotage services from the directive, does not reverse the process that is underway and we fear that pilotage services will only enjoy short-term respite.
I would also like to use this opportunity to thank the Slovenian Presidency for making the Western Balkans a key priority of its term of office.
the finance provided by the EIB enables us to acquire funds on favourable terms compared with those offered by commercial banks and for longer maturities.
this requirement amounts to an additional burden on the operator in terms of time and costs and, according to the case law of the Court of Justice (judgement of 16 November 2000, C-217 / 99 Commission v. Belgium), represents an unjustified obstacle to the free movement of goods between the Member States.
software patents do not only force IBM into deformation and wasting huge amounts of resources on otherwise useless legal growth, they also harm Free Software -- the basis of your long term plans around the on-demand strategy.
I shall begin with the question of the International Criminal Court by saying that, apart from some of the arguments already made by many of the speakers, which are relevant, we must look at the examples of ad hoc courts in former Yugoslavia and Rwanda which show that, in terms of time and cost, the option of ad hoc situations is not necessarily the best one.
the funding will acutely reflect Member States' needs and a review at mid-term will take account of new or additional pressures.
we regret the fact that it has not been possible to bring about the acceptance of a legal basis specifically for the promotion of border regions, without which the longer-term funding of measures will be impossible.
that is why, at the beginning of my term of office, together with Erkki Liikanen and Anita Gradin, I launched the SEM 2000 initiative to considerably reinforce the management and supervision of the use of public funds.
our debt products cover the full spectrum of funding requirements including single asset and portfolio funding, term and revolving loans, development and investment finance, plus acquisition and refinancing lines.
the disposal of any treasury shares must be counted toward this capital ceiling if the treasury shares are sold during the term of this authority by issuing stock ex rights as set out in Art. 186 (3) clause 4 AktG.
EU Finance Ministers gave their backing to the Commission's proposal to extend the, in terms of duration and financial capacity ("EFSI 2.0").
therefore, it is not surprising to find that Slovene independence is currently being promoted not just in explicitly militaristic terms but also as a time in which society was characterized by the unity of all.
this applies primarily to private investment needed to create production capacity and jobs which would make this sustainable growth possible in the longer term, but which would also promote technological progress and thus contribute in turn to increased demand.
here, there may perhaps in the longer term be a point of contact with the convention which is to draw up the Charter of Fundamental Rights, and this convention might perhaps develop into a constituent assembly, for a constitutional Treaty must be the goal for which we are striving in the longer term.
a review at mid-term will take account of new or additional pressures.
during the last parliamentary term, when it was found that 94.5% of Europe's schools had Internet connections but only 25% of teachers knew how to use the new technologies for teaching purposes, we spent a long time hoping that the -learning initiative would materialise.
during the initial term or any prolongation period of the Premium-Account, the Premium-Account may only be terminated for good cause (cf. â § 7.3 of these GTC).
more specifically, the measures could result in short-term support and technical assistance, twinnings, TAIEX (Technical Assistance and Information Exchange - short-term training courses and visits by experts from EU institutions) as well as small comprehensive projects covering a series of activities such as short training courses.
it has sometimes been hard to explain, for example, that Finland's non-aligned status is not just a way of getting a free ride in security terms but, in our view, increases the security at this time in Northern Europe, and in particular the Baltic.
after that we have to look again to see how much loan capital is available for a subsequent term.
we will also ensure that, thanks to the innovation that information and communication technologies bring to all areas of the economy, we will see results in terms of productivity within a very short period.
from the very outset of our term in Parliament, we have actively participated in stormy discussions and explained that services market liberalisation is needed in order to create new jobs, increase the rate of growth in the European Union and fulfil our ambition of becoming the dominant player in global competition.
Mrs McKenna, as regards the mid-term review, an annual assessment of the agreement, of the kind we have already undertaken to perform is one thing, a mid-term review is quite another.
since RI does not carry over information from previous years, this form must be filled out for chairs serving multiyear terms.
I would, nonetheless, like to reassure the Members that may be concerned about this by specifying that there will be no interruption in the investment activity at local level since the resources for the current term, which has not yet run its course, must be committed in full by 31 December 1999.
the global economic crisis that began in 2008 is similar to the Great Depression of the 1930 "s not only in terms of its depth and duration, but also in view of advanced countries" policy errors and hesitation.
it is true that, in historical terms, not much time has passed since the first country legislated on women's equal right to vote, which according to the history books was New Zealand in 1893, and within Europe Finland in 1906.
however, the experience of this parliamentary term tells us that while procedures may be repeated, there is no such thing as a budget that may be repeated in its entirety, so there is no budgetary routine, as each of the budgets we have had up until now has had its specific characteristics.
in additional to individual fellowships, the Marie Curie actions also support doctoral candidates, partnerships between academia and industry, short-term exchanges and the reintegration of researchers returning from abroad.
the same applies for a premium contained in the issue price and, where relevant, for dividends and other proceeds of the relevant Underlying which are economically attributable to Deutsche Bank, often are not subtracted when the relevant Underlying, or its constituents, are traded "ex dividend," but which are subtracted at an early stage of the term of the relevant Financial Instruments' based on expected dividends for the entire term or a certain time span.
however, the Hungarian Presidency looked, right at the beginning of its term, for an immediate solution in order not to delay the accession of Bulgaria and Romania to the Schengen area.
because nanoparticles often consist of rare materials (silver nanoparticles or rare earths) it will be in the interest of the companies to recycle these materials to prevent a steep increase in the prices of these products on medium-term.
in the short term, it is time for certain European countries to stop advocating the theory of a fair return.
as well as rescue aid in the form of redeemable loans on market terms for a maximum of six months, the fund provides restructuring aid in the form of straightforward loans, equity loans and dormant equity holdings, up to a ceiling of DM 5 million (ECU 2.5 million), the term normally being five years.
this does not mean, however, that the Serbs will not some day have to come to terms with the crimes of the Milošević era, just as the Kosovo Albanians, and every people, must come to terms with their historical crimes.
forces are building inside the party, as evidenced by a stream of surveys, journal articles, and academic debates, that may lead to a split on the issue of reform in Hu's first term.
I am currently preparing a summary of the terms of germination.
it is indeed the case that even if the Commission presents the proposal on time, it will not be possible to debate it during this term. Mr Jarzembowski was quite right to point that out.
I remember many moments in the Committee on Legal Affairs and Citizens' Rights and, among them, those shared with Mrs Oddy where we always reached similar conclusions on new technology issues that we began debating in the previous term with respect to their incompatibility with copyright.
however, in the light of our findings, there is considerable economic justification for policy action to reduce the negative effects of the patent system by stricter examination, by reducing the length of term and the scope of patent monopolies, and by action to deal with undesirable restrictive practices in patent licensing.
if you are serious about sustainable mobility you will also have to make choices in that area and then you cannot just say that costs have to be internalized and if the railways then collapse in the longer term, well, it was bad luck, because if that happens the environment and sustainability will automatically collapse too.
but I believe there is something even more worrying than this. the amendment which we adopted states that this transitional regime will only be applicable to the term after that during which the Statute is adopted.
nobody in this House is calling for negotiations currently underway to be broken off; we know that time is of the essence and that it is because Croatia is waiting on the threshold that the Heads of State or Government have to move the process forward, but we also have to spell out the fact that full membership is not at every stage and in every single case, whether immediately or in the long term, the only means whereby we can make countries' European prospect tangible in a credible way.
the Committee on Budgetary Control wanted to go further. it did not want - in terms of the 1996 discharge - to waste time.
he presented this proposal to the parties involved and the neighbouring countries during his visit to the region between 14 and 17 January 2003, following which the term of office of the United Nations Mission for the Referendum in Western Sahara was extended twice, once until 31 March and the second time until 31 May, in order to give the parties involved time to examine the proposal and formulate their replies.
with a delay in delivery the rental term will be extended by the corresponding number of days.
this cooperation and these links have been renewed over time and are now becoming closer in terms of strengthening transatlantic relations which, although first established with the United States, certainly cannot ignore Canada today.
I would therefore like to applaud the secretary-general's promise that in the new election period he will submit a medium-term building strategy plan proposal very quickly, so that it will be available to MEPs ahead of the first reading in the autumn in order for them to approve budget decisions.
Mr President, when the Commission placed an order with the software company SAP at no time did it think in terms of an order of magnitude of 4 000 users.
in reply to the request of the President of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, and in the light of NATO's agreement to the continued availability of NATO's assets and capabilities for Operation CONCORDIA, the Council agreed to extend the Operation under the previous terms for a brief additional period until 15 December 2003 in order to further contribute to the stability of the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia.
we will then make virtually no impact on climate change in the future, while in the shorter term there will be significant damage to economic growth, leaving more people in poverty and the planet in a much darker place than it could be.
I have been working with various teams in my term, and progress is being made.
I agree with the view of the European Parliament that we now have to plan and distribute EU money earmarked for the structural funds so that in the new long-term financial period, enough money is allocated to ensure the harmonious development of all EU regions.
a second term for the Frente Amplio would pose new problems, since the balance of power and political competition will be stronger, both between parties and within the left itself. these challenges may eventually tug Uruguay's social democrats even closer to the experiences of Brazil and Chile. like their European brethren, Latin America's social democratic governments should eventually prosper through pluralist democracies and the even more demanding politics of compromise.
it would be really to give a kick to the government, a mid-term kick to the government you know where.
although this is a standard-label wine for near-term enjoyment, it displays a remarkably soft suite of tannins and a lovely balance between a judicious acidity and full, savoury flavours, characteristic of wines of this area.
in line with the recommendations of the Veil Group, the proposed amendments also improve the residence rights of people who have a series of fixed term or short-term contracts, once they have worked for 12 months in an 18-month period.
producers are expecting Europe to provide them with substantial aid, that is to say, in the short term, with temporary financial assistance that will enable them to continue to earn a living from their production; in the medium term, with transitional aid to ensure that the species have the biological time they need to reproduce; and, in the long term...
14 July is, of course, the day when we gathered here for the first time in this seventh parliamentary term, and also the day marking the 220th anniversary of our European principles, including the right to seek happiness, the principle of freedom of expression and even the principle of freedom of assembly.
as we know, the President of Belarus Alexander Lukashenko, politically isolated by western states because of human rights violations and restrictions on media freedom, is using all means to attain a third presidential term in the elections for a head of state to be held in 2006.
the related term jazz-samba essentially describes an adaptation of bossa nova compositions to the jazz idiom by American performers such as Stan Getz and Charlie Byrd, and usually played at 120 beats per minute or faster.
on the other hand there was an awareness of the passing of time and the unavoidable approach of the end of this term of the European Parliament, and thirdly and finally there was an expectation, both from the Member States and from the citizens of the European Union, that at least at some precisely specified time there would be help available for them to resolve matters which are for them so very difficult and at the same time so important.
a significant feature of the Finnish presidential term has been that innovation has been at the very centre of competition policy.
last December, 16 of Nigeria's 17 southern governors signed the "Enugu Declaration" in support of the constitutional amendment that would permit him a third term.
we are paying a tragic price for not having the courage to take certain decisions that, today, are momentous decisions, and this is perhaps also reflected in the fact that we do not have the strength right now to tackle the most immediate circumstances, which are those linked to the start of a very problematic new parliamentary term.
I voted in favour of the European Parliament resolution on a revised Framework Agreement between the European Parliament and the Commission for the next parliamentary term as it is an important agreement, not only for its symbolic value - given that it gives a clear signal of the commitment of both European institutions, Parliament and the Commission, to work together in pursuit of the European project - but also because of its content, since it identifies the obligations of the parties so that they can better confront the challenges of the future and resolve the problems of the citizenry.
we vigorously reject these delaying tactics on the part of the Socialists, who are attempting to wreck the compromise with the French Government and bring about its collapse during this legislative term.
those generally short-term increases in security, based on national intelligence, should not have to be approved by the Commission before being implemented.
we believe that we need a screening exercise of the Commission by 30 April 2007 so that we can understand what the mid-term demands of the Commission are before taking radical action to cut back.
can we justify an extension that increases the term of protection so dramatically?
are you sure that in seven years, with a rigid system which will not, of course, allow revision of the financial perspectives in the course of the exercise, and therefore no longer according to that planned five-yearly term, are you sure it will be enough and that the challenge can be victoriously met and surpassed, both by us and by the new member countries?
as for the so-called "performance reserve," to be paid out at mid-term depending on the success of the programmes, the Commission has made a new suggestion limiting the reserve of 10% to the last three years and operating it at the level of each individual Member State.
I do wonder, Commissioner Piebalgs, what has happened to the proposals you presented to us at the start of this legislative term, when you told us that the great risks associated with nuclear energy had to be brought under control, that the problem of nuclear waste, the funding of decommissioning and all these issues had to be resolved before the Commission made any positive moves towards the development of nuclear energy.
your term coincides with the taking of historical decisions on enlargement which, and this is my deep conviction, represents the most important contribution to the stability and prosperity of our continent in its modern history.
there is, however, one idea which I definitely reject, and that is the right of outgoing Members to maintain their level of allowances, which means they have the choice, for the first parliamentary term, of opting for either the national or European regime, whichever may be the most favourable.
at the beginning of his first term, Schröder appeared to be a modern social democrat who understood business.
please take time to read the full terms and conditions before confirming a booking.
with a placing of order by the customer at the Provider the customer recognizes and accepts the following Terms and Conditions of Use during the entire term of the business relationship.
3.2.2 The Customer shall be granted a simple, non-exclusive right to use the software limited to the contract term if this is necessary for the use of the software. the provisions in subs.
the proposals for the new career structure require a change in the Staff Regulations (the body of rules governing terms & conditions of employment) and are therefore currently under discussion with the Council.
in the area of licensing policy, we are certainly making progress, both in terms of conditions under which licences for dangerous substances are granted and in terms of the duration of these licences.
usually ancillary borrowing costs may be amortized over the term of the loan agreement.
STI may revise these terms from time to time by updating or revising this posting, with the revised terms taking effect as of the date of its posting.
negotiations on an association agreement were concluded during his term of office, and an interim trade agreement came into force in March 2003.
in 2013, the term of the agreement was extended to the end of 2016.
there is no limitation on the number of terms that a Director may serve.
the proposal aims to ensure that the insurance is maintained for the agreed term of the contract without prejudice to the obligation to register the vehicle, which is based on national tax law and remains untouched.
pool All-In Center reserves the right to its terms and / or payment after the expiry of the term change.
we are not obliged to give exact terms. this will only happen if the client insists of this and we agree.
contact. you can also look at opportunities for shorter term contracts.
companies being supported by loans from the initiative will benefit from longer term loans than would normally be available.
finally, in June 1994, the Commission took note of the agreement reached in the Industry Council on the adjustments to the borrowing and lending policy with a view to the expiry of the Treaty, and decided to limit the term of new ECSC loans to 23 July 2002, with the possible exception of loans guaranteed by a Member State.
Germany has recently been overtaken in terms of per capita income by several EU countries, including Ireland, the UK, the Netherlands, and France, and is still growing more slowly than all of them.
'i've made standing up to protectionism one of the hallmarks of my term as EU Trade Commissioner.
invoices which are not paid within the agreed term will be deducted from potentially agreed discounts and or rebates.
I would remind you that, from the start of this Parliamentary term, a framework agreement exists between ourselves and the Commission, an agreement that clearly defines the role of Parliament in the legislative process.
however, if the Council wants to be consistent and responsible, it must accept the urgent need for a mid-term review of the 2007-2013 financial framework.
the plan, which must be based on realistic assumptions, must restore the company's long-term viability within a reasonable time scale.
it also provides for a mid-term review to readjust the aims if necessary.
he cannot, however, use this power during the last three months of his term of office.
the lessees were against this and also wanted longer terms.
the district governor for 2010-11 may choose to extend the current DRFC chair's term or appoint a different Rotarian.
State-of-the-art sports facilities that meet the highest standards in terms of reliability and efficiency with perfect game performance and durability.
I doubt, however, whether it will fall within the term of this Commission.
the Council adopted a decision on the EU's position within the International Jute Study Group (IJSG), opposing the opening of negotiations for the renewal of the terms of reference beyond 2014.
. the restructuring plan must enable the firm to become viable again in the short term;
it is increasing, in particular, in occupations involving exposure to the sun, something that cannot be explained merely in terms, for example, of the variables of holidays and other free time.
his re-election to a second term as UN Secretary General was supported by nations all over the world, rich and poor, as well as by UN employees.
when you renew your active account, the term you purchase (e.g.
he began his term by paying homage to Deng Xiaoping at his statue in Shenzhen, where, more than three decades ago, the former Communist Party leader had launched the campaign to convert a reluctant Party to free-market reforms.
in addition to individual fellowships, the Marie Curie Actions also support doctoral candidates, partnerships between academia and industry and short-term exchanges.
however, we still need to take action on the issue of intellectual property, to allow us to take the necessary measures during the next legislative term.
stocks managed in this way tend to fare better than those subject to short-term decision-making.
now that schools have closed for the summer term, our attention turns to warm and relaxing holidays and time to enjoy quality time with family and friends.
a company can negotiate with the landlord an option to purchase the building at some point during the term of the lease.
the Commission will take the opportunity presented in the mid-term review to put emphasis particularly on the implementation of the points set out in the Commission's communication.
Russia's liberals would gain nothing from compromising their consciences and blessing Putin's third term.
furthermore, an improvement in the debt structure can be observed to the effect that the terms are gradually, if slowly, being extended.
and the Commission proposed to continue freezing it in real terms at the 2013 level throughout the Multiannual Financial Framework for 2014-2020.
mid-TERM REVIEW OF THE DECISION ON THE ASSOCIATION OF OVERSEAS COUNTRIES AND TERRITORIES WITH THE EC
the ELDR believes that the Santer-led caretaker Commission has lost its political and moral authority to act and so it must go immediately and be replaced by an interim Commission for the balance of its unexpired term.
upgrading trains and railway networks, for example, creates efficiencies in terms of both commuting time and environmental impact, with positive effects on many communities.
for this reason it seems very likely that in the medium term all the Baltic countries will be able to join the European Union simultaneously.
the Cold War - the term lovingly used to describe the other tragic period of European history - paralysed Europe's greatest powers and prevented its foremost talents from expressing anything of benefit that they might have expressed if given the opportunity.
secondly, I would like to mention the further limitation of working hours in terms of night work.
district governors-nominee have a new online resource to help them prepare for their term as district governor.
I wish to emphasise that this is my decision and my decision alone and it is entirely of my own free will and mine alone and not under pressure from anyone that I have decided not to serve the full term.
if he is to reassure EU national leaders that they should re-appoint him, then he needs to signal that his second term can hold out fresh promise.
the United States is unlikely in the short term to embrace massive budget cuts, à la the United Kingdom.
as this is the final plenary debate of this parliamentary term on this subject, we must acknowledge that Parliament has definitely been the European institution which has taken most seriously the rights and socio-economic status of women, including pregnant and self-employed women.
they should be refined in view of the 2006 end-of-term review and of the programming period following the 9th EDF, in order that the quality and impact of Community assistance can be better evaluated.
Moshe Zadka stated that he would like his term (if elected) to be remembered for establishing world-peace, although he thinks that would be as unlikely as the other candidates' goals.
"job shadowing" is a term which comes from the US and means that a "senior" employee gives a "junior" employee a look behind the scenes of their job.
for the term of the delay that has occurred as a result.
however, the Member States have a role to play in determining whether harmonisation of compensation law in the European Union might not, in the long term, be a far better solution which is more in line with citizens' interests.
the Republic of Moldova is going through a difficult period in terms of its wine exports, which is having a negative effect on the process of reform and economic recovery being undertaken by its government.
such short term insurance is harder to obtain and is normally more expensive pro rata than insurance for a full normal term.
financial products that are appropriate in terms of loan maturities (15-20 years), risk-taking (through the introduction of the Special FEMIP Envelope)
the agreed composition of the Board is 12 members from developing countries Parties and 12 members from developed countries Parties for a term of three years.
loans for SME projects may not exceed EUR 25 million and have a maximum term of 15 years.
of course, Putin will begin his new term with earnest words about renewal, development, democratization, and the scourge of corruption.
at TRACTEL ®, our single-source responsibility involves the combination of in-house design, local manufacturing, installation and services that assure long-term system performance and product value.
households can keep this entitlement for the term of the lease (now 30 years), but they do not have a property right in the land itself.
to understand the documents, it is therefore important that you familiarize yourself with what these terms mean, the conditions of their use, and the risks they are subject to.
for the purposes of these general terms and conditions of sale, terms beginning with a capital letter are to be understood according to the meanings given below. 1.
the Council takes note of the favourable financing conditions in 2003, as reflected in low short- and long-term interest rates, somewhat muted by the euro rise.
but would it have made a big difference to use a term that is a trademark?
they are intersex, part of a group of about 60 conditions that fall under the diagnosis of disorders of sexual development, an umbrella term for those with atypical chromosomes, gonads (ovaries or testes), or unusually developed genitalia.
we may update the version of these terms of sale on the website from time to time, and we do not guarantee that the version you have agreed to will remain accessible.
but, with the increasing organization of medicine around specific diseases, the term has come to refer to an open-ended set of conditions including cardiovascular disease, cancer, and diabetes, but not infectious diseases, such as tuberculosis and malaria, or mental illness.
my use of a military term is deliberate, because if the railways do not win their share of that transport market back, we shall really see some very serious social carnage.
moreover, the Commission's use of the terms "user" and "partner" interchangeably was an additional and unnecessary obstacle to clear communication, he said.
"ceramics" is the generic term given to a whole range of items of everyday use.
Volkswagen itself does not use the term "guarantee," as has been mentioned in corporate circles.
but the recent popular use of the term "awash with liquidity" dates to 2005, a time when many central banks were tightening monetary policy.
Mr Miranda, according to the case law - forgive my use of the term - of this House, alternative motions to the motions tabled by a committee may be submitted.
. Mr President, I am indeed aware of the letter which Mr Barón Crespo sent to the President's office concerning his unfortunate and malicious statements of yesterday, and confirming them in exactly the same terms as in his speech.
use consistent terms throughout your whole paper - even if you refer to different papers with different terminologies.
through the report by my colleague Mr van der Waal, our parliamentary committee is asking the European Commission to define the term 'developing nation'.
- unless you use throughout the whole text solely the plural, then you can introduce the plural term as fixed term).
the common position on the Directive defines the term 'best available technology', which means that an agreed basis for the use of the term is already in place.
there is a wide variety of these products currently available on the market. we use the terms, "vegetarian meat," "non-dairy milk drinks" and "egg replacements."
the Commission proposals simply apply the term 'reduction' across the board for all agricultural products.
it seems that a clear dividing line exists, separating publicity and thus the lawful / just on the one side (both terms coincide in Kant's writing, since it is a matter of a "transcendental" idea of law, i.e. one that is independent from all empirical conditions) from the secret and thus unlawful / unjust on the other.
I believe that rules must be adopted concerning the use of the terms' mountain 'and' island ', given the significant resulting added value for agricultural and food products from these less favoured areas.
the ban on the use of the term "spreadable butter" and the withdrawal of classic light bulbs from sale had previously come under criticism.
it also accepts the use of the term 'wine' for products which are not made from grapes, thus downgrading the quality of European wine, which is the world leader in exports.
Orwellian use of terms like "fair trade" masks the fact that this is nothing but an insidious form of protectionism that seeks to reduce import competition.
I also welcome the proposal to introduce the term 'EU investor' and I believe that the protection of all EU investors should be the top priority of investment agreements.
the Court holds that the term "transport services" represents a sectoral exemption which relates generally to services in the transport sector.
Mr President, it is not mere courtesy that compels me to begin by offering my congratulations to the two architects of the achievement - and I use the term advisedly - that has paved the way for the agreement presented to us today on the basis, I must add, of an excellent proposal from the Commission.
there is an exception for trade carried out on the domestic market in four countries, Denmark, Greece, Spain and the Netherlands, where, in order to take account of local customs and cultural traditions, it will still be possible to use the term 'veal' in the second category.
since the beginning of the process of liberalizing and privatizing public service industries, the terms which have been most in evidence have been expressions such as' universal services' and 'services of general interest', but the expression and concept of 'public services', which the treaty itself came to include, have not been extinguished.
'Cabotage 'is the term used to describe situations where a foreign truck makes national deliveries on the territory of an EU Member State right after an international trip from another Member State or from a country outside the EU.
this applies, for example, to the somewhat blurred use of the terms recognition, which has already been implemented in Europe to a considerable degree, and execution of final decisions.
regarding Amendment No 9 introducing additional criteria for the use of the term 'crémant', the Commission agrees with some of the additional criteria proposed by the Committee on Agriculture and Rural Development, for instance that the Member States must decide whether this term should be used in a specified region.
unlike the past, online translation of web site features, n term objective is to create a cool free learning foreign languages so users environment.
I do not like nuclear options, to use the term adopted by someone in Mr Bolkestein's cabinet to refer to Mr Monti's proposal to force the postal market to split its activities.
trade is therefore part of the long-term response to the ongoing crisis.
we can use just one word, "love," in the center of the diagram (where we could also put the term "God"); or we can use three words, "justice," "truth," and "grace," that refer to different aspects of love.
this term has been the reason for success and it is because of the instrumental use of this term in the Presidency's conclusions that we should not agree with what has been said; that the extension of the European integration model on a continental scale is a guarantee of stability and prosperity for the future.
we supported your election and, even though we should be careful not to overuse the term 'historic moment', I believe that your election as President of the European Parliament is indeed an historic moment.
more terms may be entered, in particular, if a good photo is available to illustrate the phenomen or object (and if we find the time to do it...).
as the Earl of Stockton has already pointed out, because directives use a variety of terms to identify the range of working people they cover, and because that range is often left to be determined by national law, certain groups may fail to benefit from the protection they afford.
South Africa's networks of patronage and corruption have become so endemic that the term "state capture" - coined by the World Bank to describe central Asian post-Soviet states where oligarchs coopted public institutions for personal profit - has entered widespread use.
these will help to ensure long-term risk prevention, but I must again ask the Commission to demonstrate its propensity for solidarity on an urgent subject.
there is an unfortunate tradition within employment policy which involves thinking in national terms, i.e. in terms of national labour markets and economies, and viewing the labour market as one single market.
I would not presume to disagree with him if this is his opinion; I think I have explained today and on other occasions how and why we act as we do, and that we are convinced that our work is not so much based purely on legal formalism but on the need to give the European economy strong foundations and to ensure respect for rules, not least as a principle of democratic peaceful coexistence, if I may use that term, at European level.
fairly absurd is the rule relating to individual European officials - everyone in the EU, who holds an official post, may not use the term Macedonia due to it being a sensitive topic for Greece, and instead the acronym FYROM (Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia) should be used.
as I have said many times in this Chamber, under the European Arrest Warrant, extradition - or rather judicial surrender, to use the correct term - is now merely a bureaucratic formality.
the rules of the third country concerning the term in question do not mislead the consumer regarding the term.
it has helped us to grasp the true meaning of concepts and terms we often use, but do not always comprehend, concepts such as energy security, EU solidarity, common energy policy or diversification of supplies and means of delivering gas and other fuels.
the 'small countries', for example, to use a quite inappropriate term, should not feel themselves excluded from reinforced cooperation or that reinforced cooperation means some sort of exclusive vanguard, centre of gravity or pioneer group.
even if Japan took steps to become a "normal" country (whatever that term may imply), it would still not equal the power of the US or China.
however, social innovation, investment in human capital and lifelong training are also ways of ensuring that flexibility, a term on which there is broad agreement, does not preclude a necessary amount of security.
Mrs Junker spoke in some depth on the rights of women and children in terms that the Commission agrees with.
the term "soft dollars" refers to the receipt by an investment manager of property and services provided by brokers (or futures commission merchants in connection with futures transactions) without any cash payment by such investment manager based on the volume of revenues generated from brokerage commissions for transactions executed for clients of the investment manager.
the term "European Agreement" is used to emphasize the special nature of these agreements and their importance as a political initiative.
though such a scenario was inconceivable five years ago, when the Greek crisis first erupted, the term "Grexit" entered the European lexicon soon after, when the crisis reached a new peak.
although I admit it contains very positive elements, especially use of the term 'the collective punishment' of the people of Gaza, I consider it to be insufficient.
I, too, find it difficult to endorse either the creation of another observatory - for, in my opinion, observatories lead to rigidity and problems - or the use of the term 'European,' or even 'Euro-Mediterranean citizenship', which has absolutely no legal status and would cause confusion.
it does not constitute an offer or an invitation to subscribe for or purchase securities nor an investment recommendation, nor does it constitute an offer of securities to the public as such term is defined in EU Directive 2003 / 71 / EC (the "Prospectus Directive") (an "EU Public Offer").
Mr President, Commissioner, rapporteur, I would like to start by replying to the previous speaker, for I too am dissatisfied with the term 'social market economy'.
there has always been maritime activity. it lay at the core of globalisation long before this term was invented.
several terms and metrics have entered our daily business vocabulary, such as total cost of ownership (TCO) and quality of service (QoS).
in general terms, then, this is the political project we are working on.
whilst Coillte Teoranta is not formally part of the State, nevertheless the Commission considers (notably in the light of the Court of Justice's judgment in the Beentjes case - 31 / 87) that the term "State" should be interpreted in functional terms.
open Source is a term for software, whose source code is freely and openly available and distributed with the software. thus changes such as bug fixes or enhancements can be carried out by any capable developer at any time.
it would also mean imagining that, in the dyad, the two terms could be equal, symmetrical, and without any implicit hierarchy.
the term may thus be most interesting from an operational point of view, i.e. the operational instruments and procedures to fight against this type of crime must be developed.
another new term, "zhi qing quan" (right to know), has also entered public discourse.
Mr President, you know that I am usually present for the Friday sittings but that I rarely ask for the floor because we are almost always working so quickly as we have planes to catch and so on. today, as an exception, because it is the last day of the current parliamentary term and taking into account how early it is, I should like to speak on behalf of the Socialist Group and acknowledge the work you have done as President of the sitting.
on this website the term "Macquarie" or "Macquarie Group" refers to the Macquarie Group of companies which in Europe includes Macquarie Capital (Europe) Ltd; Macquarie Bank Ltd, London Branch and Macquarie Capital Funds (Europe) Ltd, which are regulated in the UK by the Financial Services Authority.
in addition, all this is being described in terms of sustainable development, equal rights and opportunities or as part of the principle of subsidiarity.
you can prohibit a term from resulting pages by putting a minus before it, e.g., searching for football -nfl will find pages that discuss football, but don't use the word "nfl."
the public is ready to hear Barrick and judge, but on the basis of a civilized exchange of arguments, and not as part of what many perceive as a prosecution-gag (continuing the "public debate," Barrick Gold has just moreover filed a notice against the authors of Black Canada demanding them to cease their use of the term...).
furthermore, it observes that the Office merely stated in its decision that the elements' SAT 'and' 2' were in common usage in the media services sector without indicating in what way the term 'SAT.2', taken as a whole, is not capable of distinguishing the services of SAT.1 from those of other undertakings.
the objective of the proposed changes to the Staff Regulation is to adopt a comprehensive package which not only provides further savings in administrative expenditure, but also a stable framework in terms of salary and career, appropriate answers to the concerns expressed by the Council regarding some elements of HR management, and further modernisation of the EU civil service.
using the term low-risk gives the impression that a guarantee of the product's safety is being provided, but danger to the environment is of course precisely what is already being taken into account in the method for authorizing products which the Commission set out in its original proposal.
if the note is intended to explain the difference between the money paid by Parliament and what the owners of the building receive, we must ask them for 'our money back', to use Margaret Thatcher's terms Fortunately, we know who has the over-paid money and where it is, and fortunately they are in a position of solvency.
any COM worth its salt must have market regulation mechanisms for dealing with cyclical variations in production or short-term crises in all sectors.
JonDonym summarizes all the accessible services in JonDo in one term and describes the technology itself.
ladies and gentlemen, developing our relations with this neighbour located at the heart of Europe requires us to take the time to reflect on a response, including in the longer term, to the progress made by Belarus.
yes, but following last night's discussion I have understood what that meant and I accept the term.
innovation is a term used to refer to the development of new products, services and processes in commercial businesses, public service organisations and the non-profit sector.
likewise very important is the item in the report calling on the Commission to work towards establishing a common, EU-wide definition of the term 'positive action'.
"upon mature reflection I think the term 'United States of Europe" is most apt to find broad acceptance and best reflects the ultimate destination of the European Union. "
'Alliance of civilisations' - I am concluding now, Mr President - Is not a term we have borrowed from a political polemic; it is the term coined by the United Nations Security Council.
Cambridge - Is today's slow growth in advanced economies a continuation of long-term secular decline, or does it reflect the normal aftermath of a deep systemic financial crisis?
this site contains brief explanations of mathematical terms and ideas in English, Danish, Finnish, Hungarian, Lithuanian, Polish, Slovak. we have also made a start on Spanish.
the other term I would question is' private life. "
using the term 'groundwater quality standards' throughout the text clarifies at the same time that, for certain substances, the quality standards in question will be adopted at European Union level and that, for other substances, the standards in question will be adopted by the Member States.
as I had occasion to explain in March this year at the time of the vote on the Böge report, using the European Globalisation Adjustment Fund as a useful instrument for tackling the consequences of the economic and financial crisis is a very valuable initiative that provides a practical response in terms of financial aid.
twenty years after Fromm's use of the term biophilia, as life in shopping malls, on freeways and in traffic jams had marginalized nature into decoration and backdrop, concern for the capacity of the global ecosystem of the earth became dominant and shifted attention from psychology to biology.
I am therefore very grateful that Karl von Wogau chose the term 'home market' in connection with the introduction of euro notes and coins, because the single currency is the greatest integration project of the present-day European Union.
I hope that the term 'non-working female population', which I find shocking in connection with the subject of equality between men and women, will be eliminated both from Commission texts and various other European documents.
the committee is pleased to note that cooperation in terms of responses and improvement during the next financial year are one of the Council's objectives, as well as overcoming the discrepancies between the physical inventory and the accounting inventory.
the term "THB Hotels" or "us" or "we" refers to the owner of the website.
Mr President, Commissioner Flynn, Mr President-in-Office, the invitation to the Committee on Employment and Social Affairs to approve a motion for a resolution on the two documents transmitted by the Commission - the communication on the future of social protection and the report on the state of social protection in Europe - confronted the rapporteur, Barbara Weiler, whom I congratulate on her efforts, with the task of clarifying the term 'social protection', which is not to be understood simply as social security, in the sense of collectively arranged insurance, but also as including social protection provided by the government and schemes resulting from collective insurance arrangements as well as private ones.
I use the term 'political dispute' because we all witnessed how Gazprom and the energy supplies from Russia are being used as a political weapon to exert pressure on a sovereign state.
I consider it very important that a system of green accounting should be introduced in the individual Member States so that we can carry out a form of environmental accounting - the German term is not very beautiful - once the individual Member States have reported back.
one way of describing this spatial distance is by distinguishing between figure, ground and field. (this follows the terminology of Murray Schafer; one could also use other terms like "immediate, support, background" or "foreground, mid-ground, background."
the Czech parliament chose an expression which is translated into English as' extinct ', but the Commission prefers the term' obsolete 'here.
throughout this document the terms' we ',' us' and 'our' refer to the Foreign & Commonwealth Office and the terms' you 'and' your 'refer to you the user.
- be consistent in the use of words (i.e. the same term should be used throughout to refer to the same object or action);
speaking in general terms, I will point out, in response to this question, that the EU has always expressed its concern about the situation in Guantanamo Bay and has, on several occasions in its dealings with the United States, stated that the treatment of prisoners should conform to the standards laid down by the Geneva Convention and of human rights.
at Tampere the term "comparable" status was used. this means that we shall go as far as possible in the direction of full citizens' rights but, for example, there is perhaps a certain unwillingness to grant voting rights in parliamentary elections.
I no longer accept the term 'subsidiarity' in this context, as unfortunately for a large number of our Member States, it is merely a good pretext for preventing European action and then doing nothing themselves.
he then went on to found his own group, Mikado which, as one of the first sustained advocates of the crossover concept - long before the term came into current use - was esteemed as one of the leading German fusion formations for several years.
such terms make me fear that the boundaries between information and propaganda are at times dangerously crossed.
the term "brandable" we have given enough hard time following my last note, I propose now to return to matters more mundane and analyze the weight of the commercial potential of domain names in their recovery.
nevertheless, it has been confirmed that all the searched terms are recorded and - where appropriate - those can even be transferred to third parties. in such cases nothing protects the privacy of the Internet users.
the term "HD Effect," we want to touch on this blog at the time of transition we are currently living between SD and HD technology.
as of 1992, the term "Libre Software" was promoted as a synoym to Free Software in parts of Europe to address the particular confusion of the English language.
Mr President, in the course of this discussion on the Klaß report, I have been unable to comprehend why some people have persistently confused the terms' genotype 'and' genetic modification '.
Madam President, human trafficking is, quite rightly, a pejorative term because it describes a disgusting practice.
only where these terms are part of registered trademarks which are already marketed could consideration be given to granting derogations.
the term "soft power" - the ability to affect others by attraction and persuasion rather than the hard power of coercion and payment - is sometimes used to describe any exercise of power that does not involve the use of force.
the Court of First Instance held, first, that the term 'SAT.2' was not descriptive of the services concerned within the meaning of Article 7 (1) (c) of the Community trade mark regulation.
for a long time I have been fascinated by the thought how wonderful it would be if at last, in public opinion on the succession of political and social institutions, the fateful term "one after another" would be replaced through the very simple and self-evident "simultaneously.
the Court of Justice states, in relation to liability for defective products, that the term 'producer "can include a distribution subsidiary
the Open Source term was established as a marketing term for free software (also in 1998) and was quickly adopted by many companies.
he saw how his fellow law students, none of whom were Nazis, came to accept each step - racial laws, abrogation of the constitution, and so on - precisely because they were couched in legal terms.
in some countries the term lobbyist has a negative meaning, while in others lobbying is seen as an almost an act of public service because it informs decision-makers on issues they might not otherwise know about.
although I agree in principle with my President, the term has a positive connotation as well, involving innovation and readiness for reforms.
the term 'minimum income' is often discussed in different ways in the Member State that I come from.
Madam President, I think today it has become clear that the term 'frozen conflicts' could be a misleading one.
the term verification also includes checking whether a database is up to date.
the Scope Resolution Operator (also called Paamayim Nekudotayim) or in simpler terms, the double colon, is a token that allows access to static, constant, and overridden properties or methods of a class.
police attended and saw the five pictures, then analysed computers found at the address and discovered "concerning" web searches using terms for finding indecent image of children.
now that there has been an investigation indicating that the quantity of brominated flame retardants in mother's milk is forty times greater than had previously been assumed, we would ask if it might not then have been a good idea to draw up a long-term plan for when these substances might also be banned in their two aforementioned forms, which I shall refrain from trying to pronounce.
instead of MS Word and Adobe FrameMaker terms like S1000DTM and iSpec2200 turned up - DTD, Schema, SGML, XML, Business Rules and Style Guides are part of everyday business and demand more and more specialized knowledge from project managers and technical writers.
Mr Schulz, only today, the Commission adopted country-specific recommendations for each of the 27 countries, and there is also an introductory note in which we express in very clear terms this concern that you have just mentioned, which is very important for us.
in addition, in the new Constitution, more than 30 types of decisions have been replaced by a handful of terms readily recognisable by the public, including 'law "and' enabling legislation."
advocate General Stix-Hackl takes the view, first, that the term database, as the fundamental criterion for the applicability of the Directive, should be interpreted widely.
that's why we stick to the term "free software" in the GNU Project, so we can help do that job.
what the Commissioner said in this introductory speech was clear. the main focus of the report, which is largely the work of my predecessor Mr Maat, is the objective of fisheries policy in general - sustainable fishery, in other words - and, although the term 'sustainable' is clear, its meaning is also obvious from what Mr Borg said a moment ago and from what is stipulated in the agreement and the protocol.
it is also issuing a glossary of terms and acronyms, and a series of factsheets setting out in plain language what is at stake in each chapter of TTIP and what the EU's aims are in each area.
in my opinion, the Commission document and the Rothley report both do their best to twist the terms invention, innovation and technical application so that the human gene can be made to fit into the strait-jacket of patent law.
the term "international relations" assumes the Westphalian order of commitments among sovereign nation states, which replaced the medieval order of communities defined by personal fealty to a king.
electronic data interchange (EDI) is a broad term for all electronic processes for the asynchronous and fully automatic transmission of structured information between application systems of various institutions - this can include companies or government agencies, among others.
"the term 'human rights' does not even appear once"
translators undertake - to accomplish the work in conformity with language qualification and best will, keeping the form, terms of the text and theconfidentiality of the information. in cases of ambiguity contact the Client.
the two terms together can refer to differences in foreign policy approached to international problems.
in my opinion, when we have recourse to a term such as' citizenship ', either we have to define clear legal statuses, rights with corresponding duties, rights, therefore, which guarantee the new freedoms, or else the term will be likely to cause confusion.
on behalf of the UEN Group. - (PL) Mr President, a nation's standard of living is a function of material assets, but its identity is determined by its culture, in the broadest sense of the term.
I would draw Members' attention to an excellent speech delivered this morning by a former Taoiseach of Ireland, John Bruton, a friend of this House, who speaks in very straight terms about the challenges, but also the fact that we are able to do what is set out for us in these tough targets and that Ireland as a country has many qualities which will allow us to achieve the targets without suffering.
the term 'non-performing loans' refers to loans where the borrower - either a company or a physical person - is not able to repay a bank loan, i.e. is unable to make scheduled payments to cover interest or capital reimbursements.
it should be borne in mind here that the terms used to specify the exemptions envisaged by Article 13 of the Directive are to be interpreted strictly, since they constitute exceptions to the general principle that turnover tax is levied on all services supplied for consideration by a taxable person.
inside the European Union, the ugly term PIGS (Portugal, Italy / Ireland, Greece, Spain) is now a commonplace, denoting countries that have endangered the euro's stability and are forcing northern Europeans into costly bailouts.
these are obscure, metaphysical terms.The countries of Europe should work to strengthen the UN and to promote a global perspective on security and stability.
Mr President, I would like to point out that we, the Group of the European People's Party / European Democrats, tabled Amendment No 6 to recital A and that we want the words "supply constraints" in the fourth line of the English text to be replaced by the word "quotas" because that is the correct term.
furthermore, in Case 31 / 87 Beentjes [1988] ECR 4635, paragraphs 11 to 13, the Court, after stating that the term 'the State', within the meaning of Article 1 (b) of Directive 71 / 305 should be interpreted in functional terms, held that a local land consolidation committee fell within that definition notwithstanding the fact that it was not an integral part of the State administration in formal terms.
when Enhesa provides a dual-language Audit Protocol (available for virtually any country), we develop it directly from the original in the local language, drawing on the official texts of the laws and regulations, and including key terms in both English and local langauge to prevent misunderstanding.
a more accurate, if less reassuring, term for the ongoing crisis is the "Second Great Contraction."
the name "Edinburgh Festival" is an encompassing term for a collection of different festivals which take place from the end of July to the beginning of September.
we are to move forward to a better organized and better planned stage of cooperation, arranging for the PHARE and TACIS programmes, the EBRD appropriations, etc., to be combined within a global plan, a plan for which we have been hoping for several years now, the preparation of which is now becoming - to adopt a term with which you are familiar, Madam President - a burning obligation.
until 75% of Greece's public debt is repaid - in 2060, at the earliest - the country, we are told, will be subject to "enhanced surveillance" (a term with unfortunate echoes of "enhanced interrogation").
furthermore, the term "UV" has negative associations since the ITX scandal; end customers sometimes respond with an "emotional shutdown."
in this lessons you can learn some of the main terms that you will need when you communicate with insurance agents and insurance companies.
Mr President, as we are political anoraks in the Committee on Budgetary Control and there are a lot more people listening to us tonight, I will try and explain to them what is going on because budgetary control and discharge are really not terms that normal people understand.
Volkswagen believes that the broad term "guarantee" could see customers returning to the workshop with motor damage six months after the modification - and being able to blame this on the new software, even if the damage had nothing at all to do with it.
as the war in Lebanon continues, the term "disproportionate force" is being bandied about as if some crystal clear principle of international law lay behind it, telling us when force is disproportionate and why it is illegal.
in environment and nature conservation, the term "monitoring" refers to specific survey and analysis methods, in the sense of a permanent or long-term observation projected into the future.
the Commission had received a complaint about the disproportionate nature of this legislation and the difficulties which it posed to products originating in other Member States where the term "gold" was legally used for articles with a lower gold content.
"criminal elements enjoy a 'krysha' (a term from the criminal / mafia world literally meaning 'roof' or protection) that runs through the police, the Federal Security Service (FSB), Ministry of Internal Affairs (MVD), and the prosecutor's office, as well as throughout the Moscow city government bureaucracy.
now, inevitably, we are all the more surprised when, at the end of its term, the presidency answers questions relating to the future in such generalised and diplomatic terms that it almost calls to our minds another presidency, also from northern Europe, which was generally evaluated by this House as being far too diplomatic and general in its approach.
Mr President, I believe I speak on behalf of the vast majority of the people of England, and I use the term 'England' today advisedly, to say that we are shocked, angered and ashamed at the antics of certain people in a French town who have purported to be English soccer fans!
Mr President, this report addresses the fundamental issue of the link between the citizens, between the people - in order not to use a term that is currently creating confusion - and the political project that we are trying to implement, and contains a series of statements of immense significance, all of which are inter-related and all of which are important.
it is growth that we need, Mr Prodi, growth, a term that your Pact - which, indeed, is no longer really your Pact - has forgotten along the way.
some of the recommendations are too general and leave too much open to interpretation, such as the term 'university' in relation to all institutions of tertiary education, irrespective of their status.
it is in these terms that Article 7 of the Definition of Aggression (General Assembly Resolution 3314 (XXIX) of 14 December 1974) recognizes the legitimacy of the struggle of peoples under colonial or alien domination.
later, the term 'Albanianisation "emerged as a synonym for the isolationist policy that was enforced by the then regime and that was also associated with under-development.
many of us, despite our great respect for the US, react against phrases like "Axis of Evil" not because the countries listed do not present serious challenges, but because of the difficulties that follow from mixing foreign policy and morality. "evil" is a religious term, not a foreign policy principle.
I know only too well that in my country the term 'best available technology' is interpreted in 16 different ways, because Germany has 16 federal states.
this is not because I feel that the term concerns me - the reverse is true - but because, for the umpteenth time, a legitimate political discourse against further mass-immigration and for a firm adjustment policy is being consciously bound up with extremism and violence.
however, these words express, in no uncertain terms, the respect that should be shown for our democratic institutions, be they national or European.
colloquially we may understand cultural tourism as a type of tourism focusing mainly on culture. but the term "culture" is too broad and ambiguous.
the second will take place in Tunisia from 16 to 18 November 2005, and will be the single most important political event in that area since the term Information Society was coined.
the term "drug dependence" was also redefined, to propose that loss of personal autonomy could never arise in a therapeutic setting.
even if that particular term is not included in the resolution, it is, no doubt, in the hearts of everybody that we need to be able to justify, with our specialised committees, the monies we are actually spending, not just in the current period, but also in the fact of having the national management declarations, which it seems many Member States are still reluctant to put together.
I support Mr Ripoll y Martínez de Bedoya's proposal for a narrower definition of the term 'reduced mobility'.
whatever is understood by the term 'the West', whether it be North America alone or whether it include Europe, exercising the so-called military option would be a political disaster which would rebound on the West for decades to come in its relations not only with the Muslim world but also with countries such as India that have helped to put this issue on the agenda of the UN Security Council.
whereas sexism and racism are well-known terms, disability discrimination is barely referred to in public discourse.
also, the term offers no scientific advancement, since it lumps together very different areas of law and suggests treating all these equally.
instead they are either written in one word or they are seperated with dashes - a mixed term is always considered as a "German" term when writing in German. therefore, all German rules are also applied to mixed terms.
gender-neutral terms are used as far as possible on this website. save where the content indicates otherwise, any gender-specific terms are understood to include both men and women.
Italy's populist Five Star Movement (M5S), which came out on top in Italy's 2013 parliamentary elections and is predicted to do well again in 2018, emerged from large rallies organized by comedian Beppe Grillo against "la Casta" - his derogatory term for what he sees as the country's ruling casteof professional politicians and journalists.
with the concept of the European way of life, we have introduced a positive term into the debate on Europe.
what kind of policy is in place, however, when responsible people in Berlin and Rome are now refusing to pass an arrest warrant - that is the correct term - to the US Government?
in addition to the term 'solidarity', it is also important to involve the expected climate change and its potential implications in drafts of risk management plans for floods, so as to prepare ourselves for the future in the best way we can.
questions abound - about what President Barack Obama knew and when, about the legitimacy of eavesdropping on friendly foreign leaders "conversations, about the future of transatlantic relations, and even about the meaning of the term" ally. "
the term Corporate Governance denotes the responsible management and supervision of a company.
it is well known how at the beginning of the 1990s the editorial group around the Italian journal luogo Comune recovered the term General Intellect from a passage of Marx's Grundrisse in order to place the concept of "mass intellectuality" at the center of their analysis and critique of the most recent capitalist revolution.
the Commission has pointed out on several occasions that the term 'Centre' in both these titles could lead to misunderstanding so I emphasize that in this case Centre refers to groups and not to places.
using as few technical terms as possible and displaying the information about the health and life of your hard drives in the most comprehensible way - this was our main goal.
once a year the VLT installed more sophisticated system (SPHERE) astronomers will get a chance to discover new worlds and explore them in much the atmosphere lagodinjim terms of celestial mechanics.
people have spoken in strong terms, and that is as it should be, because the European Union can accept only one solution, and that is that the will of the people of Zimbabwe, as expressed in the first round of elections, should be respected, and it is the result of those elections which should serve as the basis for any settlement.
understood thus, the philosophy of Davidson show skeptical that the need for strong and distinctive position of philosophical assumptions that need not be accepted more specifically representacionismo and internismo- and would devise a way of thinking and language-based For triangulation that no leads on their own terms skepticism.
yet for those in favor of the ECB's "stability-oriented monetary policy" - a term suggesting that others disregard the risk of monetary instability - the price-stability objective has evidently become too constraining.
perhaps it is heretical to propose this, yet if we agree that institutional power is no phantom let me suggest that by equal measure the institutional function --to rework a term borrowed from Foucault ­ ­ is seldom precisely directed nor primarily even repressive towards its other.
as regards Amendment No 2, which relates to recital L, I would prefer it if the Socialist Group would eliminate certain terms that weaken the text.
I would therefore advocate a rigid definition of the term 'parent carrier'.
I think the side to my right wants to cover it with some very beautiful semantics, using terms like 'reproductive health'.
we also offer a glossary of terms associated with the language and its typography, together with several documents on the Francophonie (available in French only).
"net contributions" is neither a technical nor a legal term.
in fact, if honey was eventually considered as an industrial product, we would very rapidly witness a drift, in terms of administrative constraints - lists of ingredients etcetera, and a misuse of the terms "appellation 'and" denomination' to the benefit of commercial brands, which could weaken all honey production links with a particular area.
I know that some fellow Members are worried by this term because they are not sure if the growth will be truly inclusive.
in fact, the term 'directive' is not even justified; 'empty shell' would be a more accurate label.
furthermore, it is unacceptable that they intend to replace the term 'illegal immigration' with 'irregular immigration,' thereby attempting to further legitimise this otherwise illegal act.
finally, I wish to express my concern over the consequences of a strict application of the mid-term review as it stands in the proposal.
it is because the Council could not come to terms with the word "vade mecum" for some unknown reason.
Mr Meyer, you talked about the issues of foreign policy and disarmament and the issues of whether it is appropriate to think in military terms.
the term itself tends to be associated with large companies, but some of the most innovative and inspiring examples of CSR are to be found amongst smaller businesses.
well frankly, the profound meaning of the term is really contradicted by the specific measures which accompany it!
I would like to say a word, Mr Alber, about the specific function of the term 'union of states'.
until biological markers for psychiatric illnesses are identified, diagnosis will remain in a 19 th century time warp, relying on the equivalent of broad and outdated medical terms like "fever" and "dropsy."
. (it) It must be clarified once and for all what is meant by disadvantaged when the term is applied to an island as such and not just to the outermost regions.
although right-of-center politicians in Central European countries formally embrace traditional ideologies, for example, liberalism or conservatism, their electorates, unfamiliar with Western political philosophies, do not always understand the real meaning of those terms.
also, the terms' conviction 'and' criminal record 'need to be clearly defined and the terms' offence 'and' punishment 'need to be harmonized.
it expresses its readiness to recognise that republic within its existing borders according to their Declaration on 16 December 1991 under a name which does not include the term Macedonia.
unfortunately, due to the fact that the relevant technical specifications were not yet sufficiently ready, we did not manage to also secure the mandatory fitting of the emergency braking systems and the lane departure warning systems - I apologise for these somewhat technical terms, which do not generally come up in the public debate on this issue - by the year 2018 in goods vehicles, in particular.
in fact, even the term chemical science enjoyed some popularity in the nineteenth century - a time when the field sought to distinguish itself from alchemy and the promotion of quack nostrums.
we therefore propose several amendments, with a view to better defining in the regulatory text the terms' passenger ',' insurance 'and' flight ', compensation to third parties, where appropriate, and we also advocate the inclusion amongst the risks insured of other contingencies, accidents and fortuitous incidents, as well as the risks caused by acts of war, terrorism, kidnap, sabotage, hijack and social or industrial disturbances.
but it is also an analytical term that describes deliberate disinformation presented in the form of a conventional news report.
2. the immediate ending of the public hate campaign against Turkish Christians beneath the cover of allowing the doubly negative loaded term 'missionary activities' in schoolbooks and local media, as if Turkish Christians were, by definition, subversive and bent on undermining the state.
the term "extraordinary circumstances" is very important as, under those circumstances air carriers are not required to pay compensation to passengers.
nearly 12 years ago, Jim O'Neill, then the chief economist for Goldman Sachs, coined the term "BRIC" to describe the "emerging markets" of Brazil, Russia, India, and China.
to these should be added all the other advantages which cannot be measured in figures or assessed in economic terms.
the advantage for someone to form a symbiosis with him is that we grant protection and psychic abilities (some would call this magic but that's a very imprecise term) to the new host who in turn uses them to influence his / her surroundings.
finally, we also believe that the excessively grand term 'baker's honey' should be removed, as it applies to a product which is in fact denatured and would be more appropriately termed 'industrial honey.'
today in plain meaning of the term apocalypse is most of the end of the world.
we hope that definitions of terms such as Gläubigerausschuss or Steuerausweichung will prove valuable for many of our users - including native German speakers.
the term applied when a player has 4 of 5 cards needed for a straight with the missing card being inside the sequence rather than at either end, and gets the missing card.
on employment, I would like to tell him that he can count on our support at the Stockholm Summit for talks on employment, innovation and the term upon which he ended his speech, social cohesion.
as regards the amendment on animal suffering, I would like to ask Mr Monti here if he can assure us that these two wordings are in fact effectively identical, and that the fact of having removed three months does not change anything in terms of the actual application of patentability on this point.
but, broadly speaking, in Chinese, the term "international order" refers to a combination of the United Nations, the Bretton Woods Institutions, the G20, and other multilateral institutions (which China accepts), as well as the US system of global alliances (which China does not).
amendment No 4, refers to "products," a term that covers, in this context, any therapeutic product derived from blood or plasma, including medicinal products based on blood constituents and prepared industrially.
"and now the term human rights does not even appear once in the new constitution," he bemoaned in a discussion with "Welt am Sonntag."
in the end, after a frustrating approach with the trauma doctor who who clarifies that sore isn't a scientific term; it is the psychoanalyst who unravels the mystery: "the sore is the real open thing; the symbolic thing is the scar."
the Spanish delegation considers it unacceptable for the same product to receive different treatment in the various countries and, furthermore, terms such as "baker's honey" could mislead the consumer into thinking that this is even a product more suitable than real honey for certain uses.
thanks to them, Europe will have this instrument from 1 January, and I hope that it will be, as we have said, a leap forward in terms of improving the coherence and complementarity of the existing programmes.
statements found in the German press indicate that the term "documentary film" became part of the specialized vocabulary in the late 20s, inspired by innovative Soviet examples.
an excerpt from a lecture (60-90 seconds; 150-220 words) provides examples and specific information to illustrate the term, process, or idea from the reading passage.
the root of the issue is that it is impossible to grant a language assistant, a person who is well versed in English and comes to an Italian medical university to explain to the students what the Italian terms are for heart disease, operation, liver disease, and so forth, to have the same rights, on the basis of their having the same status, as someone who teaches medicine.
the proposed directive introduces a broader definition of the term 'persons of reduced mobility', stipulating that it includes all people who experience some difficulty when using public transport, especially the elderly and the disabled. reduced mobility does not necessary depend on some form of medical complaint.
we are using the term System Under Test (SUT) for the applications being tested, because it is possible to start any number of programs from QF-Test to test a whole system at once.
in four cases, they associated the term with "something very much mine" on a personal level, and "in the user name and password" when applied to social networks.
you are quite right to have referred to benchmarking - a term with no precise Spanish translation - in other words, levels of competitiveness applied and established in the different industries.
the term photoshopping is a neologism, meaning "editing an image," regardless of the program used (compare with Google used as a verb). Adobe discourages use of the term * out of fear that it will undermine the company's trademark; an alternate term which leaves out the Photoshop reference is "photochop."
the demand made in recital K of the report to relinquish dual prosecution and scrap dual punishability indicates a misunderstanding and a misleading confusion of the two terms and a failure to appreciate the principle of the deputizing of the administration of international criminal justice.
amendment No 2, of which I am a co-signatory, is designed to clarify the term 'journey "in order to prevent the maximum duration of transport being exceeded by the back door, so to speak.
the term "Global Restructuring" should be taken literally, given that the new unit's area of responsibility extends from Mexico to Japan.
I wonder if the fact that you did not have enough resources at your disposal has anything to do with the report that was published yesterday by the Court of Auditors, which says that a lot of work is being impeded by people being on short-term contracts.
my reason here is the statement that the term 'producer' defines the operator who undertakes the complete production of the product.
I am well aware that some are questioning our proposal that the guidelines in the narrower sense of the term be left untouched.
the term machina has appeared in Latin since Plautus and Ennius in the early second century B.C. and increasingly during the imperial era and late antiquity, initially as a loan word from the Doric vocabulary of the colonists of lower Italy.
the term "contact dermatitis" describes an inflammation of the skin caused by contact with external agents.
that is why we thought that Directive 83 / 349, which defines the term multinational concern, should be added to Regulation No 1408 / 7.
but culture in the narrower sense of the term also needs to be addressed.
having said that, as part of political strategies that drove the great statesman and visionary Europe that was Jacques Delors, I begin by clarifying what is meant by Social Innovation, a term that is becoming stale in the fields and soon to be 2.0 reduced to a minimum when canabalizado intellectual by populist politics in which we are immersed in this end of the decade.
after recently testing a Spanish version of After Effects, one thing very clear to me... and in this profession is that English is not only essential, but there are terms that should never be translated, at the risk of provoking a state of Syncope in the technical issue...
I believe both concerns would be better addressed by (1) an unequivocal holding that no program related invention is a patentable process under � 101 unless it makes a contribution to the art that is not dependent entirely on the utilization of a computer, and (2) an unequivocal explanation that the term � algorithm � as used in this case, as in Benson and Flook, is synonymous with the term � computer program. � 47 Because the invention claimed in the patent application at issue in this case makes no contribution to the art that is not entirely dependent upon the utilization of a computer in a familiar process, I would reverse the decision of the Court of Customs and Patent Appeals.
term referring to a group dealing with a specific currency or currencies.
a second part in which he examines the origin of the term and its technical evolution in different moments in history, ranging from Leonardo to the present.
all projects of Auris Medical are focused on the cochlea - which is emphasized by the stylized "medical green" cochlea and the term "cochlear therapies" in the company's logo.
all products intended as animal nutrition are now defined by a common term in all animal feed legislation.
a response that the jury did not like due to the term "culturalization 'and second of all for not specifically explaining how each of the cited books have marked her.
principal among them was Richard Freiherr von Krafft-Ebing (1840-1902), who is considered the founder of the study of sexual pathology (his greatest work is "Psychopathia Sexualis"; the terms "sadism" and "masochism" were coined by him).
a promise is even made to them to define the soul of this new Europe - an odd term, 'soul, "when you have rejected any Christian references in your draft Constitution.
foreigners are often impatient and too much in a hurry, but this work of finding the best translation terms need to not be done in a rush.
common sense and the interests of small and medium enterprises suggest that data-sharing should be mandatory, while of course respecting commercial confidentiality in the strict sense of the term.
after the Soviet withdrawal, the term Al Qaeda shifted meaning from the specific military base to the organizational base of jihadist activities.
they do not think in terms of building up merit or positive potential from their giving.
Anthony Giddens is one of the authors who started circulating the term of globalization in the early 90s.
the term "treatment," supporters argue, applies to circumcision.
I supported the proposal in this regard from the Socialist Group in the European Parliament, according to which the presence of GMOs in organic products would have to be limited solely to unforeseeable and technically unavoidable amounts to a maximum of 0.1% and that the term 'organic' was not to be used to describe products contaminated accidentally by GMOs in excess of a detectable threshold of 0.1%.
earlier this month, Chinese twitterati helped get the GFW onto the list of Twitter's top ten "trending topics" (or most tweeted terms) - an impressive feat given that Twitter is supposed to be inaccessible in China.
that term describes the routes across the Short French Sea (between Dover, Folkstone, Ramsgate Newhaven and Calais, Dieppe, Boulogne and Dunkirk) and the Belgian Straits (Ramsgate and Ostend).
the report proposes, among other things, that minimum requirements for corporate social responsibility be laid down by means of a legal framework, that the term be better defined and that fulfilment of the requirements be better monitored.
the term "antrotherapy" describes a method of using, for therapeutic purposes, the water vapour which is emitted inside natural geological caves, or in similar artificial environments created by man.
the term was first used in the United States to indicate a style of hospitality; the complete opposite of mass tourism in large hotels. boutique means a friendly welcome and custom service, tailor-made to suit the client.
at a point when the term 'social dimension' and thus all the mechanism that involves - notably the social dialogue - are constantly on everyone's lips, and when we are talking about deepening social issues in Europe, we are wasting time.
Saddam Hussein and his regime still in place, a beleaguered nation and citizens whose problems were described earlier in the most eloquent of terms.
the term "byte" came from "bite," as in the smallest amount of data a computer could "bite" at once.
several years ago we coined the term "communication guerilla" to designate a number of political praxis forms - praxis forms that traverse the old boundaries between political action and the everyday world, subjective anger and rational political action, art and politics, desire and work, theory and practice.
although the term is inadequate, the phenomenon badly defined and most of the facts without proof, the 'holocaust' has become the religion of our atheistic age, replacing Christianity - at least in western cultures.
today the term heterarchy has been re-discovered form the side of organizational theory.
as John Williamson, who coined the term, put it in 2002, these measures "are motherhood and apple pie, which is why they commanded a consensus."
another positive point is the extended understanding of the term 'insolvency' which has been retained.
this dictionary includes terms from numerous sectors (such as finance, economy, data processing). new words and expressions are added to it on a regular basis.
additionally, the description of the term "common interest" deserves attention.
in his later work and in his collaborations with A / Traverso and Radio Alice however, Guattari focused less on the psychoanalytic 'scaffolding' of the term and more on how modes of transversality might produce different forms of (collective) subjectivity that break down oppositions between the individual and the group.
the Kremlin and the separatists have lately branded the seized territory "Novorossiya," or "New Russia," a term that harkens to pre-revolutionary glory days of the Russian empire.
this made "women's music" a term for white women, which excluded Afro-American female musicians and their musical traditions, forcing them into the position of the "Other" and turning them into the counter-pole of white female musicians.
in keeping with Buddha's skillful means of teaching with terms and concepts familiar to his audience, The Kalachakra Tantra also uses the names and images from The Vishnu Purana.
the precision of terms and accuracy in translations are of fundamental importance.
however, such a project requires thinking, analysis and, not least of all, a consideration of what these terms, politics and culture, implicate in the current situation.
but he acknowledges that "there may be some ambiguity regarding article 220, because the terms used borrow from the religious vocabulary.
this becomes obvious, at the latest, when even leading theorists in the very area, in which a term has attained central significance, are misled by these "misunderstandings" or even generate them themselves.
the tried and tested way of settling the discussion whilst appearing to fully engage with it demands that the term 'creativity "is employed in such broad terms that it becomes coextensive with' human nature."
it invited a more humble approach to mission, reminding ourselves of the priority of God's the Holy Spirit's mission in the world, the only one able to really bring healing and reconciliation in the full sense of the term.
one way to help counter that priming - supported by past surveys - could be to direct voters, first, to consider what they actually know about the topic, including what they understand by the key terms.
it is hoped that solidarity will not prove merely a fine term, but will translate into a specific commitment to those who fate has treated less kindly.
at this point the term "Norsk Skogkatt" became official; it is not a reference to geographical borders (the Forest Cat appears in other Scandinavian countries as well), but rather to the first country to recognize it.
behind someone that is expressed in these terms is behind ragzzino or a geek or a person perfattamente incompetent.
in this podcast we want to cover on fixed mobile convergence (FMC), a well known term in the communications industry.
the term designates a broad range of very harmful substances that are to be found everywhere. they have even been found in Commissioner Wallström's blood.
the directive uses the technical term "agglomeration" which means an area where the population and / or economic activities are sufficiently concentrated for urban waste water to be collected and conducted to an urban waste water treatment plant or to a final discharge point.
the label is there precisely to prevent confusion amongst consumers, clearly indicating whether such a practice has been carried out or not, for example by reserving the term 'oak "for traditional ageing in barrels.
it would be far better to produce a report about what we mean by the term subsidiarity and have a thorough debate about that.
in the epic legends, in the descriptions of shamans' journeys, terms such as "The bottom of the Sky," "The bottom of the Earth," "The basis of the Sky and the Earth" and "The borders of the World" are often mentioned.
a female singer converts these abstract terms into concrete sounds and interprets them in her own manner.
a central concept of the analyses is the term 'multiple natio-ethno-cultural belongingness "(Mercheril 2001), which refers to the fact that the interviewee must deal with diverse reference points due to his / her parents" migration to Switzerland or Germany.
enter a "-" between two terms and the results will not show the Term2.
suddenly the dictionary used in financial circles has been taken over by terms such as control, transparency, reform, public investment, guarantees, risk, coordination, codes, conduct, ethics, safeguard, supervision, balance, plans and action.
the Commission has not demonstrated that the terms' biológico "and 'bio" suggest to Spanish purchasers in general that the products concerned are organically produced.
in more basic terms, torque measures how hard something is rotated.
as Jacques Delors rightly pointed out at a meeting of our Committee on Constitutional Affairs scarcely a month ago, the term 'constitution' is extremely ambiguous.
"general Terms and Conditions" is defined as the terms and conditions governing the Programme.
"access" is a broader term and relates to facilities and / or services available to another company under defined conditions for the purpose of providing electronic communications services.
therefore, this is not the right term to use as it is misleading.
for the use of some terms, phase out periods have been agreed.
what is the proper way to use the term Ecological Footprint?
consequently, we need now to be careful how we use that term.
the term "household use" is very widely interpreted in the standard.
so allow me to clarify what I mean when I use the term.
even here we do not use the same terms to mean the same thing.
instead of allowing the Member States to determine the punishment, it is preferable to use the term criminal sanctions.
the following words and terms, when used with this agreement, shall have the following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
this is sub-optimal at the moment, and I use the term advisedly.
with respect to the signature of an association agreement we, the Greens and EFA, have proposed the adoption of a road map prior to the signature of the Association Agreement which would articulate our objectives in terms of improvements to be made in the human rights field.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, throughout my long political career I have learnt that it is necessary to be economic with the term "historic '.
the Amended Settlement Agreement uses the term Commercially Available, which generally means that a Book is in-print.
it is a US term which means that the US Congress cannot change the parts of a trade agreement negotiated by the Administration, and can only accept or reject the whole.
we use the term talanxize to mean "sustainable career development and optimisation by choosing to work for the Talanx group of employers."
free Games For Your Site | Terms of Service | Privacy Policy | About us | Contact Us | Link To Us © Copyright 2008 123peppy.com.
to be sure negation is present in those theorists, and they even use the term 'antagonism, "but this negation is not envisaged as radical negativity.
tax treaties and the OECD lists of non-cooperative jurisdictions, to reproduce the terms officially in use, are unsatisfactory and even represent part of the problem that they are meant to be solving.
since some EU Member States do not participate in Economic and Monetary Union, the terms "ESCB" and "Union" are to be read as "Eurosystem" and "euro area," respectively.
this new definition of the term will entail a whole series of technical changes which will, however, make it possible and / or easier for people to use public transport.
on behalf of the PPE-DE Group. - (DE) Mr President, Mr Vice-President of the Commission, we have no problems at all with what you have achieved in terms of improving efficiency in airspace, but your reply was quite clear.
the term we should be using is "preauthorised" and I for one shall endeavour to get this term adopted in the legislation.
nevertheless, it shows we have got to do a lot better, and that involves cooperation - if I can use that term - with the 15% pledge enshrined in the Abuja Declaration by the countries themselves.
this particular assigning of value is inherently one of usability (and I use the term "usability" not in the common Jakob Nielsen sense of accessibility concerning web-design, but in the more general aesthetic sense of usefulness - a kind of signal-to-noise ratio concerning the work's message).
the term Corporate Governance stands for responsible corporate management and control geared to long-term value creation.
the former, as I use the term, should suggest an arguably conceivable condition of "justice" guaranteed by, or in, pre- "human," pre-social nature.
the terms "you," "your," and "yours" refer to anyone accessing, viewing, browsing, visiting or using this Site.
the term 'fruit juice' would be reserved for juices without concentrate, while, according to them, juices made from concentrate should be named for sale purposes in accordance with their characteristics.
copyright is a legal term describing rights given to creators for their literary and artistic works.
should there be EU rules to define terms like 'mountain product' or 'farmhouse product'?
about a month ago, Ryszard Czarnecki, a PiS member and vice president of the European Parliament, compared an MEP from the opposition Civic Platform (PO) to a szmalcownik, a pejorative term for those who blackmailed Jews who were hiding from the Nazis or those who protected them.
the term 'the State' referred to by that provision necessarily encompasses all the bodies which exercise legislative, executive and judicial powers.
the Commission can accept amendment No 1 to avoid the term 'alien' and instead refer to third country nationals, although we will have to make it clear that the Regulation also covers stateless persons.
paradoxically, the term would be for a worthy Guiana behalf of this Eden, long mysterious, dreamed up by a terrestrial paradise, green hell suffered by others.
nonetheless, Poland, like the EU's other "new" member states (a term that, after ten years, has become inadequate), remains relatively unknown to many in the "old" member states.
the term "harmonised" denotes the fact that all the countries in the European Union follow the same methodology.
for the time being, the Commission's proposal is to define marriage with reference to the term 'spouse', and we do not seek to define this term.
the Group of the European People's Party therefore welcomes the Commission's proposal and all the rapporteur's proposed amendments, partly because they clarify terms such as' air carrier 'and' operating licence ', which previously led to misunderstandings.
definitions of key terms, including the definition of protection of critical infrastructure and the finalisation of the definition of EU level critical infrastructure;
as Mr Konrad rightly pointed out, the European Union is a community of law - I do not feel this is a pejorative term - which is founded on respect for rules in a number of fields, and since the Commission is the guardian of the Treaties, I believe that it also has a duty to ensure that they are observed.
at the same time, "blow" was the slang term to refer to ejaculation.
on 12 September 1908, Ferran Agulló published the article "Per la costa brava" in La Veu de Catalunya, a piece that is regarded as the birth certificate of the Girona coast, since it is the first published mention of the use of the term "Costa Brava" in connection with the strip of coast running from the mouth of the river Tordera to the French part of Catalonia.
secondly, would you please give some thought to whether the term 'raising the retirement age' is really appropriate?
during the ensuing discussion, the most crucial translation was the term "feminism." the term feminism has a century long history in China.
these terms are reciprocity, European interest, the fight against dumping and the fight against tariff barriers.
this would unnecessarily defer interpretation of the term pesticides, which encompasses both plant protection products and biocides.
phrases can be searched by simply entering the terms without apostrophies, e.g.
at that time, the term "farm holiday" was totally unknown both to farmers and to their guests.
in our opinion helping people to help themselves is always the better option in the long term, and this should be apparent from our amendments.
another term to be found, in the Charter of Fundamental Rights, is dignity, together with the term justice.
should someone search for the word that would best express the IMB strategy, the closest one would probably be "long-term."
as matters stand, the Kim regime and the US have yet to agree on the definition of terms such as "denuclearization," "verifiable," and "irreversible."
dimension is a term which is symbolizing grandness first of all.
the idea of a "new deal" was conceived during his first presidential election campaign in 1932, though at the time he was still very vague about what the term stood for.
I am sorry but the two terms are absolutely contradictory, because they would require restructuring and we know very well that restructuring causes greater poverty in these countries.
despite this, the term "genocide," freely bandied about by Western interventionists, was grotesquely inappropriate at any time.
the key term is sustainable aquaculture that puts the focus upon employment, consumers and the environment.
within the European Union, a merely descriptive term such as' precarious women workers' still contains two forms of discrimination, both of them very serious.
this is actually nothing new. we have been working on this for many decades without perhaps using this particular term.
think of a more general word and then specify how this term is different from other terms that belong to this group.
"Moki" is a local term for the ancient Puebloan people who inhabited the Colorado Plateau hundreds of years ago.
this is why VW will not be using the term "guarantee."
can the Commission explain what is meant specifically by the terms' style 'and' substance 'in this context?
"we did not make up this term, we are re-using it.
about a year ago when Emil Hrvatin and I proposed a performance project addressing collectivity, I couldn't anticipate the resistance and confusion the term alone would bring.
the term "awash with liquidity" was last in vogue just before the US stock market crash of October 19, 1987, the biggest one-day price drop in world history.
I note that it is estimated that, in those Member States where this is done, around EUR 5 billion a year is raised, in terms of added value, by promoting such geographical indications.
the extension of this term in the course of the debates in committee was urgently needed.
the report on which we must reach a decision on Thursday attempts to respond in practical terms to the difficulties of millions of our citizens who are suffering increased food prices.
nothing reflects this better than how "protection" and "protectionists" have become terms of derision.
the term botnet indicates a network of computers that have been infected by malicious software (computer virus).
the terms prothesis and diokonikon familiar to art historians hardly seem applicable to the Cilician churches in which these side-rooms appear to have played a specific liturgical role.
analysis of the eligibility of a claim of patent protection for a � process � did not change with the addition of that term to � 101.
the terms right- and left-hand paths derive from a division within Hindu tantra.
at the height of the Egyptian protests, Chinese Web surfers who searched the terms "Egypt" or "Cairo" were returned messages saying that no results could be found.
in this connection, the term "structure" must encompass the necessity of self-reproduction, ie auto-poietic practice.
whilst the violence was more limited in its extent than in France, where several people were killed, the politically correct left still prevents us from using the term riffraff or scum - in French - and would prefer to shoot the messenger than address the problem in an environment without any taboos.
the report takes a much broader view, treating the term as covering any of the forms that can be taken by the right to harvest fish, given that these are seen as a common public good.
the term 'race to dishonour' has already been used here; I shall not adopt it, because it seems to me rather too harsh.
indeed, the latest Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) report stated, in uncharacteristically strong terms, that the sea level is "virtually certain" to continue to rise in the coming centuries or millennia.
just place an asterisk (without leaving a blank) to the right, to the left or even in the middle of your search term.
you will be made familiar with the different terms and procedures of the RAMS / LCC methodology.
for there is a much better case to be made today than there was in 1998 that we should be thinking in terms of "depression economics."
if you attempt to understand the inner workings of Microsoft operating systems, or hear computer experts in these operating systems talking about the software internals, then sooner or later you will stumble across the term "Registry."
choose to display not only the term, but also its translations, synonyms, description or status and more.
the amendment by the Committee on the Environment, Public Health and Consumer Protection only aggravates things by introducing the term "of consumer expectation ', which is even vaguer and therefore more likely to lead to many disputes.
the conclusion was to replace all other terms included in amendments by 'former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia'.
music and passion - for me these are two terms which are closely linked to one another.
that was the regime's term, which was then adopted ironically by historians.
as a result, various political groups associated with the Solidarity trade union movement have, since Communism's fall, aspired to represent the political right, confusing the terms of political discourse.
this term has many alternative interpretations, including "chaos" and "catastrophe."
in practical terms, therefore, we did not hear any responses to the serious economic and social problems which workers and citizens are facing.
I want to latch onto that graceful term "level of employment".
I should also like to remind you - the Chair, that is - that at the meeting of Presidents in Luxembourg, it was agreed - and this is not a question of transparency but of honesty, as transparency is a term applied to glass whereas honesty is the term to be applied to humans - we must maintain that honesty and vote on this report after 12 noon.
it is important, then, to draw up minimum standards defining the terms' victim "and 'crime," establishing which persons are eligible to benefit from compensation if the victim dies, and determining the methods and means of payment.
the outgoing President of the Commission used the term 'intelligent "with reference to something he once described as stupid, that being the Maastricht criteria.
with the exception of Greece, EU15 respondents rank higher in terms of correct answers.
[23] Roughly a hundred years later, the term entered into English and French from Latin.
but the smart money hardly ever talks in such ethereal terms.
the French and the Irish presidencies, for instance, incorporated the term 'Presidency' into their logo.
interestingly, the terms "center" and "periphery" have crept into usage almost unnoticed.
the reality of our situation can be spelt out in even more graphic terms.
the term "preanalytics" refers to all processes, which take place prior to the actual laboratory analysis, starting with collection of the specimen from the body (e.g.
when error messages specifically include terms such as JRE and JVM, we retain them.
they explain you common terms as "internet" and his functionality but on the other hand they show an interest in security aspects too.
so let us have a look once again at the terminology or the term 'conflict' between cultures or civilisations.
still, let us give Miller the benefit of the doubt. when he uses cosmopolitanism as a curse, he has no idea of the term's antecedents.
this is what I would call compulsory expenditure, although I know that the term is given a different meaning, because we simply must not cheat people.
to help in that effort, gathered here are some common fitness terms and their fitness-oriented definitions.
it is true that I have not mentioned the term "Community preference".
one example is the replacement of the term 'risk area' with 'priority area'.
AH, and I didn't explain the term "BluePoster" so in case this doesn't ring a bell, write a comment (yes, this is actually a cheap and diabolic trick to engage my readers in a conversation!
when we talk about 'games of chance', what is covered by the term?
politicians, however, prefer to couch the objective in more uplifting and persuasive terms than that of crassly increasing consumption.
for the benefit of those who do not meet it every day, it is worth explaining exactly what is meant by the term cohesion.
maritime safety affects a range of sectors and I believe that it is particularly important that the title of this committee includes terms which relate to prevention of pollution from ships.
the term posting will only be used for posting of workers within the meaning of the Posting of Workers Directive (Directive 96 / 71 / EC).
Sylvana is familiar with the term from reading manga - in her new exchange log she tells about Japan.
in today's judgment, the Court finds, first of all, that the Montreal Convention does not contain any definition of the term 'damage. "
the term "Sterling Silver," in reference to the .925 grade of silver, emerged in England by the 13th century.
what exactly does this mean, given that the terms assent or avis conforme are not defined in the various language versions? what procedures are envisaged for this process?
click on the term and you will be led directly to the corresponding page.
the downturn was so severe, and lasted so long, that some even used the term "depression," before settling on "Great Recession."
punk rock, named in reference to the above term, is a largely musical movement that arose in the late 1970s and reached its peak in the early 1980s.
with a tireless determination, in whatever series she develops, "house" and "home" will be her leitmotiv and the term "narrative" will be recurrent in her discourse.
so, this group will be closed before the rest and Giuseppe Meazza seems to expect a tie as the result, but the two teams will try to go for a win, and the Italians will not want to speculate at home and Celtic knows that winning would be first and would ensure a better crossing into the quarter finals.
there are also bonuses for winning (800,000 euros) and for ties (400,000 for each team) .The octa-finalists receive three million each; the eight quarterfinalists, 3.3 million.
the Italians added ten points and already certified in the fifth day pass with a tie in Portugal, while Celtic has nine points, but still needs another to make sure that the Shakhtar, with six, and that Benfica, which has four, do not overtake it.
if you wager on a tie and the two hands result in a tie, your payoff is 8 to 1.
in the case of a tie, the pot is split equally among the winning hands.
1.3.11 All published odds and point spreads at the time bets are accepted, are used to determine winners, losers and ties and are for information purposes only.
I love the remaining girls equally - it's a tie between Snezana and Lana.
I say in conclusion to Mr Bartenstein - and I am still wearing my Austrian tie, because I told him I would wear it for as long as we were in sight of a clear agreement - he can still get this on the table of the economic summit in March if he puts his mind to it.
Mr President, I would like to congratulate the President of the Commission on the good team spirit and control he has in his cabinet because it seems they have to have colour-coordinated ties.
were they not entitled to a small personalised gift too, or are we supposed to conclude from this that women also have to wear ties?
"Egypt today is a civil, national, constitutional and modern state," Morsi, wearing a blue business suit and a red tie, told the judges in the wood-panelled chamber where he took the oath of office.
dressed in a dark suit and blue tie, Breivik remained calm and professional throughout the hearing and looked journalists and survivors in the eye as he entered and exited the building.
you miss the crackling open fire, the smell of cinnamon and the embarrassing ties from your aunt.
during the middle part of the month the execution of two men was reported, who were covered in blankets and left in the trunk of a vehicle in the street of Villas de la Hacienda in the municipality of Atizapán de Zaragoza, next to the victims there were also two death threats.
on the following day, the corpse of a subject was found in a suitcase inside the trunk of a vehicle left on the Mixtecas Street, in the Colony Santa Cruz Acatlán, of the municipality of Naucalpan.
moreover, the trunk's capacity - a double bottom volume - rises to 399 litres, a 19 litres bigger capacity respect to the first generation.
like a ship with pirates on the sea children will discover the Kids2Talk trunk box full of games and toys.
the style of the building is marked andalusian and it is divided in open galleries and patios. decorated with natural flowers and plants, earthenware jars, plates and trunks.
fluoropolymers Dyneon can be used in production of plastic and rubber seals, o-rings, packings, tubes, hoses and cables used in places where the material's high chemical and thermal resistance is required.
on account of the large variety of gravimetric weighers and control features, the SAVEOMAT is available in many individual system configurations for the mono- and co-extrusion of pipes, tubes, profiles, cables and film.
more than 90% of carbon black is used as filler in the rubber industry mainly in automobile tires and technical rubber products such as conveyor belts, flexible tubes, and rubber profiles.
they are used for the production of O-Rings, oil seals, industrial gaskets, tubes, membranes, conveyor belts, sound-insulating.
wheels have plastic disks, tyres have air tubes and are inflatable.
the newest Schleuniger automatic cutting machine can be configured according to individual needs and allows to measure and cut cables, wires and tubes.
once finished, the emulsified fats are gently removed through a specially designed suction tube or a massage.
in the event of damage arising in pipelines and canals (scratches, pipe displacement, root ingrowing) the Mr. PIPE-Liner, a PU foil-coated needle felt tube, will be used.
we cut the tubes in our studio to the right length, label them with our brand and assemble the belt buckle.
like a tube runs the asphalt ribbon shy through the impenetrable labyrinth.
MP is a device which applies the peristalsis principle whereby the total head of the treated fluid is given by a constriction running along the tube.
the Elvie Pump however, is completely silent, has no wires or tubes and fits discreetly inside a nursing bra, giving women the freedom to move, hold their babies, and even go out while pumping.
either two individual tubes or one twin tube can be attached in the pump.
the eight hunger strikers are being fed through tubes inserted into their stomachs.
"removing just a small seam (only a few millimetres) of healthy tissue around the metastasis is sufficient," said Dr. Thomas Kiefer explaining that a tube is inserted into the lung as drainage after the operation and the chest is closed again.
the gasmask is connected with different tubes, one with a breathing bag, one connected to a pee bottle, again with a breathing bag and one tube with a rubbertoy which is into my asscunt. so I can or better must breath through it a bit.
we should ask the European Council to stop tackling detailed issues and to stop acting like an enormous vacuum cleaner that tries to deal with all the important decisions.
as of September 1st, new vacuum cleaners will come with a label, similar to that on refrigerators and washing machines, which will allow buyers to see key information at a glance, such as the energy efficiency of the appliance.
you cannot run from the vacuum of life. "in all this bleakness his music takes a few nods to krautrock, mostly the band Cluster which pulls him onto a lighter plateau of exhilaration where he can be as easy going as" a chimpanzee in a leaf filled tree. "however his mind again takes him into the massive terror of space as soon as the music is over, or when the upbeat music loses its hold.
we manufacture 14 kinds of spiral hoses of PVC and since the end of 2001 we have been manufacturing moulded hoses of EVAC material for industrial and home vacuum cleaners. besides the production of hoses we deals with the extrusion of profiles, injection of the plastics and treatment of plastic waste.
the machines are intended for the toughest tasks faced by wet vacuums.
it is the only vacuum cleaner of the market that does not need wheels to move. T...
in that case, a word search or -watch would be adequate.
we also support the proposals of the Committee on External Economic Relations, which make the watch list of United States companies and changes in the EU entry procedures for American companies the logical counterpart to the provocation represented by these US Acts.
ambiguity is evident in the cobbled-together text as to whether masters, as well as ordinary seafarers, are included in watch-keeping regulations.
the amendments tabled by the Socialist Group are designed to ensure better communication, better access to the law and a closer watch on commercial communication for the consumer, and to build his confidence.
and it was all being done under supervision - eight inspectors to keep watch over the long-finned tuna, eight EEC inspectors!
online solutions for managing trademark searches and watches and collaborating with clients and colleagues.
Brussels - On a hillside overlooking the Turkish city of Gaziantep, Patriot missile launchers are keeping watch under NATO command and control.
his sons, known as the Keepers of the Grove, kept close watch on the night elves and regularly helped the Sentinels maintain peace in the land.
